VOL. I.A
THE
HAWKS OF HAWK-HOLLOW.
CHAPTER I.
What man that sees the ever-whirling wheele
Of Change, the which all mortall things doth away,
But that thereby doth find, and plainly feele,
How Mutability in them doth play
Her cruel sports to many men's decay.
Spenser
Faerie Queene
.
America
is especially the land of change. From
the moment of discovery, its history has been a
record of convulsions, such as necessarily attend
a transition from barbarism to civilization; and to
the end of time, it will witness those revolutions in
society, which arise in a community unshackled
by the restraints of prerogative. As no law of
primogeniture can ever entail the distinctions
meritoriously
won, or the wealth painfully amassed, by
a single individual, upon a line of descendants, the
mutations in the condition of families will be
perpetual
.
The Dives of to-day will be the Diogenes
of to-morrow; and the `man of the tub' will often
live to see his children change place with those of
the palace-builder. As it has been, so will it be,
Now up, now doun, as boket in a well;
and the honoured and admired of one generation
will be forgotten among the moth-lived luminaries
of the next.
That American labours under a melancholy
infatuation
,
who hopes, in the persons of his progeny,
to preserve the state and consideration he has
acquired
for himself. He cannot bequeath, along
with lands and houses, the wisdom and good
fortune which obtained them; nor can he devise
preventives against the natural consequences of
folly and waste. His edifice of pride must crumble
to dust, when both corner-stone and hypogeum
are based upon the contingencies of expectation;
and the funeral-stone and the elm of his family
mausoleum will vanish, in course of time, before
the axe and plough of a new proprietor.
This is the ordinance of Nature, who, if she
scatters her good gifts of talents with a
somewhat
despotic capriciousness, is well content that
men should employ them in republican and equal
rivalry.
In a little valley bordering upon the Delaware,
there stood, fifty years since, a fair dwelling, within
an ample domain, which a few years of vicissitude
had seen transferred from its founder to a stranger,
although wealth and a family of seven sons, the
boldest and strongest in the land, might have
seemed
to insure its possession to them during at least
two generations. The vale lies upon the right bank
of the river, imbosomed among those swelling hills
that skirt the south-eastern foot of the Alleghanies,
(using that term in the broad, generic sense given
it by geographers,) the principal ridge of which,
the Ka-katch-la-na-min, or Kittatinny, or as it is
commonly called, the Blue Mountain,is so near
at hand, that, upon a clear day, the eye can count
the pines bristling over its gray and hazy crags.
It stretches, indeed, like some military rampart of
the Titans, from the right hand to the left, farther
than the eye can reach, broken only by the gaps
that, for the most part, give passage to rivers; and
but for these, it would be entirely impassable.
The original proprietor of the estate was an
English emigrant of humble degree, and, at first, of
painfully contracted circumstances; but having
fallen heir to a considerable property in his own
land, and events of a very peculiar nature altering
the resolution he had formed to enjoy it within the
limits of the chalk-cliffs of Albin, he sat himself
down in good earnest to improve the windfall at
home. The little farm which he had cultivated
with his own hands, was speedily swelled into an
extensive manor; and deserting the hovel of logs
which had first contented his wants, he built a
dwelling-house of stone, so spacious, and of a
style of structure so irregular and fantastic, that
it had, at a distance, the air rather of a
hamlet
than a single villa, and indeed looked not
unlike a nest of dove-cots stuck together on the
hill-side. Without possessing one single feature of
architectural elegance, it had yet a romantic
appearance
,
derived in part from the scenery around,
from the beauty of the groves and clumps of trees
that environed it, and the vines and trailing
flowers
that were made, in summer at least, to conceal
many of its deformities. It was exceedingly
sequestered
also; for except the log hovel, into which
Mr. Gilbert (for that was his name) had inducted
a poor widow, befriended out of gratitude for
kindness shown him, when their respective
conditions
were not so unequal, there was not another
habitation to be seen from his house, though it
commanded an extensive prospect even beyond the
river. The highway to the neighbouring
Water-Gap
,
indeed, ran through the estate; the broad
river below often echoed to the cries of boatmen
and raftsmen, floating merrily onward to their
market; and the village dignified with the title of
County-town, was not above seven or eight miles
distant; so that the valley was not always
invested
with a Sabbath-day silence; and, besides, his
protege, the widow, had, with Mr. Gilbert's
consent
,
converted her hovel into a house of
entertainment
,
which sometimes seduced a wayfarer to
sojourn for a period in the valley. Mr. Gilbert
himself did all he could to add life and bustle to
his possessions, by doing honour to such well
behaved
villagers, or even strangers, as he could
induce to ruralize with him; for having built and
planted, and torn down and transplanted, until he
knew not well what to do with himself, he hit upon
that expedient for driving away ennui which passes
for hospitality,namely, converting into guests
all proper, and indeed improper, persons from
whom he could derive amusement, and who could
assist him to kill time. To this shift he was driven,
in great part, by the undomestic character of his
children; who, so soon as they arrived at an age
for handling the rifle, individually and infallibly
ran off into the woods, until, as the passion for
hunting grew with their growth, they might be
said almost to live in them. It was this wild
propensity
,
acting upon a disposition unusually
self-willed
and inflexible, in the case of his eldest boy,
Oran, that defeated his scheme of spending the
remainder of his days in England. He actually
crossed the sea, with his whole family, and
remained
in the neighbourhood of Bristol, his native
town, for the space of a year; but in that time,
Oran, a boy only twelve years old, `heartily
sick,' as he said, `of a land where there were no
woods, and no place where he could get by
himself
,'
finding remonstrance and entreaty fail to
move his father's heart to his purpose, took the
desperate resolution of returning to America alone;
A 2
which he did, having concealed himself in the
hold of a vessel, until she was out of the Channel.
His sufferings were great, but he endured them
with incredible fortitude; and finally after many
remarkable adventures, he found himself again in
his happy valley, in the charge or protection, if it
could be so called, of the good widow Bell,for
that was the name of the poor woman befriended
by his father. In a few months, his father followed
him, perhaps instigated by affection, (for Oran,
being the worst, was therefore the most favoured
of his children,) by the murmurs of the others, or
by the discovery he undoubtedly made, that his
wealth would secure him, if not equal comfort, at
least superior consideration, in the New World.
Consideration indeed he obtained, and increase
of wealth; but the wild manners and habits of his
children greatly afflicted him; and having married
a second wife, he was induced, in the hope of
`making a gentleman,' as he called it, of the boy
she bore him, (none of the others having that
ambition
,)
to commit him to the protection of a
sister
,
the widow of a Jamaica planter, who had
divided with him the bequest that had made his
fortune, and being childless herself, desired to
adopt him as her heir.
Thus much of the early history of Mr. Gilbert
was recollected with certainty, so late as the year
1782, by the villagers of Hillborough, the
countytown
already mentioned, who had so often shared
his hospitality; but long before that time, he had
vanished, with all his family, from the quiet,
beautiful
,
and well-beloved valley. They were wont
to speak with satisfaction of the good dinners they
had eaten, the rare wines they had drunk, the
merry frolics they had shared, in the Hawk's
Hollow,for so they perversely insisted upon
calling what Mr. Gilbert, in right of possession,
chose to designate as Avon-dale, in memory, or in
honour of his own buxom river of Somerset; they
related, too, to youthful listeners, the prophetic
sagacity
with which they had predicted violent ends
to the young Hawks of Hawk-Hollow, (so they
called the young Gilberts,) for their disobedience
to father and mother, and their unusual passion for
a life of adventure; and, finally, they shook their
heads with suspicion and regret, when they spoke
of Jessie, Gilbert's only daughter, of her early and
mysterious death, and still more, to them,
unaccountable
burial. All that could be gathered in
relation to this unhappy maiden, was dark and
unsatisfactory: her death had seemingly, in some
way, produced the destruction of the family and
the alienation of the estate. It was an event of more
than twenty years back; and from that period,
until
the time of his own sudden fight, Mr. Gilbert's
doors were no longer open, and his sons were no
more seen associated with the young men of the
county. The maiden had died suddenly, and been
interred in a private place on the estate.
In connexion with this event, some, more
garrulous
than others, were wont to speak of Colonel
Falconer, the present proprietor of Hawk-Hollow,
as having had some agency in the catastrophe;
but what it was, they either knew not, or they
feared to speak. Evil suspicions, however,
gathered
about this gentleman's name; and as he was
seldom, if ever, seen in Hawk-Hollow in person,
but had committed the stewardship of the property
to the hands of a distant relative, who resided on
it, the young felt themselves at liberty to fill up
from imagination, the sketch left imperfect by the
old; and accordingly, the Colonel, in time, came
to be considered by those who had never seen
him, as one of the darkest-hearted and most
dangerous
of his species. He was very rich; the
station he occupied in the eyes of his country was
lofty, and might have been esteemed noble; for he
had shed his blood in the great and fearful battle
of rights that was now approaching to a close;
and after being disabled by severe and honourable
wounds, he had changed the sphere of his
exertions
,
and was now as ardent and devoted a patriot
in the senate as he had been before in the field.
Yet in this distant quarter, these recommendations
to favour were forgotten; it was said, if he had
done good deeds, there were evil ones enough to
bury them as in a mountain, and if he had fought
well for his country, he had struggled still more
devotedly to aggrandize himself. In a word, he
was called a hard, avaricious, rapacious man,
whose chief business was to enrich himself at the
cost of the less patriotic, and who had got the
mastery of more sequestrated estates than an
honest man could have come by. It was a sin of
an unpardonable nature, that he had succeeded in
getting possession of Hawk-Hollow, when there
were so many others in the county who had set
their hearts upon it.
His representative on the estate was a certain
Captain John Loring, who, with all the patriotism
of his connexion, and perhaps a great deal more,
had never been able to turn it to any account. On
the contrary, beginning the world with an ample
patrimony, at the time when Mr. Falconer
commenced
as an adventurer, he had descended in
fortune with a rapidity only to be compared with
that of his friend's exaltation. The love of glory
had early driven him from his peaceful farm on
the Brandywine; and after distinguishing himself
as a volunteer in the Indo-Gallic wars of Western
Pennsylvania, it was his hard fate to bring his
career of effective service to a close on what he
was always pleased to call the Fatal Field of
Braddock
.
From that bloody encounter he came off
with more honour than profit, and with a body so
mangled and a constitution so shattered, that a
quarter of a century had scarce served to repair
the dilapidation of his animal man. But the Captain
had lost neither his spirit nor his love of glory. At
the first trump of the Revolution, he donned the
panoply of valour; he snatched up the pistols he
had taken from a dead Canadian at the Fatal Field
of Braddock, strapped upon his thigh the sword
he had received for his services in storming
certain
Indian forts on the Alleghany river, clapped
into his pocket the commission which the colonial
government had granted him in reward of that
gallant exploit, and reported himself, among a
crowd of younger patriots, as ready to do and die
for his country. The Commissioners looked at his
gray hairs and shattered leg, (the latter of which
had once been as full of musket-bullets as was ever
a cartouche-box,) commended his virtue and
enthusiasm
,
and divided the honours of command
among those who were better fitted to do the state
service. The Captain retired to his patrimonial
estate, and there contented himself as well as he
could, until the current of conflict, diverted from
one bloody channel into another, came surging at
at last into the pastoral haunts of the Brandywine.
At that time, his home was blessed with two
children
,
a gallant boy of eighteen, and a merry little
maiden of twelve. But one morning, he heard a
trumpet pealing over the hills and a cannon
roaring
hard by, behind the woods. He looked at the
face of his son, and the eye of the boy reflected
back the fire of his father's spirit. Their horses
were saddled in the stalls, and the spurs were
already on young Tom Loring's heels. It was
enoughthe Captain carried his son to the grave.
But, to his own dying day, he rejoiced over the
young man's fall. On this subject, the Captain
was commonly considered by his neighbours to be
crack-brained.
After this, came other misfortunes; and the
Captain
was a ruined man, landless, homeless, and
childless, save that his little Catherine was still left
to share his poverty, and, like a lamp in a cavern,
to exaggerate rather than enlighten the gloom of
his desolation. At this critical juncture, he found
a firm and prudent friend in Colonel Falconer, by
whom he was installed into the privileges, if not
the actual possession of Hawk-Hollow, in the
supervision
and improvement of which he seemed
now likely to pass the remainder of his days.
How far the kindly feelings of relationship, or how
far the influence of his daughter's growing beauty,
had contributed to secure him the benevolence of
this friend in need, was a question frequently
agitated
by the curious villagers. It was settled
among them, that there was a wedding in the
wind; but whether the young lady was to share
the lot of her distinguished patron, or to be given
to his gay and somewhat wild-brained son, was a
point on which busy bodies were long coming at a
conclusion. The Captain, though frank enough in
his way, was not exactly the individual whom one
would think of troubling with impertinent
questions
;
and Miss Loring, however hospitable and
courteous, had not yet selected a confidante from
among the blooming nymphs of Hillborough.
She was, however, the theme of as much
admiration
as curiosity; and being very beautiful, and of
manners always gentle, and at times irresistibly
engaging, the village poet immortalized her in
rhyme, and the village belles forgave the
eulogium
.
It remains but to say a word more of the
Gilberts
,
as a necessary introduction to a record,
designed
to rescue the story of their fate from the
uncertain and unfaithful lips of tradition. After
mingling in all the border wars, both Indian and
civil, that, from the time of Braddock's defeat to
the dispersion of the Connecticut settlers,
distracted
the unhappy Susquehanna settlements, they
deserted
the cause of their countrymen at the
beginning
of the Revolution, and appeared in the guise of
destroying demons, at Wyoming, on that occasion
of massacre, which has given to the spot a celebrity
so mournful. In other words they were traitors
and refugees; and however dreadful the reputation
they obtained as bold and successful depredators,
their fate was such as might have been, and
perhaps
was, anticipated by themselves. One after
another, they were cut off, some by the rifle and
tomahawk, one even by the halter, and all who did
perish, by deaths of violence. It was indeed, at
the time we speak of, confidently believed that
Oran, the eldest of all, and the last survivor, had
fallen within the space of a year, at a conflict on
the banks of the Mohawk, along with other
refugees
of the neighbouring commonwealth, with
whom he had associated himself. Great were the
rejoicings in consequence with all who dwelt
among the scenes of his earlier exploits; though
some professed to have their doubts on the subject,
and swore, that Oran Gilbert was not to be trusted,
dead or alive, until his scalp was seen nailed on
the county court-house door.
CHAPTER II.
Come here, my good hostess, pray how do you do?
Where is Cicely so cleanly, and Prudence, and Sue?
And where is the widow that dwelt here?
Prior
.
The
year 1782 was distinguished on the western
continent as the close of the great contest, which
obtained for America the name and privileges of
a free nation. The harbingers of peace came
flitting
into the land, with the swallows of spring;
and before the autumn had withered into winter,
so little doubt prevailed of a speedy reconciliation
taking place between Great Britain and the United
States, founded upon a full recognition by the
former
of all the claims of the latter, that the
Continental
Congress passed a resolve for the reduction
of its army, to take effect on the first day of the
coming year. War was no longer waged upon
any scale of magnitude; such hostilities as
continued
,
were conducted almost solely by the
desperate
and lawless of both parties, and consisted of
predatory incursions, occasionally attempted in
the wilder parts of the country, by some skulking
band of refugees, and of expeditions of vengeance,
planned and executed in a moment of wrath, by
the excited sufferers. At this period, the only
portion
of the States, north of the Potomac, in the
hands of the British, was the city of New York,
with its dependencies; and around these narrow
possessions the lines of the Continental army were
drawn, extending from the Highlands of New York
to the plains of Monmouth in New Jersey.
Military
posts therefore existed at no great distance
from the Hawk's Valley; and although the wild
and mountainous country on either bank of the
Delaware offered the strongest retreats to men of
desperate character, it had been very long since
the inhabitants had apprehended any danger from
the presence of enemies. In the earlier part of
the year, at least, they had no cause for alarm;
and accordingly they mingled, without alloy, their
raptures at the prospect of returning peace with
their rejoicings over the death of Oran Gilbert, the
most dreaded and detested of the Hawks of
Hawk-Hollow
.
One atrocity had indeed been committed, in a
neighbouring state, which, besides exciting the
fiercest indignation, had taught the occupants of
the valley how little their security was owing to
any relenting of spirit, or want of military daring,
on the part of the refugees, whom the general
success of the republican arms had driven in great
numbers into the city of New York. A certain
Captain Joshua, or Jonathan, Huddy, of the New
Jersey state troops, having been captured, after a
gallant resistance, at one of the posts in Monmouth
county of that state, by a party of loyalists from
New York, was for a while immured in prison,
then carried back to his native state, and finally
hanged by his captors, without trial, sentence, or
any authority whatever, except what was derived
from the verbal orders of a body of men calling
themselves the Board of Directors of the
Associated
Loyalists. The result of this wanton and
brutal murder, and of the failure of the British
authorities to bring the chief perpetrator to justice,
was an instant order on the part of the American
Commander-in-chief, to retaliate upon a British
prisoner of equal rank; and before the month of
May was over, young Asgill of the British Guards,
whose story is familiar to all readers of American
VOL. I.B
history, was conducted to the lines at Morristown,
to await, in painful uncertainty, the fate that now
depended, or seemed to depend, upon the
movements
of his countrymen in relation to the true
criminal.
Late in the spring of this year, Hawk-Hollow
received a new addition to its society, in the
person
of a stranger, who, one pleasant evening, rode
up to the hovel, which, as was before mentioned,
Dame Alice, or as she was more familiarly called,
Elsie Bell, had, so many years before, converted
into a house of entertainment. But the credit of the
poor woman, now aged, infirm, and almost
friendless
,
had long since departed; and the tongues of
the ignorant and foolish, in an age when the most
ridiculous superstitions were not wholly confined
to the brains of children, had invested her
habitation
with a character which repelled alike the
curious and the weary. Her age, her poverty,
her loneliness, her unsocial character, and perhaps
also her attachment to the memory of a family all
others had learned to detest, had brought her into
bad odour; and some thoughtless or malicious
persons having persuaded themselves that a
certain
famous mortality among their cattle could
have been caused by nothing short of witchcraft,
it was soon determined that old Elsie had stronger
claims to the character of a broom-rider than any
other person in the county. It was fortunate for
her that the imputation fell upon her in a land,
which once, in the case of an old woman brought
before a jury under the same charge, had
rendered
the wise and humane verdict, that they found
her guilty, not of being a witch, but of being
suspected.
It never once occurred to any
individual
to prosecute, or even persecute, poor
Elsie; nor is it supposed that any sane man ever
seriously believed a charge so cruel and absurd;
yet the stain rested upon the unfortunate creature,
and was the cause of her losing all the little
custom
of her house, and being, at one period, reduced
to great straits.
Her house had a very lonely appearance,
especially
dreadful, at nightfall, in the eyes of the
passing
urchin. It was in a hollow place on the
roadside
,
the head of a gully, which, expanding into a
wide, though broken and winding ravine, ran down
to the river, half a mile distant, receiving, before
it had yet reached it, the waters of a foaming
rivulet coming from another quarter. A little
enclosure
,
or yard, serving as an approach to the
house, was surrounded by oak-trees. Its surface
was broken, and on one side was a rough and
jagged rock, almost a crag, sprinkled with
sumach
and other wild plants, that hid one half of
the lowly fabric, while the other peeped
insidiously
from under the boughs of an antique,
spectral-looking
sycamore, springing from the side of the
ravine, which was, in part, overlooked by the
hovel. A little runnel crossed the road
immediately
before the house; and flowing through the
yard, and making its way among the naked roots
of the sycamore, it fell, with a gurgling sound, into
the ravine. The murmurs of this little cascade,
affected variously by drought and rain, and by the
echoes of the hollow, sent many a superstitious
thrill to the heart of the countryman whom any
unlucky accident compelled to pass by the cabin
at midnight.
Of a silent, reserved, and even saturnine temper,
there was perhaps enough in Elsie's cold welcome
to repel visitation, even without the addition of
imputed witchcraft; and long before that heavy
charge had fallen upon her, it was esteemed a
misfortune to be obliged to tarry above an hour at
the Traveller's Rest, as the inn had been called in
its days of credit. To crown all, about the time
when men and boys were beginning to talk
ominously
about the rot and murrain, a rival
establishment
was set up, a few miles farther down
the river, which offered the attractions of good
liquors, lounging idlers, and a talkative host, who
made it his business to be always well providod
with news from the market, the army, and
Congress
.
The last resource of the Traveller's Rest
gave way before such a rival, and never more (at
least for many years) was there seen a guest
quaffing
his cider, or smoking his pipe, in the shadow
of Elsie's porch, except occasionally, when some
stranger passed by, who boldly disregarded, or
was entirely unacquainted with the popular
superstition
in relation to the hostess.
The privations suffered by the poor old woman,
in consequence of this failure of her ordinary means
of subsistence, were very great,greater, indeed,
than was suspected; for she uttered no complaint,
and sought no relief. A few acres of ground had
been added to the hovel, given to her by the elder
Gilbert. The title was not, indeed, thought to be
very strong, and as it lay in the very centre of
Colonel Falconer's domains, a true
regnum in
regno,
it was sometimes wondered he made no
attempt to dispossess her, and thus complete her
ruin. From these worn-out fields, had she been
able to retain any one about her to cultivate them,
she might have gleaned a scanty yet sufficient
subsistence. But neither son nor kinsman of any
degree, had the poor widow left in the wide world;
and when men began to doubt, suspect, and shun
her, she was no longer able to procure the
assistance
even of hirelings; and her fields lay fallow
and overgrown with brambles. Her situation grew
hopelessly distressed and desolate; in vain she
exposed
her slender stores of gingerbread in the
window
,
and her bottles of spruce-beer in the cool
brook, to tempt the wayfarer to turn aside for
such refreshments. If the stranger did feel for a
moment urged to exchange the scorching road, on
a July day, for the shadowy porch, he cast his eye
upon the garden, at the road-side, now the last
dependence
of the miserable widow, and beholding
her uninviting and squalid appearance, passed on,
without thinking how much real charity might
have been conferred by the disbursement of a few
pence at that abode of poverty.
Such was the condition of this poor solitary
creature, when Captain Loring was installed into
the manor house; and such it might have
continued
,
had not his daughter, shocked at the
discovery
of her distresses, and interested doubly when
she found in her a tone of mind and manners
worthy
of a better fate, came immediately, like an
angel, to her aid, and restored her again to a state
of comfort. Not satisfied with rendering this
assistance, she rested not day or night, until she
had procured a labourer to till the neglected fields,
and had even obtained a little negro wench to
dwell with Elsie as a domestic; and perceiving how
much her sufferings were really owing to the
ridiculous
fears and prejudices of the country people,
she made it a point frequently to visit her house in
person, dragging along with her, when she could,
the beaux and belles of the village, in the hope that
others would soon follow the example, and thus
restore the Traveller's Rest to its ancient
reputation
.
She even prevailed upon her father to
honour the house with his patronage, at least so
far as to visit it, when riding by; and, though
there was nothing in the tempers of the two to
make any intercourse between them very friendly
and agreeable, the Captain had humoured his
daughter so long in that way, that it grew to be
B 2
one of his habits; and he seldom passed by,
without
stopping for a moment, to bestow a few
civilities
upon the widow. Notwithstanding all these
benevolent exertions of Miss Loring, however, the
Traveller's Rest never recovered its reputation or
custom; and when the traveller spoken of before,
rode up to the porch, and announced his intention
of entering, and even sleeping, under her roof, the
poor widow herself regarded him with a species
of amazement.
How is it, good mother? said he, observing
her hesitation: They told me, in the village, you
could give me both meat and lodging. Do not
fear I shall prove a fault-finder;a crust of bread
and a cup of milk, or, if need be, of water, will
satisfy me; and as for a bed, why a sack of straw,
or the floor and my saddle-bags,will be a
couch for a king. Can you not receive me?
As he spoke, he took note of her countenance
and appearance. The former was withered and
furrowed, for she was very old; her hairs were
gray and thin, and one of her hands shook with a
paralytic affection. Yet she bore her years
bravely, and when she had shaken off the
abstraction
of mind, which had become almost habitual
from her long life of solitude, and lifted her eyes,
he saw that they shone with any thing but the
gleams of dotage. He observed, too, as she rose
from the wheel she had been plying on the porch,
and approached to its verge, that her step was
firm, and even, as it afterwards appeared, agile.
Her dress was of the humblest texture, and none
of the newest, but studiously clean and neat, and
the muslin coif on her head was white as snow.
If your wants be indeed so humble, she said,
with a manner that surprised him, and a voice
almost without the quaver of age, I can receive
you into my poor house, and bid you welcome.
But, good young sir, here have I no one to help
you, and to take your horse. My man Dancy, is
in the field, and the girl Margery
Say not a word about them, said the traveller,
leaping from his horse, I am my own groom and
lackey of the chamber; and with your consent, I
will find my way to the stable, which I see behind
the rock; and Long-legs here will follow me.
He was as good as his word, and stabled his
steed without farther preliminary; and thus, by
showing himself ready to adapt his manners to his
circumstances, he won the good will of Elsie
immediately
.
Indeed, as if to convince her of his
sincerity, he told her at once his name, and his
objects in coming to her house. His name, he
said, was Hunter,Herman Hunter,his country
South Carolina; he was a painter,or so professed
himself; and his only motive for intruding upon
the solitude of Hawk-Hollow, was to improve
himself in his art, by devoting some weeks to
study, among the neighbouring cliffs and
mountains
.
It had been his intention, he avowed, to
take up his quarters some miles farther on, in the
heart of the neighbouring gorge; `but he liked the
neatness and privacy of the Traveller's Rest so
well, he thought he could do nothing better than
remain where he was; at least, he would remain a
few days,perhaps, he might stay two or three
weeks,he did not know, but he thought
Hawk-Hollow
exceedingly pretty.'
There were two circumstances which
recommended
him to the poor widow's regard, even
more strongly than his affable and conformable
behaviour. In the first place, it appeared that his
name Herman, had been borne by some deceased
son or relative, and its familiar sound brought a
mournful pleasure to her ears,in the second, his
appearance was highly prepossessing. He could
not have been above four or five and twenty years
old; his figure, though somewhat beneath the
middle
size, was good, and his limbs well knit and
active; his face was decidedly handsome, with a
very dark complexion,his eyes black and
sparkling
,
and his mouth, which disclosed at every laugh,
a set of the finest teeth in the world, expressive
of good-humour and a mirthful spirit. As for the
ornaments of his outward man, they consisted of
under-clothes of some white summer-stuff, a frock
of blue cloth, a grass hat, short boots and gloves;
and to show that he was somewhat of a coxcomb
withal, he wore a laced scarlet vest, an
embroidered
neckcloth, and a huge gold ring on his finger,
glistering with a sapphire, or some cerulean
substitute
.
He had a good roan horse, too, and
saddlebags
of enviable capacity; besides which, he
made his first appearance with a carbine slung to
his back, and a leathern portfolio under his arm;
so that he looked like one who visited the retreat,
with a resolution to make the most of its
advantages
.
Having taken a second look around the hovel,
he saw no reason to abate his satisfaction. Though
poverty was apparent on the naked walls and
uncarpeted
floors, yet every thing was clean and
well ordered. The hands of the widow had eked
out the lack of more costly decorations, by
sticking
in the fire-place and windows, and over the
mantel and table-tops, green laurel boughs and
sprigs of flowers, such as abounded on the
neighbouring
hills, or were cultivated in her little
garden
,
and such as were pleasant enough at this
season. Besides, a grape-vine had been
encouraged
to trail over one corner of the porch, and
the other supported festoons of nasturtions and
morning-glories. His evening meal, though
simple
and humble enough, he was pleased to
commend
;
and if his bed was hard, and the sheets
somewhat coarser than were wont to encircle his
limbs, a happy temperament and a heart at ease
made them endurable, and even pleasant. If he
found Dancy, the farmer, when he returned from
the fields, to be taciturn and even stupid, still he
liked his honest face; and the little negro wench,
Margery, ugly, awkward, and a thousand times
more stupid than Dancy himself, he soon
discovered
,
would prove a source of unfailing amusement.
Being of this happy mood, and persuading
himself
that his quarters were exactly to his desire,
he prepared, the day after his arrival, to approve
his zeal and skill, by sketching some one or other
of the pretty prospects presented from the
Traveller's
Rest. He rose with the dawn and trudged
down the ravine, until he reached the river;
wherein, after looking about him with much
satisfaction
,
at the hills sleeping in morning mist, he
plunged, and amused himself with a bather's
enthusiasm
,
now swimming luxuriously in the
limpid
and serene flood of the Delaware, and now
trying his strength against the ruder current, that
came dashing from the rivulet. This bore the
patronymical title of Hawk-Hollow Run. And
here we may as well observe, that upon a
promontory
at its mouth, he discovered the origin of
that name, which, notwithstanding the efforts of
Mr. Gilbert to christen it anew, his neighbours had
so obstinately continued to give the valley. Upon
a tall and conspicuous oak-tree, dead, barkless,
and well nigh branchless, a pair of antique
fishing-hawks
screamed over their eyry; and here they
had preserved it from immemorial ages. The
dead tree and the nest of sticks being conspicuous
objects, even from a distance on the river, the
earlier navigators had soon learned to designate
the whole valley after the majestic birds that
seemed
its monarchs.
After this, he set himself to work with paper
and pencil, but with no good effect, not being in
the mood, or because he discovered there were
divers obstacles in his way. First, the sun did not
shine from the right place, and secondly, it shone
in the wrong one; then there was no way of
getting
a rock converted into a chair, at the precise
place where he wanted it, though there were so
many thousands where he did not; and, in fine,
he found himself, when all was ready, waxing
eager for breakfast.
After breakfast, he had as many difficulties to
encounter; and in short, after making divers
essays
,
he beheld the afternoon sun sink low towards
the west, without having accomplished any thing
worthy of being deposited in the port-folio. But
never mind, said he, with a philosophical
disregard
of his indolence and fickleness, we shall
have the fit more strongly upon us on the
morrow
.
He sat down in the porch and cast his eyes
towards
the manor house, which was commonly
known by the title, so little flattering to the
founder's
memory, of Gilbert's Folly. At this distance,
and from this spot, it had an impressive and even
charming appearance. It lay upon the slope of a
hill, perhaps a mile or more from the Traveller's
Rest; and, as it faced very nearly towards the
east, he had remarked it, in the morning, when
illuminated by the first beams of the day-spring,
shining, with a sort of aristocratic pomp and pride,
at its lowly neighbour, from the midst of green
woods and airy hills. At the present moment,
the front being entirely in shade, it had a
somewhat
sullen and melancholy look, resulting in
part from the sombre hue of the stone of which
it was built; and though slanting rays of
sunshine
,
here and there striking on the sides of
chimneys, gables, and other elevations, gave it a
picturesque relief, it still preserved an air of
soberness
and gloom. It seemed to lie in the heart of a
mighty paddock, once, however, termed a park,
that was circumscribed by a line of pollards,
sweeping over the hill-side, and here and there
broken by groves of unchecked growth. In one
or two places on the grounds, were rows of Italian
poplars, stretching along in military rank and file,
and adding that peculiar
palisaded
beauty to the
landscape, which is seen to the greatest advantage
in a hilly country. Here, too, was another exotic
stranger, the weeping-willow, drooping in the
moist hollow, and shaking its boughs in the pool.
The principal trees, however, were the natives of
the valley, most of them perhaps left standing in
their original places, when the grounds were laid
out in the forest. The picture is complete, when
it is added that the slopes of the hills were
carpeted
with the rich embellishments of agriculture:
the wheat-fields and maize-plantations, waving
like lakes of verdure, in the breeze, were certainly
not the least of the charms of Hawk-Hollow,
except
perhaps, at that moment, to the
anti-utilitarian
painter.
He regarded the prospect for a long time in
silence, and then muttered his thoughts aloud, half
to himself, and half to his ancient hostess, who had
drawn her wheel up to her favourite seat on the
porch, and added its drowsy murmur to the sound
of the oak-boughs, rustling together in the breeze:
This, then, he exclaimed, is the little
elysium
,
from which wrong, and the revenge of
wrong, drove a once happy and honoured family,
to wander exiles and outlaws in the land? And not
one permitted even to lay his bones in the loam of
his birth-place! and no friend left to avenge or
lament!
`Quis sit laturus in aras thura?'
The wheel of Alice revolved with increased
velocity, but she betrayed no inclination to yield
to the prattling infirmity of age; though she,
doubtless, of all persons in the country, was best
informed on the subject now uppermost in the
mind of the painter. He was in the mood,
however
,
for extracting such information as he could;
and after a moment's silence, he resumed, with a
direct question,
That is Avondale Hall, is it not, good mother?
It is Gilbert's Folly, replied the hostess, drily.
We know no other name.There are some call
it Falconer's Trump-cardbut that is nothing.
Perhaps not, said the young man: but who
can tell better than yourself? Good mother Elsie
you must forgive me for being so familiar; but, in
truth, I love the nameit was the name of my
nurse, the first I learned to utter:I have a great
curiosity about these poor Gilberts; and, I was told,
no one could inform me about them so well as
yourself.
And why should you ask about them?
demanded
the hostess, who, as Herman had long
since observed, conversed in language that would
scarce have been anticipated from her appearance.
They can have done you no harm, and certainly
they never did you good. You cannot fear them,
for they are dead; and you yourself said, they left
none to lament them.
But they left many to curse, said Herman;
and it is this that makes me curious to know the
truth about them. I have not heard any men
pronounce
the name, without accompanying it with
maledictions; which were just so many proofs that
they were unsafe informants.
It is better then that they should be forgotten,
muttered Elsie: If they did wrong, bitterly have
they been punished; if they provoked men to
curses, the curses have been heavy on their heads,
and are now even heaped upon their graves. Yet
you speak of them not like othershow comes it
that
you
pronounce their name without a curse?
Simply because, never having received any
hurt at their hands, and having nothing of the
hound about me, I feel no impulse to join in the
cry of the pack, until I know what beast they are
baying. I saw, in the village, an old man begging;
I was told, his house had been burned down,
and his wife and children in it, by `the accursed
Gilberts;' I saw also, a miserable idiot, or madman,
I know not which, dancing along the road-side, and
inviting me to a wedding: I asked about him, and
was informed he dwelt of yore in the Wyoming
Valley, and was set upon by the Hawks of
Hawk-Hollow
,
in the hour of his marriage, and he alone
saved of all the bridal partyI saw
It is enoughGod has judged them, said the
old woman, with a voice both solemn and
reproachful
.
All these things have they done, and
many more as dreadful and cruel. These are the
fruits of civil war; for men are then changed to
beasts. I knew a man of Wyoming, who was
killed by his own brothershot through the head,
while he knelt down, begging for quarter of his
mother's son! God has judged these acts, for they
who did them are gone; and God will yet judge
the men that drove them into their madness.
They had cause, then, for what they did?
asked Herman, with interest. It was not in cold
blood, and upon deliberate choice, that they sided
with the tories against their countrymen?
Perhaps it was, perhaps it was not, said Mrs.
Bell, mournfully. A plough-furrow on the
hillside
may grow at last into the bed of a torrent;
VOL. I.C
and what is but a cause for light anger, may, in
time, work the brain into a frenzy. But ask me
not of these things now: it was in a season like
this, twenty-four years sincebut it is foolish to
remember me of it,perhaps sinful. Some time,
perhaps, I may speak of these unhappy people to
you; but I cannot now. Trust, at least, that if
the Hawks of Hawk-Hollow, as you called them,
did much wrong, they also endured it,and that,
too, when they had not provoked it.
Finding that his curiosity could obtain no
farther
gratification at the present moment, Herman
Hunter again cast his eyes upon the mansion, and
being greatly charmed by an effect made by the
striking of the sunshine on certain parts, while
others lay in the broadest and deepest shadow, he
was seized with a fit of artist-like enthusiasm, and
arranging his drawing materials upon a little table,
which he drew into the porch for the purpose,
he was straightway immersed in the business of
sketching. While he was dotting down chimneys
and windows with great haste and satisfaction, he
was struck with a new and unexpected effect in
the picture. A scarlet mantle, beside which
glittered
another of snowy white, suddenly blazed out
like a star from a clump of shadowy trees in the
paddock, and he became aware that two females
on horseback were issuing from the park, and
riding down the road. But losing sight of them
again, as they ambled into a hollow, and being now
really engrossed in his employment, he thought no
more of them, until they suddenly re-appeared
from behind a thicket no great distance off,
galloping
forward with an impetuosity and violence that
would have done honour to veteran dragoons.
Somewhat astonished at such an unexpected
display of spirit, he dropped his pencil, and for an
instant supposed that their ponies were running
away with these damsels errant. They were not
attired for the saddle, and seemed rather to have
sprung upon their palfreys from some sudden
whim and spirit of frolic than with a purpose of
leaving the park, in which he had first caught
sight of them. They were arrayed merely in
simple walking-dresses of white, over which one
had flung a light scarlet shawl; and instead of
caps or round hats, they had low and
broad-brimmed
hats of thin felt, without veils, much
better
fitted for rambling in, over sunny meads, than
for displaying to the winds on horseback.
His suspicion that their ponies had taken the
matter into their own hands,or rather the bits
into their own teeth, was of short duration; and
as they advanced with increased rapidity, he saw
plainly, by the mirthful rivalry displayed in all
their actions and gestures, that they were
positively
running a race, the scarlet mantle being the
winner,or, so far, at least, as a full length would
go, in full prospect of winning.
Not a little diverted at the spectacle, and the
merry cries with which they encouraged their
steeds, he rose from the table, to take a better
view of the fair jockeys, as they should brush by;
when, to his great surprise, no sooner had they
reached the little oak-yard that conducted to the
Traveller's Rest, than they made a rapid wheel,
and came dashing up to the porch in a style
worthy
of a race-course.
It happened, either because he was in part
concealed
by the veil of nasturtions that grew near to
where he had placed his table, or because they
were too much engaged in their frolic to raise
their eyes, that the young painter was seen by
neither of the ladies, until they were within six
yards of the porch; when the headmost, suddenly
observing him, drew up in such confusion that she
had well nigh jerked her pony over on his back.
He perceived at once, that
his
appearance at the
Traveller's Rest was wholly unexpected, and was
any thing but welcome to the adventurous pair.
Indeed, it was manifest that the consciousness of
having been detected by a stranger engaged in
such jockey-like amusement, had greatly
disconcerted
them both.
All this the young man observed in a moment,
and could scarce suppress the smile that gathered
over his visage, even when he saw that the
confusion
of the foremost damsel had discomposed her
palfrey. However, as he looked into her face,
florid at once with exercise and shame, he beheld
a pair of such radiant black eyes, flashing with
mingled mirth and vexation, and withal a
countenance
of such haughty and decidedly aristocratic
character, as instantly put him upon his best
behaviour
.
He took off his hat, like a well-bred
gentleman
,
and advancing from the porch, would have
taken her pony by the rein, had she not instantly
recovered herself, and turned the animal aside,
with an empress-like I thank you, sir! He
thought the refusal of assistance, so respectfully
offered, was somewhat ungrateful, and even rude;
but she looked so beautiful, he could do nothing
less than testify his admiration by another bow.
Meanwhile the second maiden, whose confusion
seemed, at first, even greater than her
companion's
,
and who blushed at the sight of him with
even painful embarrassment, recovering herself
more quickly, (for her filly was not so restiff as
the other,) rode up to the porch, and saluting the
ancient widow, who had risen to receive her,
exclaimed
,
though with a flurried voice,
You must pardon us, good Elsiewe came to
visit youbut we knew not you had guests with
you. Then turning to Herman, just as her friend had
rejected his proffered assistance, she said, with the
sweetest voice in the world, as if to make amends
for the rudeness, We are much obliged to you,
sirbut the horses are very gentle. She then
turned again to Dame Bell, and, as if resolved to
explain away as much of the cause of visitation as
possible, said,
We are looking for my father, Elsie; and we
thought, that, instead of waiting for him in the
park, we would ride by your house, and ask you
how you did. We will not intrude upon you
longer.Good by, my dear Mrs. Bell.
With these hurried expressions, and having
inclined
her head courteously to the painter, she
rode out of the yard, followed by her companion;
when having hesitated a moment, as if uncertain
whether to continue upon the road or not, they
suddenly came to a decision, and rode back
towards
the paddock, though at a much more
moderate
pace than before.
So great was the admiration with which
Herman
Hunter regarded the beauty of the red shawl,
that he had scarce bestowed two glances upon her
friend. He had noticed indeed, that a profusion of
gold-shadowed locks and eyes of extreme gentleness
and sweetness, gave a very agreeable expression
to a countenance at least two years younger than
the other's; but as there was none of the spirit of
fire breaking out at a glance from those loop-holes
of the soul, to make an instant impression on his
imagination, as had been the case with the other,
he lost the opportunity of satisfying himself by
another look, how well her charms might endure a
comparison with those of her companion. His
admiration was doubly unfortunate; since, little as
it deserved such a return, it laid the foundation for
a spirit of hostility, little short of absolute hatred,
C 2
in the bosom of the lady, as will be seen in the
sequel of this tradition.
As the gay but disconcerted pair rode away
together
,
he could scarce content himself until they
got beyond earshot, before he exclaimed, with the
most emphatic delight,
I vow to heaven, my dear mother Elsie, she is
the most beautiful creature I ever laid my eyes
on!
Alice responded with a faint sigh and a yet
fainter smile; but her countenance immediately
darkened, while she muttered,
I pity her, poor child. The storm is coming
upon her that she dreams not of; the curse will
swallow up all that are, and shall be, of his house;
and she in whom there is no wrong, and who was
born no child of an unjust father, will share the
penalty with his children. Yes, yes, she added,
straining her eyes, after the maidens, I shall see
her
bright eyes dimmed with tears, and then
closed,
her
yellow locks parted over a forehead
of stone and death,and perhaps help to lay her
in the earth out of men's sight, as I have helped
with one who was as young and as fair!
I vow, mother Elsie, said the young man,
surprised
at the prophetic sadness and emphasis of
her speech, but still more at the mention of
yellow
locks, while his own thoughts were musing
upon ringlets of raven. I vow, you have
mistaken
me altogether. I meant the other lady, the
black-eyed, angelic creature, who tossed her head
at me with such disdain,and, hang it, incivility,
too; for it cannot be denied, she was uncivil.
I thought you were speaking of the Captain's
daughter, said the widow, coldly.
I know no more about the Captain's daughter
than my grandmother, said the youth,
irreverently
;
nor do I care half so much. But tell me
Elsie,who is that black-eyed creature? I never
beheld any body to compare with her!
She is the daughter of Colonel Richard
Falconer
,
said the hostess, resuming her labours at
the wheel, yet apparently disposed to reply to any
farther interrogatories the young man might
propose
.
But the painter seemed satisfied with what
he had heard. He exclaimed at once, with a look
of strong disgust,
Why then may the fiends seize the fancy, and
my fool's head along with it! Hark'e, good dame
Bell, did you ever hear of the old heathen
Lamia?
the
Lemures,
as they were sometimes called?
I have heard of some such beasts of Peru,
said the complaisant hostess; and I believe they
are a kind of camels.
Oh, that's the
llama,
the pretty little llama,
said the young man, with the good-humour that
became an instructer. The Lami were
monsters
and sorceresses of Africa, with the face and
bust of women, and the body of a serpent,a sort
of land mermaids. (By the by, do you know, I
saw a mermaid once? Some time, I will tell you
all about her; but, just now, all I can say is, that
she was monstrous ugly.) These Lami often
bewitched men, who looked them in the face: if
you looked there first, you were so blinded, you
could not perceive their true deformity, until
assisted
by the counter-spell of some benevolent
magician
.
Now, Elsie, this is my thought: I hold
Miss Falconer to be a Lamia; and the sound of
her father's name was the spell that opened my
eyes to her true ugliness. Pho! continued the
youth, observing the incredulity and wonder of his
auditor; the image is a bad one after all, for it
conveys an improper impression. I should say,
that
I
am like the Lamia's lover, not Miss
Falconer
like the Lamia. To tell you the truth, I have
heard so many ill things said of the father, that I
feel myself heartily inclined to hate the daughter.
A vixen, I warrant me!
The old woman regarded him earnestly, and
then replied,
Little cause have I to love Colonel Falconer,
or to speak well of him and his; yet why should a
stranger like you, assume the post of the judge,
and visit the father's faults upon the head of his
offspring? But you do not speak seriously. I
know no evil of Miss Falconer, and I have heard
none. This is the first time I have ever seen her so
near to my threshold: and I know not what strange
fancy could have brought her hither. As for Miss
Catherine, the Captain's daughter, she often comes
to inquire about me. Poor child! she fears not
the `old witch,' for she has done no harm to me
nor to any other mortal; she does not hate `
wicked
old Elsie,' for hatred dwells not in her nature;
but she looks with respect and pity upon the
miseries
of age and penury. And many a good deed
she has done me, when others passed me by with
scorn and hate. Would that I might go down to
the grave in her place! were it but in memory of
her goodness. But when the bolt is aimed at the
little willow, even the withered old oak cannot
arrest it.
With such expressions as these the old woman,
if she did not re-inspire Herman Hunter with
admiration
for Miss Falconer, succeeded at least in
awakening some interest for the younger lady;
which was greatly increased, when he came to
suspect, from some expressions Elsie let fall, that
the miseries she seemed so confidently to predict
as being in store for the maiden, were predicated
upon the knowledge of a contemplated union
between
her and the brother of her friend. It was
plain, from what Elsie said, that this was to be a
marriage of convenience, in which Catherine's
affections were to be sacrificed, or disregarded.
It is true, that Elsie did not directly affirm this to
be the case; but the inference from her
expressions
was consequential and inevitable; and
Herman
only wondered that the young lady, whom
he now pictured to himself as dying of a broken
heart, should have looked so rosy and happy.
In the meanwhile, the maidens rode on,
returning
towards the park, until they reached the grove
in the hollow, where they were sheltered from view.
Here they paused, and the Captain's daughter gave
at once the flattest contradiction to all Elsie's
piteous
allusions to the state of her feelings, by looking
archly into her companion's face, and then
bursting
into an uncontrollable fit of laughter.
Well, what now, dear Hal? she cried, while
tears of genuine merriment swam in her eyes and
rolled on her cheeks; what do you think of your
race
now?
Shall we try it over again?
Upon my word, Miss Loring
Kate! call me Kate, or never look to see me
laugh more, exclaimed the Captain's daughter.
Now pray, cousin Hal, do you not think we have
exhibited our horsemanship somewhat too
advantageously
to-day? Fy, Harriet, I will never
forgive
you! To think we should go galloping in
this manner, almost into the arms of a young
fellow
with a scarlet waistcoat! It is
too
ridiculous!
So much for dragging me along after you, to
the old witch's! said Miss Falconer, pettishly.
After
me? cried the other, with increased
mirth; why, you were leadingyou had beaten
me by full a length and a half, as the jockeys call
it:so much for not starting fair! And as for
dragging you there, Harriet, pray do me justice;
you know it was your own wicked suggestion
altogether
that carried you thither, and my frailty that
made me follow. It is all a punishment on you,
for breaking the commandment, and running after
the forbidden fruit. Oh, curiosity! curiosity! when
shall we poor women shuffle the little tempter from
our bosoms? But pray, cousin, what made you
treat the young man so rudely? Sure, he was
very handsome and well-behaved; and sure, young
gentlemen, handsome and well-behaved, are not
so plentiful in Hawk-Hollow! I think we will get
pa to invite him to dinner.
Well, Catherine, said the other, you are
merry to-day; but it happens so seldom, and I am
so glad of it, that I pardon you, although your
mirth is all at my expense.
You are angry with me, Harriet? said the
Captain's daughter, riding up to her friend, and
stretching forth her hand. Her frolicsome
spirits
vanished in a moment, and the change on her
countenance and in her whole manner, from
extreme
gayety to impetuous emotion, was
inexpressibly
striking and touching.
Angry? by no means, said Miss Falconer, as
Catherine flung her arm round her neck and kissed
her. Poor wayward Kate! I would you could
laugh at me for ever. Why do you cry, mouse?
You are certainly the most extraordinary mad
creature in the world!
Yes, I am, said Miss Loring, smiling through
her tears; I can't abide being talked stiffly to.
But what shall we do? Shall we ride up to the park?
Shall we sit down here, and play long-straws for
sweethearts? Shall we take heart of grace, and
ride on in search of papa? Or shall we play
termagant
again, whip, cut and spur, whoop and
halloo, and call Monsieur Red-Jacket to stand up
for umpire? Any thing, dear Hal, to kill time,
and find you amusement.
Was Monsieur Red-Jacket so handsome, after
all? demanded Miss Falconer.
I don't know, said Catherine: He kept his
eyes so fixed upon your own face, I could not
half see him. But, really, he seemed to admire
you very muchI suppose, because you were first
in! I don't see how you could have the heart to
treat him so uncivilly, when his admiration was so
manifest, and his bearing so respectful?
Was it, indeed? said the other, shaking her
head, as if regretfully. Young, handsome, well
bred, and an admirerand yet, I know, I shall
never abide the sight of him. What! see me riding
in full race, with whoop and halloo, and all that, as
you say, like a grazier's daughter!poh, it is
intolerable
:
it can never be forgiven!
Why, he saw me, too, said Miss Loring;
and I am sure,
I
forgive him! And it is no such
great matter, after all.
No great matter, to be sure; but small ones
govern the world. No one can forgive being made
ridiculous, especially a woman of spirit. Come,
we will gallop back to the park, and leave the
Captain to find his own way.
With these words, they returned to the
paddock
.
In the confession of a weak and capricious
prepossession
,
which was perhaps more than half
serious, Miss Falconer showed an almost prophetic
sense of what would be the future temper of her
mind towards the unlucky Herman. Neither the
manifest folly nor injustice of the sentiment, even
when gratitude should have expelled it from her
bosom for ever, could prevent it ripening into
jealousy and final dislike; and unfortunately
circumstances
of an accidental nature soon arose to
give a double impulse to these unamiable feelings.
CHAPTER III.
A man of blood, being brought up in the wars
And cruel executions.
Beaumont and Fletcher
.
A very foolish, fond old man,
Four-score and upwards; and, to deal plainly,
I fear, he is not in his proper mind.
King Lear
.
The
painter, still keeping his eyes upon the pair,
pondered over that propensity of our nature, which
urges even the coldest and demurest of mortals
into acts of extravagance, when removed a
moment
from artificial restraints. The whole system
of social federation is a state of enthrallment and
captivity, although undoubtedly a wholesome one;
and he who publicly rejects its fetters, though he
may personally enjoy his independence, violates
that compact which separates the refined from
the primitive and uncivilized states of existence,
and encourages others to rush back upon the
savage
freedom of the latter. The preservation of a
certain share of dignity is incumbent upon men,
not merely as a means of holding caste, but of
preventing
a downslide in manners and mind. The
hero may properly play at bo-peep with his
children
,
though not at the head of his army; and, by
the same rule, a fair lady may shoot and drive,
play the fiddle, and race horses, to her heart's
content
,
so long as the amusement is confined to the
proper circle. For our own part, we think there
is no more delightful spectacle in the world than
is afforded by a troop of grown-up hoydens,
released
from the heavy trammels of etiquette, and
yielding, in all the confidence of privacy, to the
wild extravagancies of freedom; though a public
display of the kind would, undoubtedly, be any
thing but agreeable. Such were the sentiments of
the painter; and however much the young ladies
may have been mortified at an introduction made
in a way so boisterous and masculine, it is
questionable
whether any other could have caused
them to produce a stronger, or even more
favourable
,
impression on his imagination. Being of a
joyous temperament himself, he rejoiced at the
manifestation of similar spirit in others; and only
regretted that the parentage of the most
admired
(for his prejudice against the name of
Falconer
had been strongly avowed,) should have so
soon driven away the visions of amusement and
delight, that, at the glance of her brilliant eyes,
came rushing through his brain.
He had scarce lost sight of them in the park,
before the road again echoed with the sound of
hoofs; and looking round, he beheld three young
men, very genteely dressed, ride by, and make
their way to the park gate. As they passed the
cottage, they turned their faces towards it,
saluting
the widow by name, and acknowledging the
presence of the stranger by courteous nods. He
perceived, however, that they were somewhat
surprised
,
and not a little diverted, by his appearance
at such a place; for they exchanged smiles, and
by and by, when they had got a little beyond the
brook, they were heard laughing together.
Well done, ye vagabonds, muttered the
good-humoured
youth to himself: never trust me, if I
do not make you more in love with my lodgings
than your own empty skulls, before we are many
VOL. I.D
days older. There
is
some life in Hawk-Hollow,
after all.
He had just succeeded in recalling his attention
to his unfinished sketch, when it was distracted for
the third time by the sudden appearance of a
carriage
,
somewhat old-fashioned and grim, that
rolled
up to the inn at an unusual speed, and was in
the act of passing it, when an old gentleman, whose
head was thrust from the window, caught sight of
Herman, and immediately diverted it from its
course, by roaring out to the coachman, a
venerable
negro,
Holla, you Dick! right about wheel,turn,
halt! and the coach, guided with ready skill,
stopped at the porch-step, almost before the last
word had been pronounced.
Open flew the door, for it was evident the old
gentleman was too impatient to await the tardy
assistance of his servant, and out flew the steps,
unfolding at a kick of his foot, which immediately
followed them. As he thrust himself thus hurriedly
from the vehicle, Herman observed, that besides
his aged appearance, he had another claim to such
duties as a young man could render, in a second
foot, which, instead of displaying any of the
strength and agility of the former, was battered
out of shape by some ancient injury, and was
pendent
to a leg unquestionably infirm and halt.
Seeing
this, the young painter instantly stepped
forward
,
and assisted him to descend; a courtesy
that was acknowledged by a hearty gripe of the
hand, and the exclamation,
Surrender, you dog, or I'll blow your brains
out!And to complete the astonishment of the
young man, he perceived, at the same moment, a
great horse-pistol, which the old gentleman had
whipped out of the vehicle, presented within three
inches of his ear.
Astounded at such an unexpected mode of
salutation
,
the painter could do little more than express
his alarm and confusion, by echoing the word,
Surrender? when Elsie interfered in his behalf,
crying out, For Heaven's sake, Captain Loring!
what are you doing? Do the young gentleman
no harm!
Gentleman!
cried the Captain, somewhat
staggered himself. Adzooks! do you say so?
a gentleman? What! and no cut-throat Gilbert,
hah? By the lord, I thought I had him! Why,
you vagabond young fellow, give an account of
yourself.Who are you? what are you? and how
did you come here? You are a gentleman, hah?
and you have not killed Colonel Falconer, hah?
and you profess yourself to be an honest man, hah!
Why, what will the world come to!
As he spoke, in these abrupt and startling
phrases, Herman had leisure, notwithstanding his
surprise, to observe that he was a comely,
eccentric-looking
old man, with a bottle-shaped nose,
gray eyes, and huge beetle-brows, his whole
countenance
puckered into wrinkles, that seemed to
begin at the tip of his nose, or on his upper lip, as
a common centre, and radiate thence to all parts
of his visage, though they appeared in the greatest
luxuriance on the chin and forehead. His hair was
clubbed, queued, and powdered; and, although he
was evidently battered by time and hard service,
and limped withal very uncouthly on his wounded
leg, a three-cornered hat, and a half-and-half old
military dress, gave him a somewhat heroic
appearance
.
His coat was blue, his breeches buff;
and he had a boot on one leg, and a shoe on the
other,or,to speak more strictly, on the foot
thereof,
that
being incapable of the more manly
decoration. But at the present moment, it was
scarce possible to obtain a just idea of his
appearance
or character, had Herman been cool enough
for the attempt. The violence of his attack upon
one in the act of rendering him a humane courtesy,
indicated that he was somewhat beside himself;
and it was equally plain, from the medley of
expressions
on his visage, agitated at once by
suspicion
,
anxiety, indignation, fury, triumph, and
doubt, that he was in a condition to be replied to
rather with softness than anger. In truth, there
was something so ridiculous in his appearance, as
well as in the circumstance of his own unexpected
arrest, that Herman was no sooner relieved of the
fear of death, by the dropping of the pistol, which
the gallant soldier removed at the remonstrance
of Elsie, than he burst into a laugh, and would
have indulged it freely, had not the Captain cut
him short by exclaiming,
Hark ye, ye grinning cub! is it a thing to
laugh at, when a man's murdered, and you
arrested
on suspicion?
Murdered, Captain! cried the widow, whom
some of his previous ejaculations seemed to have
turned into stone:Murdered, Captain, did you
say? she exclaimed, seizing the soldier by the
arm, and wholly disregarding the presence of the
painter,Richard Falconer murdered at last?
and by a Gilbert, when all that bore the name are
in the grave? Impossible!
Murdered, I tell you, and given over by the
doctors, roared the Captain, and by one of the
cursed Hawk-Hollow Gilberts, if there's any
believing
words out of his own mouth: I have it by
express. And hark ye, you old beldam, if you
have given shelter to the villain, never trust me if
I don't burn you at a stake. Adzooks! was there
ever such a thing dreamed of?Hark ye, sir, I
arrest you on suspicion.
What, sir! on suspicion of murder! cried
Hunter, who had by this time recovered his gravity,
and now spoke with as much dignity as boldness:
If you have any authority to apprehend me, I
am your prisoner, and will accompany you to the
nearest magistrate.This is the most
extraordinary
circumstance in the world; and let me tell
you, sir,but he was interrupted by the widow;
who, still grasping the Captain's arm, although he
strove to cast her off, exclaimed,
Do no rash folly with the young man. Look
at himdoes
he
look like a Gilbert? You are mad
to think it, Captain Loring!
Then, as if satisfied that such argument was
sufficient to acquit her lodger of all suspicion, she
again renewed her questions; and Herman, giving
ear to the Captain, gathered from his broken and
impetuous expressions, that assassination had been
committed, or rather attempted, (for it did not
appear that the victim was dead,) upon the body
of Colonel Falconer, who had been so lately the
subject of his thoughts and conversation,that the
outrage had been perpetrated at, or near, the
metropolis
of the State,that suspicion had fallen
upon a man long esteemed defunct,and that
Captain
Loring, in the fervour of his indignation and
zeal to bring the assassin to justice, being never
very notorious for the wisdom of his actions, had
resolved to seize upon all suspicious persons,
that is to say, all strangers,he might light on,
without much question of his right to do so, until
he had caught the true offender, who, he doubted
not, being a refugee and a Gilbert, would be found
lurking about the Hawk's Hollow. It seemed, that
the suddenness of the intelligence had
overpowered
the veteran's brain, and left him as incapable
of distinguishing the appearances of innocence
from those of guilt, as of understanding the illegal
character of his proceedings; yet, being a man of
D 2
impulses, excitable both in head and heart, his
suspicions
were as easily diverted as inflamed; and,
accordingly, after having come within an ace of
shooting a pistol through the painter's head, his
next act was to seize upon him in the most
affectionate
manner in the world, crying out by way of
apology,
Harkee, younker,adzooks, no ill blood
betwixt
us? When my blood's up, I'm an old fool,
d'ye see. Didn't mean to insult you; and as for
shooting, that's neither here nor there. But when
we're after a deserter, spy, refugee, murderer, or
such dogs, why quick's the word, and `Fall in,
friend,' the order of the day. Must catch the
villain
,
and take account of all skulking fellows
without
the counter-sign. Here's bloody murder in the
wind. The old woman says you are a gentleman:
so, gentleman, as you were! Adzooks, you look
no more like a Gilbert than a mud-terrapin; but
all honest men answer to their nameswhat's
yours?
Hunter,Herman Hunter, replied the young
man; and, if need be, I can easily convince you
that I am no object of suspicion.
Don't doubt it; you've an excellent phys'nomy,
very much like my poor son Tom's, cried the
soldier, now as much struck with the open and
agreeable countenance of the stranger, as he had
been before blinded by his own impetuosity. I
like you! You're a soldier, hah? Where do you
come from?
From South Carolina, said Hunter,
exchanging
the serious mood in which he first submitted
to examination, for one more characteristic of his
humorous temper. He began to understand and
even relish the oddities of the inquisitor; and as
the Captain's questions were now put in a tone
indicative of good will and admiration, and it was
evident his turbulent feelings were giving way
rapidly before others of a new character, he
seemed
disposed not only to endure but to encourage
the ordeal.
From South Carolina? cried the Captain.
Too many tories there by half! But then you
have some men there; yes, sir, some men, whom
I call men! Sumpter, sir, and Marion, sir,why
I call such fellows
men,
sir! I like this
swamp-fighting
,
too; I was brought up to it,took my
first lesson among red Delawares, and ended with
Mingoes and Shawnees. A good tussle at Eutaw,
too, sir, it was, by the lord! exclaimed Captain
Loring, warming into such a blaze of military
ardour at the recollection, that he quite forgot the
object of his delay, and the assassination of his
kinsman into the bargain;a good tussle, (
without
saying any thing of my friend Morgan's
rub-a-dub-dub
at the Cowpens,)a good tussle! And
such glorious weather, too, when a man could
fight and keep cool! Now I remember, that, at
the fatal field of Braddock, ninth July, '55, it was
the hottest work, what with the weather, what
with the savages, what with the stupid cockney
red-coats, that man ever saw,an oven above,
and a furnace all round; it was all blood and
sweat, sir!the wounded were boiled in their
own gore. It was a day, sir, to make a man a
man, sir,it taught me to smell gun-powder! It
was there, sir, I first looked in the face of George
Washington,a poor colonial buck-skin colonel
then, but now, adzooks, the greatest man the world
ever saw! Harkee, sir, have you served? have you
smelt powder? have you heard a trumpet? have
you ever fought a battle?
Certainly, sir, replied the young man, with
humour; I have inflicted bloody-noses, and
received
them. I was quite a Hector at school;
and, so long as you stop short of killing, I am a
Hector yet. But I never could find any appetite
in me for bullets and broad-swords; and as for a
bayonet, I think it the most inhuman weapon in
the world. Noble Captain, I am a non-combatant,
a man of peace.
Hah! cried the Captain, indignantly; and
how comes that? An able-bodied man, with your
bleeding country calling on you, and no fight in
you? Sir, let me tell you, sir, such a pair of legs
should have been devoted to the service of your
country, sir! Look you, sir, my son Tom Loring
was only eighteen years old, when he fought his
battle on the Brandywine; and a whole year
before
,
he was ripe for a rub, as he often told me.
How comes it, sir, you have grown out of your
teens, and never faced an enemy? Zounds, sir, I
was beginning to have a good opinion of you!
There is no accounting for it, Captain,
except
Hark ye, Mr. What-d'ye-call-it, said the
soldier
,
the good feelings with which he was
beginning
to regard the youth, giving place at once to
contempt and indignation, there is every thing in
having the right sort of blood for these things, and
you have no blood at all. I despise you, sir, and,
adzooks, I believe you are some suspicious person
after all, and very contemptible, for all of your red
jacket.Holloa, Dick, there! help me into the
carriage.
And thus venting his disgust, and preparing to
put the seal to his displeasure by instant departure,
the young man was on the point of losing a friend
so suddenly won, when, fortunately for him, the
Captain's eye fell upon the little table with the
drawing materials, which he had not before
observed
,
and walking up to it, he began, without a
moment's hesitation, to examine the unfinished
sketch. The effect was instantaneous; the
spectacle
of his own dwelling, transferred, with not a
little skill, to paper, though only in light lead
marks, and so accurately that he instantly
detected
(as appeared to him wonderful enough) the
windows of his own sleeping apartment, threw
him into such transports, that he seemed on the
point of dancing for joy, as he would perhaps
have done, had it not been for the infirmity of his
extremity.
Lord bless us! said he, here's the Folly! the
identical old Folly, with the grape-vine, the
stables
,
the negro-houses, the locust grove, the three
tulip-trees, the pot in the chimney, and the old
martin-house on a pole! And here's my two
negroes
,
Dick and Sam, at the gate, driving the cows
out of the park
No, Captain, said Herman, with a painter's
dignity; those are the two young ladies; and I
flatter myself, when I have done a little more to
them
My girls? cried the Captain, in a rapture;
why, so they are! And
you
did this? and you're
a painter, hah?
A sort of one, as you see, Captain, replied
the youth, with an air.
A painter! cried the Captain, grasping his
hand, with delight. Can you paint a soldier,
hah?
Ay, replied the youth, if he'll hold still long
enough.
And cannon, and horses, and smoke, and trees,
and a dreadful splutter of blood and dead men,
hah? Then, by the lord, you shall paint me the
Fatal Field of Braddock, with the red-coats and
the continentals, the savages and the Frenchmen,
and Braddock, lugged off on men's shoulders,
and George Washington rallying the colony-boys
for another charge on the red-skins! What a
picture that will make!I'll tell you what, Mr.
Harkem What-d'-ye-call-it, you shall come to my
house, drink and be merry, and then you shall
paint me that picture. You shall paint me the
battle
of Brandywine, too, with my poor Tom Loring
bleeding to death, like a hero, as he was: and hark
ye, you may bring
me
in, too, holding him on my
knee,for I did it,and telling him to die like a
man,for an old fool, as I was, to think he could
die like any thing else! And stick in my girl, too,
if you can, weeping and wringing her hands, when
I carried Tom Loring home that day. And
remember
the bugles and trumpets, blasting up for the
charge of cavalry; you should have heard them
sweeping by, just as Tom was dying.It was the
finest sound in nature! continued the Captain,
vehemently, and as he spoke, dashing a tear from
his eye; the finest music ever heard; as Tom
acknowledged himself: `Father!' said he, as he
bled in my arms, `it is not hard to die to such
music, for I hear our own trumpets among the
others!' And so died Tom Loring; he went to
heaven amid thunder and trumpets; and if I had
seven sons more, I should wish nothing better for
them, than that they might go to heaven the same
way,I would, by the lord! For why? there's no
way that's better!
There was something in this eccentric burst of
ardour, which, however ludicrous it seemed,
touched
some of the finer feelings of the painter, and
checked the laugh which he could scarce repress,
when the Captain began his energetic instructions.
Not being disposed to accept a commission so
capriciously proffered, or to undertake a
composition
,
in which, it was evident, if he hoped to please
his employer, he must mingle together as many
different scenes and actions as would furnish
subjects
for a whole gallery, and desiring to temper
his refusal to the peculiarities of his patron, he
was puzzling himself in what way to express it,
when his good-fortune sent him aid in the person
of another stranger, who, as the capricious stars
would have it, designed, like himself, to make trial
of the accommodations of the Traveller's Rest.
CHAPTER IV.
1
st Friar
.
No doubt, brother, but this proceedeth of the Spirit?
2
d Friar
.
Ay, and of a moving spirit, too; but come,
Let us intreat he may be entertain'd.
Marlow
The Jew of Malta
.
As the Captain concluded his eccentric oration,
rather from want of breath than because he
lacked
the will to continue it, a sonorous voice, very
manly and agreeable, save that it had a strong
nasal twang, was heard pronouncing hard by,
with solemn emphasis, the words from the
Apocalypse
,
`And I looked, and behold, a pale horse: and
his name that sat on him was Death, and hell
followed
with him. And power was given unto them
over the fourth part of the earth, to kill with the
sword, and with hunger, and with death, and with
the beasts of the earth.'
Startled at an interruption so unexpected, both
looked round at the first sound of the voice, and
even Elsie Bell woke from the trance into which
the Captain's news had plunged her, to gaze as
eagerly as the others after the cause. As they
directed their eyes towards the entrance of the
little oak-shaded yard, they saw, turning into it
from the road, and slowly riding towards them,
an apparition that might almost have been
supposed
by a profane imagination to imbody the
conception of the grisly terror. It was a tall man
in black raiment, riding an old gray horse, very
meager and raw-boned, which moved with a step
so slow and drowsy, as to oppose no obstruction
to the meditations of the rider, who held a book in
his hand, from which he read the words that
followed
so ominously after the burst of the Captain.
He seemed so inwrapt in his study as to be
unconscious
of the presence of strangers, having
apparently yielded up the guidance of his course
to the animal he bestrode; and as he drew nigh to
the porch, still pronouncing the words, the first
one of which had attracted their attention, all had
an opportunity of gazing on him at leisure. He
was a tall man, as has been said, being somewhat
gaunt and thin in the lower part of his body, though
his shoulders were broad and square. His joints
were large and bony, and his hands and feet were
any thing in the world but fairy-like. His neck
was long and scraggy, his face of a cadaverous
hue and lantern-jawed, and long locks of straight
black hair, a little grizzled, fell from beneath an
old cocked-hat, the brim of which was inclined to
go slouching along with them, towards his
shoulders
.
His coat was of black velvet, worn and
soiled, and indeed extremely shabby, and so long,
that, as he rode, the wide skirts almost concealed
his saddle-bags and flapped about his heels; the
collar was straight and short, and its place was
supplied
by a red bandanna handkerchief, which was
twisted round his throat in a thong like a cable.
He continued to read aloud, until his horse
suddenly
paused before the porch; then lifting up his
eyes, and closing the book, he bestowed a gracious
stare upon the party, that had well nigh converted
the painter's admiration into merriment, it was so
extravagantly grave and sanctimonious. It
dispelled
also some of the reverence with which the
soldier was beginning to regard him; and
recurring
suddenly to the objects which had brought
him to the Traveller's Rest, Captain Loring
hobbled
VOL. I.E
up to the saintly apparition, advanced his
hand to seize upon the bridle rein, and was just
saluting him with a Harkee, Mister, whoever
you are,being a stranger, you must give an
account
of yourself,when the worthy personage,
rolling his eyes once more over the party, and
then directing them to heaven, opened his mouth,
and again lifted up his voice.
Fellow sinners! said he, with as much zeal as
emphasis, seeming to consider that he had found
a congregation in great need of his exhortations,
you have heard the words of the book: `And I
looked, and behold, a pale horse; and his name
that sat on him was Death, and hell followed with
him.' Death comes on the pale horse, and hell
follows
at his heels! Listen to what I have to say,
and let your souls that are a-hungering, open their
mouths and be satisfied. He that has ears to
hear
Is an ass! cried Captain Loring, interrupting
him without ceremony. Come, you fanatical
fool, none of your babble and sermonizing here of
a week-day; but answer my questions.
Will you rail upon the Lord's anointed? will
you do violence to my holy vocation? cried the
preacher, hotly. Get thee behind me, Satan! If
thou wilt not profit by the unction of truth, shut
thy mouth and get thee away, that others may not
backslide after thee. Anathema upon thee!
anathema
baranathema! If thou stoppest the flood of
the sweet waters that are ready to fall upon the
thirsty-spirited, I say to thee, Anathema! Lo and
behold! I am sent upon a mission, and the spirit
waxes strong within me, so that I will wrestle with
thee and prevail. Am not I he that is sent to
scatter
the good seed by the way-side? and art thou
not a bush of thorns, that chokes up the grain ere
it reaches the soil, or the rock that has no soil to
receive it? I will preach the devil out of thee, I
warrant thee, thou most antique sinner; for what
says the word
Harkee, friend methodist, or whatever you
are, said Captain Loring, not a whit abashed by
the violent zeal with which the fanatic prolonged
this remonstrance, it is not in my way to insult
the cloth, all chaplains being non-combatants.
But, hark ye, sir, adzooks, I don't believe you are
a preacher at all, but a rogue in another man's
feathers; and if you don't satisfy my mind, I will
arrest you on suspicion of being a rascal, I will by
the lord! and that's as true as any Scripture.
And do you, you Harper What-d'ye-call-it, (
turning
to the painter,) hand me my pistol, and hold
him by the leg; and you, Dick! club your whip,
and stand by to knock him off his horse; and you,
Elsie, come forward for a witness; for I believe
the dog's a Gilbert. Surrender, you villain, and
give an account of yourself!
Great was the confusion of the exhorting
stranger
,
at finding he had lighted upon a zealot, of fire
so much superior to his own, and a congregation
so little disposed to bow down to his ministry; and
great was the inclination of Herman Hunter to
enjoy
a rencounter betwixt two such antagonists, and
even to add to its absurdities, by taking part with
the Captain against a man who, whatever was his
apparent sanctity, he was persuaded, was nothing
more than a low and vulgar hypocrite.
However
,
perceiving that the latter worthy, besides
being greatly alarmed, was clubbing his bible as if
weighing the propriety of employing all its
arguments
and exhortations together, in one fell swoop
against the head of his irreligious captor, his
humanity and love of peace drove the young man
betwixt the eccentric pair, as a moderator and
umpire.
Stop, Captain, said he; this mode of
questioning
is against the law; and you, reverend
stranger, hearken to me. Being a man of religion
and peace, and doubtless good sense and good
manners, you can do nothing more than answer a
civil question; which will save you the trouble of a
ride, or drive, according to circumstances, to the
nearest magistrate.
Magistrate! cried the preacher, blankly,
what have the servants of truth to do with a
magistrate?
Yes, magistrate, blustered the soldier; and
then, adzooks, perhaps to the hangman
afterwards
.
In a word, sir, said Herman, there has been
a murder attempted; though where, when, and
how, I do not pretend to know; and this being a
land where suspicion is somewhat capricious and
even whimsical, you will see the necessity of
doing as I myself have done but a moment before
you;that is, of declaring your name and
business
to this gentleman.
Name, gentlemen! business, gentlemen!
Certainly
,
gentlemen,certainly, fellow christians and
sinners! cried the preacher, recovering his
equanimity
,
which had somewhat deserted him, and
becoming
ten times more nasal and sanctified than
before. I am a poor servant of the word, an
expounder of the book, Nehemiah by name,
which is to say, Nehemiah Poke,an humble
labourer in the vineyard of sinthat is to say,
of righteousnessand a warner and crier-out on
the way-side, by the side of the great road that
leadeth to the place of despair, and of wailing, and
of gnashing of teeth. You put your scorns upon
me, men of the world, and sons of a stiff-necked
generation; you spit in my face, you strike me
over the mouth, and you take me by the beard,
crying, `Get up, you bald-head.' But
he
will
reckon with you, who goeth about like a roaring
lion, seeking whom he may devour. Open
therefore
your ears, and repent you, lest he who comes
on the pale horse, with hell after him, shall fall
upon you in your pride, and twist your necks, as
you twist off a quid of tobacco from the roll. I
come to the house of the good widow, for such, say
the men of the world, is the widow Bell. I design
to eat and refresh me with sleep; and then
crossing
over the river that lies in my path, wend my
way to the scorners of truth, that are thick among
the men of blood in the army; for among them,
Death on the pale horse is ever ramping and
roaring. But I see, that wickedness is here, even
here, in this `desert idle,' as it is written: I will
therefore tarry awhile, and expound to you the
words of comfort, and that before I eat and sleep,
lest you fall and perish before the morning. Rest
a moment then, irreverent and headstrong old
man, and I will wrestle with the devil that is in
thee. For I forgive thee, and will arouse thee with
an exhortation, strong and fiery, `fierce as ten
furies
,
terrible as night,' according to the expression.
Listen, therefore, to the words of my text: `And
I looked, and behold.'And behold! the sinner
rolleth away in his pride, rejecting the word! But
he of the pale horse runneth after, even in the dust
of his chariot wheels, shaking destruction from his
shoulders, even as `dew-drops from the lion's
mane,' as it is written. Young man, give me thy
hand, that I may descend; and widow, peace be to
thy house, and comfort in the midst of thy poverty.
He who tempers the wind to the shorn lamb, as
the word has it, and marks even when a sparrow
falls to the ground, will not turn from thine humble
tenement, when its door is open to the weary
pilgrim
,
E 2
and its porch resounds with the cry of
prayer and thanksgiving.
Mr. Nehemiah Poke, said Herman, who
gave his hand, as required, to the pilgrim, and
assisted him to descend, you perceive, that your
exhortations have driven away one-third of the
congregation.Captain Loring had been fully
satisfied with the explanations of Mr. Poke, or
alarmed at the prospect of a sermon; and while
the preacher was kindling into fervour, had
suddenly
slipped into the carriage, and in a moment
rumbled furiously away.You perceive that
your sanctity has driven away one auditor, and
confounded another,Mrs. Bell here being in a
maze. Now know, likewise, that I, the remaining
third, have no need of your edifying discourses,
and request you to put an end to them.
This was said with a good-natured smile, and a
knowing nod, which somewhat disconcerted the
preacher. However, after staring at the youth
awhile, he lifted up his eyes, hands, and voice
together, saying,
Are you a scorner of the word, then, in your
early and tender youth? and will you shut your
ears and harden your heart against the grace that
is offered, even by my unworthy lips!
Even against all that can come from your
unworthy
lips, as you very properly term them,
said the painter, with the most significant
countenance
in the world; and to make you easy on
that score, do me the favour to believe that I have
studied Milton, Shakspeare, Sterne, and the Bible,
so much more closely than yourself, that I never
jumble them together, nor fail to perceive when
another man does so. Do you understand me?
Truly not, said the preacher, with a
somewhat
humorous stare; but out of the mouths of
babes and sucklings we are sometimes wisely
admonished
.
I perceive, that I have fallen among
thievesthat is to say, among sinners; and that
they are none the better, but much the worse, for
any comfortable wisdom that is offered them.
Therefore, I will hold my peace, lest the devil
should be aggravated in your bosom; hoping that
a better hour may be shown me, in which to warn
you of the wickedness of your ways, and so pluck
you as a brand out of the burning. Good woman,
he continued, turning to Elsie, and speaking much
better sense than before, know, that by reason
of thy poverty and widowhood, I have brought me
lucre of silver and paperthat is to say, dollars
both hard and softto reward thee for thy
hospitality
;
and that I come, not like a thief and a man
of war, to prey upon thy substance, and leave thee
nothing in return; but as a guest, in the worldly
sense, who will pay scot and lot, as the word is,
without grumbling.
Such as I have, you shall share, said Elsie,
coldly, whether you have gold or not, provided
you will take the young gentleman's advice, and
exhort no longer in my house.
Woman, said Nehemiah, let me not think
that a devil has seized upon you, as well as the
others. Shall wisdom cry aloud, not in the streets
but at your house-door, and you regard it no more
than the scoffers? I tell you, and I charge you
to hear
Softly, Mr. Poke, said Herman.
Remember
your promise to hold your peace. That scrap
from Sir John, though it smacks of a better origin,
is of as clear an one as the others. Read your
Bible, man, for a day or two more, and learn your
trade better.
Young man, said the preacher, again
somewhat
abashed, but with a stern voice, you talk
like one of the ignorant
Groundlings! said the other, laying a
ludicrous
stress upon the word.  `Thy face is
valanced since I saw thee last!'Does that come
out of Habakkuk? If you will preach, why here
fate sends you another auditor, in the form of
another
patron to the Traveller's Rest! As for
myself
,
I am tired not only of your homilies, but your
company; and I pray you, for our own two sakes,
that you cross the river before supper. The
sooner the better, I assure you; for though at
present the `rack' may `stand still,' `the bold
wind' be
`Speechless, and the orb below
As hush as death; anon the dreadful thunder
Will rend the region,'
and scatter Jackdaws, along with the owls and
pigeons. Fare you well, `Sir Topas, the Curate!'
`I am one of those gentle ones that will use the
devil himself with courtesy'I leave you to the
pedler there, who may be of a better temper for
conversation. `
Bones dies,
Sir Topas!'
And with these words, and laughing heartily, as
at some jest perfectly well understood by
Nehemiah
,
he left the porch, only looking once behind
him, as the preacher stood regarding him with
uplifted
hands, and bursting into a second peal as he
looked. He raised his eyes, nodding courteously
to the new comer, whom he had justly
characterized
as a pedlerfor so he seemed, having a pack
strapped to his back, though riding a strong black
horse. Good luck for poor Elsie to-day! he
muttered to himself, as if even diverted by so slight
a circumstance as the unusual windfall of
patronage
.
I thought I could not be mistaken in the
rogue's lantern-jaws and huge hands; and I doubt
me, his religion is a mere cloak, put on for a
purpose
;
though I
have
heard of such conversions
before. However, honest or not, a fool or a
scoundrel
,
a saint or a hypocrite, it is certain he can do
me no mischief; and I'll see he does none to Elsie.
As for others, they must take their chances.
Thus reflecting, and amusing himself with his
cogitations, he made his way, though apparently
without design or object, along the road, until he
had passed the park-gate of Gilbert's Folly, and
reached the rivulet described before, as emptying
into the river at the mouth of the ravine, on which
the Traveller's Rest was built. Although shallow
and of a smooth bottom, where it crossed the road,
there were rocks lying in its bed both above and
below; and he could hear a murmuring noise
among the trees that overshadowed it above, as if
it made a cascade at no great distance in that
direction
.
He had no doubt that, by leaving the
road, he was trespassing upon the manor; but
having no fear of intruding upon the haunts of any
of its habitants, and being moved by a painter's
curiosity, he did not hesitate to clamber over the
rude stone wall, and dive at once into the shadowy
grove bordering the stream.
CHAPTER V.
To arched walks of twilight groves,
And shadows brown, that Sylvan loves,
Of pine, or monumental oak,
Where the rude axe, with heaved stroke,
Was never heard the nymphs to daunt,
Or fright them from their hallow'd haunt.
Il Penseroso.
Meanwhile,
the fair jockeys, after being
repulsed
from the highway, had betaken themselves
to the park, where they galloped about for awhile,
expecting the Captain. As they looked back ever
and anon upon the road, they caught sight of the
three young men, whom Hunter had seen pass the
Traveller's Rest but a short time after the ladies
themselves.
Was ever any thing more provoking! cried
Miss Falconer. Those three rural coxcombs,
the doctor and the two lawyers! Will no one
have the humanity to break a leg, or his
neighbour's
bones, so as to afford
them
some
employment
,
and
us
a little peace and quiet? Must we
be ever afflicted with their admiration and
homage
?
It is more than a misfortune to be a fine
woman in the country, where merit, as the old
villanous
poet says of female attraction in general,
`In its narrow circle gathers,
Nothing but chaff, and straw, and feathers.'
But we will escape them, if it be only for an hour.
Down, Kate! down, ere they have seen you!
Whip your filly, and I warrant me, she will find
her way to the stable. We will hide in the woods,
as I think we have done before from the same
fellows.
Laughing heartily at a device that spoke so little
in favour of the attractive qualities of the village
beaux, the Captain's daughter leaped lightly from
her palfrey, as Miss Falconer had done before
her; and both flourishing their whips at the same
time, the liberated animals fled towards the
buildings
,
whilst their riders lost not a moment in
burying themselves from sight, by plunging into
a grove, from which they continued to ramble,
until they had reached a little brook, as wild and
merry as themselves, that gushed over a remote
corner of the park, and then hid its gleaming
waters in a hollow, overgrown with forest-trees.
Into this dell they made their way, following the
brook, until it fell into a larger streamlet, which was
indeed no other than Hawk-Hollow Run, so often
mentioned before. Its banks were strown with huge
masses of rock, gray and mossy, through which the
waters, swollen by late rains, rushed with impetuous
speed, and sometimes with great noise and fury,
while its murmurs were rendered yet more
impressively
sonorous by the hollow reverberations of the
forest. Proceeding farther, the woods, which now
invested the hills on either bank, and the rocks,
assumed a sterner character of wildness and
grandeur
.
Hemlocks, and other gloomy trees, with
here a rugged maple, or ghostly beech, and there
a gibbous oak, springing from interstices of the
rocks, seemed, with their knotted and contorted
roots, to bind the fragments together; while their
thick and arched boughs flung over these ruins of
nature a chilly and everlasting gloom. Aloft, on
the hill, the grape-vine swung its massy locks from
the oak, and, in the lower depths of the ravine, for
such it was, the swamp-honeysuckle shook its
fragrant
clusters, and green dodders rose on the
stump of the decaying birch. When their path
had conducted the fair wanderers beyond the
immediate
vicinity of the falls and rapids, these
exchanged
their murmurs for other sounds not less
agreeable. The chattering of jays, the
lonely-sounding
whistle of the wood-robin, the cry of a
startled dove, and now and then the sudden whir
of a pheasant, starting from his lair under a fallen
trunk, and bustling noisily out of sight,the small
uproar of young rabbits, bouncing out of a brier
or a bush of ferns, and galloping away up the hill,
the dropping of half-eaten nuts from the paw of
the retreating squirrel, and a dozen other such
noises as invade the solitude of the forest, here
added a double loneliness and charm to a scene
long since a favourite with the maidens.
Now are we safe, cried Miss Falconer, with
exultation; for no one having seen us take this
course, our admirers, were they even spirited
enough to pursue, would think of twenty more
reasonable places to seek us in than this. But let
us make assurance doubly sure. Don't tell me
you are tiredwhat business has a country-wench
to be tired? We will go down to the sycamore,
and then rest us awhile, till the sun peeps red in
the hollow. I will bring you to your confession;
for, having failed in my precious designs upon the
old witch there, (may Monsieur Red-jacket sleep
harder to-night than he ever did before, for a
Marplot
!)
and my curiosity being so much the more
inflammable, I am resolved to learn what I can, and
that without ceremony. So come along, Kate,
`Kate of my consolation,
`Kate of Kate-hall, my super-dainty Kate,'
as the bear of Verona said of your amiable
name-sake
;
all that you have now to do, is to be, like
her, `Kate conformable.'
Thus whiling away the fatigue of climbing over
rocks and creeping through thickets, with a gay
rattle of discourse, the black-eyed maiden dragged
her companion along, until they reached a place
where the stream was contracted by the
projection
,
on the one bank, of a huge mass of slaty
rock, and, on the other, by the protrusion of the
roots of a gigantic plane-tree,the sycamore,
or buttonwood, of vulgar speech. Above them,
and beyond the crag, the channel of the rivulet
widened into a pool; and there was a plot of
green turf betwixt the water and the hill, on the
farther bank, whereon fairies, if such had ever
made their way to the World of Twilight, might
have loved to gambol under the light of the moon.
A hill shut up the glen at its upper extremity; and
it was hemmed in, on the left, by the rocky and
wooded declivity, over which the maidens had
already passed. Over this, and just behind a black
rounded shoulder that it thrust into the glen, a
broad ray from the evening sun shot across the
stream, and fell, in a rich yellow flood, over the
vacant plot. There was something almost
Arcadian
in this little solitude; and if, instead of two
well-bred maidens perched upon the roots of the
sycamore, on seats chosen with a due regard to
the claims of their dresses, there had been a batch
of country girls romping in the water, a passing
Acton might have dreamed of the piny
Gargaphy
,
its running well,
fons tenui perlucidus unda
and the bright creatures of the mythic day, that
once animated the waters of that solitary grot.
But the fairy and the wood-nymph are alike
unknown
in America. Poetic illusion has not yet
consecrated her glens and fountains; her forests
nod in uninvaded gloom, her rivers roll in
unsanctified
VOL. I.F
silence, and even her ridgy mountains lift up
their blue tops in unphantomed solitude.
Association
sleeps, or it reverts only to the vague
mysteries
of speculation. Perhaps
A restless Indian queen,
Pale Marian with the braided hair,
may wander at night by some highly-favoured
spring; perhaps some tall and tawny hunter,
In vestments for the chase array'd,
may yet hunt the hart over certain distinguished
ridges, or urge his barken canoe over some
cypressfringed
pool; but all other places are left to the
fancies of the utilitarian. A Greek would have
invented a god, to dwell under the watery arch of
Niagara; an American is satisfied with a
paper-mill
,
clapped just above it.
The fair ladies of Hawk-Hollow were no more
troubled with the absence of poetic association in
their lovely retreat, than any of their countrymen
would have been; as was plainly shown by the
first words pronounced by Miss Falconer, after
taking possession of a sort of arm-chair among the
sycamore roots.
This is a place, my mannikin, said she,
bending
her head majestically towards her kinswoman,
whose seat was not so elevated,this is a place
where one may think comfortably of murdering,
whooping, scalping, and such sort of matters; and
its solemnity will therefore give a degree of point
to the story. Come, begin; I am all earsthat
is, metaphorically speaking; though a viler
metaphor
,
to come from men of rational imagination,
could not have been invented. I tell you, Kate,
I am dying with curiosity about these terrible
Hawks; and as I know, you know
something
I
am determined you shall resuscitate me, in lack
of a better physician, with such information as you
have. No excusesI know them all by heart, you
have repeated them over so often. I declare upon
my jockey-like word, that here I sit, as fixed as
the very roots around me, and as immoveable;
and here I
will
sit, until you surrender your
scruples
,
and open your mouth, though I should remain
until washed away by the next fresh. I am
positive
;
my will is as inflexible as the laws of the
Medes and Persians.
You have mistaken me, Harriet, said the
other, bending her eyes upon the stream; I know
nothing of the matter.That I have heard many
idle whispers, hints, and innuendoes, is true; but
there is neither wisdom nor propriety in repeating
them, particularly to
you
.But is not this the most
charming place in the world? Do you know, I
have determined upon the spot I am to be buried
in? It is further up the river, where three
lime-trees
grow together; behind them is a rock,
covered
with laurels, wild roses, and columbines;
and there is such an array of azaleas below, with
blood-roots, and wind-flowers, and dogwood, as has
half-turned my brain. Can you tell me, Hal, why
I should be ever thinking of a grave, when I
stumble upon such pretty places? It is always the
first thought.
As Catherine spoke, she turned her eyes with
much simplicity and earnestness of expression,
upon her companion's face; and though it was
evident, she had introduced the subject, for the
purpose of diverting the conversation from the
channel in which Miss Falconer desired to have it
flow, it was equally plain, that it had already taken
hold upon her imagination, and now occupied her
mind alone. As she looked up, with such a
thought at her bosom, it imparted a character of
melancholy to her countenance, which, although
not her natural and original expression,
circumstances
had made, of late, much more common
than any other. Her face was the sweetest oval
in the world, her features very regular and pretty,
the hue of her complexion less brilliant than might
have been expected in one with such light locks,
but of a pleasant healthy tone, and her eyes,
without
being bright or striking, were so singularly
earnest of expression, with a certain vague
anxiety
,
or imploringness, mingled up with every look,
as to seldom fail of interesting the feelings of the
beholder in her favour. Besides, her brow, from
which the hair was parted in the simplest and
easiest manner, was particularly smooth and
beautiful
;
and whatever might have been the depth of
her melancholy, this noble feature lost nothing of
its serenity. Indeed, when sadness dwelt upon
her spirit, it seldom produced a change in any
part of the countenance except the eyes; and it
was in these alone, at the present moment, that
emotion was betrayed by the change from the
merry brightness which the events of the afternoon
had thrown into them, to that appealing, anxious
expression, already described. It must be added
to this description that her voice was, if possible,
even more strikingly expressive than her eyes. It
was with her as with the Faerie Queene; always,
When she spake,
Sweete wordes, like dropping honny, she did shed;
And 'twixt the perles and rubins softly brake
A silver sound:
every exertion was characterized by some
appropriate
and harmonious change; her joyous spirits
broke out with such sweet and jocund sounds as
come from tinkling bells; and when sadness was
at her heart, her accents were such murmurs of
subdued and contagious melancholy as the
wood-pigeon
breathes from the depths of the forest.
Do I know
why?
said Miss Falconer, looking
down upon her with a mischievous air, and
humming
instantly,
`The poor soul sat sying by a sycamore-tree,
Sing all a green willow;
Her hand on her bosom, her head on her knee,
Sing willow, willow, willow.'
But pr'ythee, be comforted; this is the way with
all young ladies who have hair-brained
sweet-hearts
.
But I assure you, he we wot of is the
best, truest, and most amiable creature in the
world; and if he be a little wild, why all men are
so, you know.
At these allusions, which were evidently
unexpected
,
Miss Loring blushed, then turned very
pale; and finally, while Harriet drew breath, as
if to continue the subject, she said, recurring
abruptly to the original topic of discourse, and in
a hurried manner,
If you insist I should tell you what I have
heard, I must obey. The story is singular and
melancholy,melancholy under every aspect, but
doubly so, if that be true which I know you are
most anxious to learn. But, Harriet, I cannot tell
you
all
. What concerns the Gilberts alone I am
ready to relate; but that which involves the
connexion
between,that is to sayHarriet! cried
the young lady, after pausing with embarrassment,
it does not become a daughter to listen to
aspersions
cast upon the good name of a parent!
It does not, said Miss Falconer, gravely,
when they are breathed by the lips of an enemy.
But fear not, I will not eat you. I do not ask you
to repeat slanders, but to inform me what slanders
are repeated by others. You might have added,
it did not become me to pry into my father's
secrets
;
but as his child, his daughterI would to
heaven I could say his son!it is fitting I should
at least know from what to defend him. I tell you,
Kate, I have this thing much at heart. Fear not to
shock me by your relations; for, not being disposed
to believe them, I shall not be grieved, except at
discovering how extensive may be the malignity
of our foes. I shall rest more sweetly on my
pillow
to-night, if I go not to sleep on suspicion.
Begin, therefore, Kate, and scruple not to speak
boldly.
CHAPTER VI.
For us, we do approve the Roman maxim,
To save one citizen is a greater prize,
Than to have killed, in war, ten enemies.
Massinger
The Guardian
.
Blow, blow, thou winterr wind,
Thou art not so unkind
As man's ingratitude.
Freeze, freeze, thou bitter sky,
Thou dost not bite so nigh,
As benefits forgot.
As You Like It
.
You know then, I presume, said Catherine,
beginning her narrative, ominously, with a sigh,
you know, I suppose, all about old Mr. Gilbert,
and his
My dear creature, said Miss Falconer, I
know no more of Mr. Gilbert than the Grand
Turk; and all that I can boast of knowledge in
relation to his cut-throat children, is that they
were the Hawks of Hawk-Hollow; but whether
they were real kites, with claws and feathers, or
only the philosopher's two-legged birds, human
chanticleers, I could never yet determine. My
father is not always so communicative as might
be expected in a dutiful parent; and, once or
twice, when I have been curious to come at some
of his early exploits on the frontiers, (for they say
he was a great Indian-fighter,) he has not
hesitated
to assume a severe countenance, and scold
me in the most paternal manner imaginable. Nay,
my dear, he once assured me that, as it became a
woman rather to garnish the outside of her head
than the interior, I would do well never to trouble
myself by searching after information that could
not make me a whit more handsome. I bowed
my head at the reproof, and ran straightway to
my brother. But Harry, poor fellow, knew no
more about these matters than he cared,that is,
nothing. Ah! he is a jewel of a man, and will
make the best husband in the world, having
nothing
of the meddler about him. I have often
thought, if pa were to commit a murder, or even
break his neck, Harry would not trouble himself
with either wonder or lamentation; and this, not
from any want of affection, but simply because he
would consider the thing his father's affair, not
his. A good easy temper is an excellent thing in
men,as excellent indeed as the `voice soft,
gentle
,
and low,' in woman. So, now, you perceive
the necessity of beginning just where your story
begins. Take up the father,the grandfather, if
you choose,of this savage brood; give me their
genealogy, if they have any, and if it be german
to the matter; draw all sorts of parallels, make all
kinds of reflections, and, in fine, do and say any
thing you may think proper,only conceal
nothing
.
My curiosity is as capacious of appetite
as the Moor's revenge, (so much for ruralizing,
when one must kill time with Shakspeare!) and
demands that its gratification should be as
complete
.
Thus adjured and instructed, Miss Loring began
the narration of Gilbert's story, and the description
of his family, as they have been already recorded;
into both which, however, she entered in greater
detail than it was thought necessary to attempt.
The first part of the history, which was without
melancholy, and related chiefly to the dilemmas
into which the founder of Hawk-Hollow Hall was
thrown by the sudden accession of wealth, and his
vain struggles to refine the character of his
children
,
long since determined by early habits upon
rude and adventurous lives, Miss Loring,
naturally
a merry and waggish maiden, with strong
talents
for mimicry, delivered in a manner that soon
became humorous, and, at last, highly diverting;
so that the hollow forest began to peal with the
approving merriment of her companion. Her
benevolence
to the poor widow had so opened Elsie's
heart, that she had cast aside most of the reserve
with which she was accustomed to speak of the
Gilberts; and, in consequence, Catherine was
provided
with an ample store of anecdotes,
illustrative
of their characters and habits, with which she
now amused her friend. She related with what
surprise the good Elsie, one autumn evening, (while
Mr. Gilbert was yet in England with his whole
family,) beheld the adventurous Oran, in ragged
attire, and with a bundle at his back, come
trudging
up to the Traveller's Rest, looking as bold and
resolute, to use her own whimsical illustrations, as
a soldier marching up to the mouth of an empty
cannon, or a militia-man returning from a
campaign
without battles; and she even mimicked,
with voice, gesture, and looks, the appearance
and bearing of the two friends, in the dialogue that
followed as soon as the truant was recognized by
the widow.
`Heaven bless us!' said Elsie, with uplifted
hands, `is that
you,
Oran Gilbert?' Thus her
story went on:  `What a foolish question!'
muttered
the hero of two lustres and a half, who had
never affected much of the dulcet submissiveness
of a child to any one, either in word or action;
`what a foolish question for you, goody Elsie!
Here I am in Pennsylvany, and hungry, I reckon!'
and with that, without waiting for invitation, he
plumped himself down at the table, already set out
for the widow's evening meal, and straightway
fell to work with a zeal and industry that showed
he had not mistaken the condition of his appetite.
The widow regarded him with undiminished
astonishment
,
crying out, for she feared lest some
dreadful accident, by shipwreck or otherwise, had
destroyed the rest, `But your father and brothers,
Oran,where are
they?
' `In Bristol,' mumbled
the boy, scowling at her over a bone, but still
making the most of it,`in Bristol,that is, the
big English Bristol, and not our Pennsylvany town,
down the river.' `In Bristol,' echoed Elsie Bell;
`and what are you doing here without them?'
`Why, eating my supper, don't you see?' replied
the juvenal. `And how did you get here?'
demanded
Elsie. `I came in a big ship to
Philadelphy
,'
replied the boy, scarce intermitting his
agreeable
employment for a moment, `and then, to be
sure, I footed it.' `You have run away from your
father, Oran?' said Elsie. `Yes, I have,' said the
boy, grumly; `let me eat my supper, and I'll tell
you all about it.'
The widow held her peace for awhile, until the
lad had satisfied his ravenous appetite; and then,
assuming a friendly and coaxing air, for well she
knew nothing else would have any effect on that
singular young reprobate, she drew from him a
confession of his whole adventure, and the causes
that led to it.
It appeared, that, besides an extraordinary
attachment to his native home among the wild
woods, Oran had another cause to be discontented
with his residence in England; and this he
discovered
in the public school, to which he was sent
with his brother next in age, called Hyland.
`He sent me,' said Oran, expatiating upon the
barbarity of his father, `to a school, to learn
grammar, and Latin, and reading and writing, and
all that sort of thing!'For you must know, said
Catherine, speaking to her friend, that the want
of a teacher, or perhaps hard poverty, had
prevented
Gilbert sending his children to any school,
before he fell heir to his fortune; which was the
reason perhaps, that they got such wild notions
and propensities among them as could never after
be eradicated. `Yes,' the urchin went on, `he
sent me to school, and Hy, too; for he has been a
sort of crazy man ever since he came to his
money
.
Well, the boys at school called me an Indian
papoose, and I thumped 'em; and the man that
was master he thumped
me,
and Hy also; for Hy
came to help me. So, when school was out, I took
Hyland along; and we went to a corner, and got
a great heap of stones; and when the master came
out, we pelted him!' `You did?' cried Elsie, in
alarm: `I hit him one polt on the shin,' said Oran,
warming with the recollection,`I hit him one
poltit was what I call a sogdolloger,that made
him dance like a ducked cat; and just as he
stooped
down to scratch it, we blazed away again, me
and Hy; and if you ever heard two hailstones
rattle on a well-bucket, you may tell how his head
sounded, I reckon!'
`But your father, Oran?' said Elsie,--`you
have not told me what made you leave your
father?' `Father chose to take the master's part,'
said Oran, sulkily; `he said as how I must learn to
be a gentleman, now I was in England, and never
behave like a young savage no more, because I
was never more to come home, meaning to
Pennsylvany
;
and so I must go back to the master, and
be thumped again; for nobody could be a gentleman,
without having it thumped into him. Well, Goody,
you see, I couldn't stand that; I was not going to a
school to be called papoose, and trounced too; and
I was mighty sick of England, which is just like a
big garden,you can't turn out of the road,
without
treading on somebody's strawberry-patch, and
having 'em holla after you with dogs, and men, and
such things; and I got into a great pickle once,
for killing a thumping big rabbit that I saw in a
stubble. They called it a hare; I killed it with a
stone; they made father pay money about it.
Well, I made up my mind to come home, without
making any more words about it. So I went
down to the river among the docks, and there I
saw a ship that was going to said to Philadelphy
next day. I told Hy about it, and he agreed we
should go over. I went to the captain, and I said,
`Captain, I want to go to Philadelphy,' but he
called me hard names, and swore at methere
was no getting any thing out of him. I looked
about, and saw them putting boxes, and barrels
and baskets, and all sorts of things, into the big
hole below. I went ashore, and laid out the
shilling
father gave me to go back to school, in
gingerbread
.
But Hy's heart failed him: I never
thought he would come to much, he's too much of
a coward; he began to cry, and said he would go
home to father. I gave him a thumping for being
such a fool; but that only made him cry harder.
So I gave him half my gingerbread, and told him
to go, letting him know, if he told on me, I would
give him another banging. Then I clomb into the
ship again, and slipped into the hole among the
boxes. But before I went down, I looked back to
Hy, and there he was on the wharf, eating his
gingerbread
and crying. I shook my fist at him, as
much as to say, `If you tell, mind you!' and then
I went below, and after awhile they fastened me
up.'
`It was as dark down there as the dickens,'
said Oran, in reply to the piteous ejaculations of
the widow; `but there was plenty of ratsI tell
you what, they scared me! They stole my
gingerbread
,
and whenever I got to nodding, they
seized me by the nose and fingers, and I thought I
should have been nibbled up, like an ear of corn.
But I knew I must stand 'em as long as I could; or
it would be all up with me.Well, after awhile
they came to a place, I don't know where it was;
but there was a great clatter on the deck, and
swearing and trampling, and they opened the
trapdoors
,
as I saw by the great flash of light. Then
there was a heap of voices, and father's among
them, and Hyland's too. The great villain Hy,
was telling on me, for all I gave him half the
gingerbread! When I catch him, I'll pay him up,
I will, Goody, if I wait ten years!'And here the
young scape-gallows, as he revolved the treachery
of his fellow truant, clenched his fist, and looked as
fierce and savage as a young bantam in his first
fit of valour.
`Then,' continued this hopeful junior to the
astonished widow, `there was father, saying his
son Oran was hid in the ship, and he would have
him out, or bring the captain to the gallows for
kidnapping him, meaning
me;
and there was Hy,
the villain, telling him how I was to hide among
the boxes; and there was the captain and the other
folks, swearing that father was crazy, and ought
to stay at home; though to make him easy, they
had opened the traps, or the hatches, as they call
them, and he might see for himself. Then father
came down, and bawled out after me, and so did
Hy; and Hy said, if I would come out, father
would not send me to the grammar school, to be
thumped no more; but he said nothing about
father sending me back to Pennsylvany! no, not
so much as a word! I was not to be caught by
any such talking; so I laid snug and as mum as a
VOL. I.G
rabbit. Then father took on as though I was dead,
squeezed to pieces among the boxes, because I
would not answer himas if I was such a fool!
Then he wanted the captain to take out the boxes,
and the captain would not; then he went after
constables; and when he was gone, they clapped
down the hatches, and sailed away with all their
might, and I never heard any thing more of father.'
`Poor fellow!' said Elsie, her sympathy for
the anticipated sufferings of her young proteg
driving from her mind all disapprobation of the
hard-hearted perverseness that caused them, `did
they keep you long in that dismal, dreadful place?'
`You may say so,' replied the boy; `they kept
me down there till I was more tired of it than ever
I had been of the grammar-school. I don't know
how long it was, but I was mighty tired of it.
Dickens, goody, but I was dry! I was in such a
hurry to get down, that I forgot I should want
water as well as gingerbread: I eat up all my
gingerbread, but I was as dry as ever. Goody,
you don't know what it
is
to be dry! I was always
thinking and dreaming of springs, and wells, and
pumps, and the big Delaware there, and even the
ditches and gutters. But I held out as well as I
could, till I thought we were clear of that hateful
old England; and then I hollaed to 'em to let me
out; but they did not hear me at all. There was a
power of big baskets, that were rolled all about
me; for you must know, a ship never holds still a
minute at a time, but is always pitching and
tumbling
,
now up and now down, like a cart in a
cornfield
;
so the baskets rolled all over me; I thought
they would have squeezed the life out of me, and
I could not get out from among them. So there I
pulled and hollaed, till I was tired of it, or fell
asleep; but no good came of it. I tell you what,
goody, I would have taken a thumping for a drink
of water! but there was no coming at it. I bawled
out, `Water! water!' and `Fire! fire!' but it was
no good; nobody heard me; and it set me to
crying
,
to think what a hard time I had of it. Well,
I reckon!I was scraping about among the
baskets
,
and some gave way, they were so rotten. I
scraped among the willow twigs, and got my hand
among the straw, without so much as thinking
what I was about, when, all of a sudden, I found I
had hold of a glass bottle. `Oho!' said I; it was a
great long-necked thing, with wax over the cork.
I did not mind that; I knocked the neck off against
the basket, and, good dickens! such a fizzing and
spluttering as it made! It foamed all over my face,
and some fell on my lips, and it tasted good, like
cideryou may be sure I drained it.' `It was
wine!' cried Elsie. `I reckon,' said the juvenal;
`and I reckon it made my head sing, too!' he
exclaimed
,
smacking his lips over the grateful
recollection
;
`such stuff as that I never tasted before.
It made me feel good,all comical, and merry,
and ticklish-like,I don't know how, but all as if
I was rolling up hill and down hill,huzzy-buzzy,
sleek, and grand! Then I seemed as if I was
dreaming, but such merry dreams, and talking,
and roaring, and laughing; and then some of them
opened the traps, and dragged me out; and then I
had a tussle with some of them, for I felt big
enough to fight them all; and then somehow I fell
fast asleep.'
`When I came to, the captain said I was
drunk, and he beat me: it was worse than the
grammar-man. First, he thumped me for stealing
into the ship, then for putting him to a bother, and
then for drinking his cider, or champagne, as he
called it.' `He beat you, the villain!' cried Elsie;
`and you the son of Thomas Gilbert!' `He did,'
said the boy, with edifying coolness; `he treated
me like a dog, and he thumped me every day. I
suppose the grammar-man could not have been
harder on me than the captain of that big ship
they called her the Prince of Whales, for, you
must know, a whale is a very big fish; but I could
never get a peep at one. Goody! I never was so
mauled in my life! If I crawled about the
quarter-deck
,
as they call it, (because that's a place
where the ship-boy's never get any quarter,) why
the captain cuffed me off; and it was pretty much
the same with the mates, for they cuffed too, and
every now and then, some one or other beat me
with a rope's end, because I would not go up the
ropes, or do any thing else to make myself
useful
.
I never did believe a Christian man's son
could be treated so! but that's the way they treat
boys on board a ship, only that the regular
ship-boys
were not handled so hard. They all beat
me, captain, sailors, and all; the cook boxed my
ears when I went to the caboose;and if I hid
on the forecastle, as they call it, the sailors run
me up a rope and plumped me into the sea; and
even the ship-boys tried their hands at me, but I
reckon
they
got as much as they gave. They all
beat me but Jackey Jones, an old fellow that had
but one eye; and if it had not been for him, I
believe
they would have killed, or starved, or
drowned
me among them. One night he was washed
overboard: and after that I was beat worse than
ever. It was a great storm, goody; I reckon you
don't know what a storm is, ashore, even when the
trees are snapping; I tell you what, the sea was
boiling up, just like a big pot, and the ship danced
about just like an apple-dumpling; all the difference
was, the water was not hot. They were all big
cowards, for all they had been so big with me;
and down they went on their knees, crying and
praying, like methodist preachers. The captain
was white all over the mouth, the chief mate got
drunk, and Big George, a sailor that used to be
hard on me, came to ask my pardon for treating
me so badly. I told him, we should have a
reckoning
about that some other time; and that night
he was washed overboard, along with Jackey
Jones, and we saw them no more. I tell you what,
goody! it was the happiest time I had aboard that
ship; for I supposed it would sink, and drown 'em
all; which was a great satisfaction for me to think
on. However, it cleared up again next day; and
if we had not soon reached Philadelphy, I don't
know what would have become of me; for they
were all worse than ever, especially the captain.'
`And that wretch,' cried Elsie; `did no one punish
him for his cruel and barbarous oppression of a
poor, friendless boy?' `You shall hear,' replied the
urchin, with a grin that might have adorned the
visage of an Indian coming out of battle, with a
sack full of scalps; `he was for fastening me up
when we came to the wharf at Philadelphy, to see
his merchant, and learn what was to be done with
me. But I sneaked away, when he was gone, and
hid among some barrels, till he came back. Then
I watched him come out of the ship again, and ran
to a corner, where there was a bundle of green
hoop-poles, at a cooper's shop. Well, goody, I
took one of the hoop-poles; and when he passed
by, down it went, and down went the captain, too,
like a butchered ox, with a great yell like a
school-boy
,
that brought the people up. However, I gave
him two more, for as long as I had time; and then
I had to scurry for it.' `Good heavens!' cried
Elsie, `perhaps you killed him!' `Well, if I didn't,
I'm sure it was all the fault of the people that ran
up so fast, so that I had not time. As for the rest
of them, if I ever catch any of them up here among
G 2
the hills, you may reckon what will come of it.'
And as he spoke, he raised his eyes to an old
musket
,
hanging on the wall, and nodded his head
significantly.
This, said the merry narrator, is the very
story I had from Elsie's lips, only that she spoiled
it in telling; and I leave you to judge whether
there was ever a more exquisite young savage in
the whole world, than that same Oran Gilbert.
Never, truly, said Miss Falconer, upon whom
perhaps the unusual, yet natural, vivacity of her
friend, had produced a still more pleasant
impression
than the story itself. This Oran must have
been the Paladin, the Orlando, the very Tom
Thumb, of Hawk-Hollow;
`Though small his body,
Yet was his soul like any mountain big;'
and verily, if the other Hawks, callow or full
fledged, were of the same colour and quality, you
have begun the most diverting story in all your
budget. Pr'ythee go on; there is a magic in the
whole affair; for, while you speak it, it makes the
teller herself again. Methinks you are now the
same merry Kate I knew a year ago,the bright
Kate, no longer `kerchieft in a cloud,' as Milton
says,the gay Kate, the madcap Kate, the
Brandywine
Kate
Not a word about Brandywine, if you will
have me play the fool longer, said Miss Loring,
hurriedly. And after all, there is nothing more
to tellthat is, nothing more funny; and, after all,
too, there
was
nothing funny in the sufferings of
that poor, headstrong, vindictive boy; absurdity
enough, I grant you, there was; but it was my
wicked and hard heart that made me travesty
an anecdote that poor Elsie considered serious
enough.
She then went on to speak of the return of the
boy's father, the building of the manor-house, the
second marriage of Mr. Gilbert, and the exploits
of his children. The peculiar temper of Oran soon
determined the course of his life While yet a
boy of sixteen, he had extended his rambles over
the mountains into the Wyoming valley, then
occupied
by two clans of Shawnee and Delaware
Indians, who were often at feud together. Among
these barbarians, said the lady, the young white
Indian, for such he must be esteemed, fought his
first battle, and took his first scalp. It was in the
Grasshopper War
The what? cried Miss Falconer.
Why, Hal, the Grasshopper War
I
call it,
said Catherine, out of tenderness to our sex; but
all others call it the Squaw War. It was waged
between those rival tribes I spoke of. The women
of the two clans met together in a strawberry
field, where they gathered fruit in company, very
pacifically I doubt not, except a little scolding at
one another. The children employed themselves,
in the meanwhile, chasing grasshoppers; when,
unfortunately, two boys belonging to different
tribes pounced together upon a magnificent insect,
that was perhaps the emperor of the field, and
contended for the possession of the prize. Up
ran the mother of the Delaware, and boxed the
young Shawnee's ears; the Shawnee parent ran
to avenge her child; and others immediately taking
part, in a few moments the whole field was in an
uproar: such scratching, scolding, and pulling of
caps, were perhaps never heard of before. Out
ran the men from their villages to help their wives,
and to it they went pell-mell; and the war, thus
begun, did not end until hundreds had been slain
on both sides, and the Shawnees entirely driven
from the valley. The less we say of this war, the
better; for I heard it instanced as one small proof
out of a thousand better, that men never fall by the
ears, without the women being at the bottom of
the contention. The Delawares, with whom Oran
fought, made much of him, gave him a name
which signifies the Boy Warrior, and formally
adopted him into their tribe. As his brothers grew
up around him, he enticed them one by one into
the woods, and made them as wild as himself;
and by and by, when those dreadful Indian wars,
that followed after the defeat of General Braddock,
extended over the whole western country, and even
east of the Susquehanna, he acquired a singular
reputation as a bold and successful scalp-hunter.
I don't know what else to call him; he was not a
soldier, for he never could be prevailed upon to
go out with any body of soldiers, under the
command
of regular governmental officers. He went
with his brothers, and seldom allowed even a
neighbour to join his little party, though this was
an object with all who knew him; for none of the
Gilberts having ever been seriously wounded in
any of their mad enterprises, the people had a
superstitious
belief that good luck and safety went
with them.
In the meanwhile, Mr. Gilbert had taken a
second
wife; and being wealthy, he was able to
choose one of gentler manners and character than
her predecessor, who, they say, was a fierce,
masculine
woman, though devotedly attached to her
children. It is said, he married her in the hope
that her kindness and gentleness might wean his
boys from their barbarous career; but the
expedient
only served to confirm them in their habits.
They conceived a violent dislike to their
stepmother
;
and the only bond of union between them
I should say, perhaps, the only moderator and
protector of the poor woman, was the girl, Jessie,
whom they all adored, rough as they were, and
whowhile she lived, at leastcaused them to
treat the unfortunate lady with some show of
respect
.
I may say, since you are in the poetical
mood, and have already quoted one of Milton's
clouds to me, that Jessie was, betwixt the timidity
of the step-mother and the rudeness of her
brothers
,
`A shelter, and a kind of shading, cool,
Interposition, as a summer's cloud;'
(I found that out myself!)and, according to
Elsie, she was one of the sweetest and
warmest-hearted
creatures in the world. They had a rich
relation, an aunt, in the West Indies, who desired
to adopt the maiden; but Mr. Gilbert refused to
part with her. In her place he sent his youngest
boy, an infant,the child, and only one, of his
second wife; I think Elsie told me, she died in
giving it birth; but I am not certain as to that.
This part of the story I never could understand
perfectly; for whenever the poor widow speaks of
it, she becomes dreadfully agitated. But certainly,
it was most unhappy for all, that he did not send
the girl.
And why,why unhappy, Catherine?
demanded
Miss Falconer, losing somewhat of her
serene self-possession, as she heard her friend's
voice falter over the words.
According to Elsie, muttered Miss Loring,
with downeast eyes, the misfortunes which
crushed
and ruined the whole family, might have been
thus averted.But, Harriet, she continued, let
us speak of these things to-morrow. What
follows
is dark, gloomy, dreadful; and I cannot
speak it without giving you offence.
I pledge you pardon and immunity
beforehand
,
said Miss Falconer. The ice is broken,
and now I must dare the flood, though it be of gall
and poison. Dreadful, indeed? What can be
more dreadful than the state of a daughter,
blindfold
at the side of a parent whom all men are
shooting at with the arrows of malice, which she
hears hissing around her, yet knows not how to
arrest
?
Speak then, Catherine, for you have placed
me on a rack: nothing can be more painful than
suspicion.
Promise not to be offended with me then, dear
Harriet, said Miss Loring, taking her hand, and
looking deprecatingly into her face; and do not
thinkhere her voice quivered a little, and
her eyes again fell to the ground,do not
think, because I tell you these things as I have
heard them, that I necessarily believe themor,
at least,
all
of them.
Certainly, my love, said the other, with a
slight tinge of asperity. As you will, one day,
have a duty, like myself, imposed upon you, to
repel
all calumnies against my father, the sooner you
become incredulous, the better.
Catherine smiled faintly, then blushed, and, as
had happened before, at a similar allusion, the glow
of embarrassment was again followed by paleness.
I presume, she said, after a moment's pause,
that the Colonel has often spoken to you of the
dreadful peril at the Moravian settlements, from
which he was rescued by Oran Gilbert and his two
brothers?
Never, replied Harriet, in a sort of dismay.
My father rescued from peril! and by the Hawks
of Hawk-Hollow? Why, here is a drama
opening
upon us indeed! But it is not true, Kate!
This, Harriet, replied the other, is a
circumstance
well known in the neighbourhood; and
I wonder you have never heard it before.
On all subjects connected with the family of
the Gilberts, said Miss Falconer, my father is
reserved and silentat least to me; and,
Catherine
,
I confess with shame, this very circumstance
has often filled my mind with the most painful
misgivings
.
I know nothing about the Moravian
settlements
,
either. You must therefore tell your
story to ignorance itself. I know that my father
was, in his youth, an officer in the colonial war
establishment, and that he did duty somewhere on
the frontiers, and came off with scars; but that is
all. Speak, therefore, without reserve.
The country west of yonder blue cliffs, (how
sweetly they peep through the hollow of that hill,
and over the yellow tree-tops!) has always been
the theatre of the most bloody contentions, said
Catherine. That same Wyoming, of which I
have said so much, has never been entirely at
peace since that redoubtable war of the
grasshopper
set its inhabitants by the ears. It was settled
by certain Yankees from Connecticut, who
claimed
,
and claim yet, to erect a jurisdiction
independent
of Pennsylvania, and to this day the partisans
of the two powers are quarrelling rancorously
with one another, often shedding blood. When
the inhabitants are driven away by enemies, they
are obliged to cross a great swamp, to reach the
Delaware. This has been crossed so often, and
so many miserable wounded, and starving, and
fainting wretches, have fallen down in the retreat
and perished among its bogs, that it is yet called
the Shades of Death. The wars that produced
such suffering have commonly been waged in
another
county; but they have sometimes reached
our own(
Our own!
You see, I am making
myself
at home here!) The fall and winter of the
year when Braddock was defeated in the extreme
south-western frontier, were marked by many
bloody incursions of the Indians, even in this
county; and you may judge how terrible was their
ferocity, when you hear that their enmity fell as
heavily upon their friends as their foes. The poor
Moravians, who, with a holy and unworldly zeal,
had devoted their lives to the purpose of
instructing
and reclaiming them from barbarism, were
among the first of their victims. The outer
settlement
of these poor missionaries was beyond the
mountain, on one of the springs of the Lechaw, or
Lehigh, as we now call it. It was beset, late in
November, by the savages, and destroyed, together
with many of the brothers. The next settlement
was that called Gnadenhutten, where was much
valuable property, and great stores of grain; and
when the Moravians fled even from this in affright,
the colonial government thought it of so much
importance
,
that they directed it to be immediately
garrisoned by a company of rangers. This was
done; a fort was constructed in the
neighbourhood
,
across the river, which was made the
headquarters
of the company; while a detachment
occupied
the Moravian village. This detachment
was commanded by your father, then holding the
rank of lieutenant. And now, Harriet, I must tell
you, that your father had enemies in these wild
lands, even at that early day. I will not repeat
what I have heard said, as the causes of enmity;
for I doubt not they are mere scandals. I
mention
them only because some, I am told, yet declare
that the barbarous attempt on his life was made
by disguised white men, and not by Indians.
Although from the time of the massacre of the
over-hill Moravians, in November, until the end of
the year, Indians were ever prowling in the woods,
and occasionally carrying the tomahawk and
flames to some lonely settlement, yet it was
supposed
that the presence of the soldiers at
Gnadenhutten
and the fort, would prevent their making
any serious attempts this side the mountain. This
induced a false and fatal security; and when the
Indians did appear, the detachment and village of
Gnadenhutten were completely surprised. It was
upon New-year's day, and all the white men were
amusing themselves on the frozen river, without
arms, and of course they fell an easy prey to the
savage assailants. Many were butchered, the
village
was fired, your father captured in the vain
attempt to escape, and carried off to the woods.
During all this scene of terror, continued the
Captain's daughter, there were no scalp-hunters
among the white men so busy, bold, and famous,
as the three Gilberts. Elsie Bell says, that Oran
was then only nineteen, and the youngest two
years short of that; but, it seems, men grow old
fast in the woods, when Indians are nigh(it is
well the
women
don't.) They were upon an
excursion
,
fighting for themselves, at the very time of
this calamity; and it was their fate to encounter
the party that bore your father away a captive.
It seems that the savages, after completing the
destruction of the village, retreated in small bands
to distract and avoid pursuit, for there were many
companies of armed men in the county, ready to
march at a moment's warning. Some took charge
of the prisoners, and others were to strike at small
and retired settlements. Your father, who had
been severely, but not desperately wounded, was
left in charge of one little division, six in number,
and was carried off by a path so remote from those
followed by others, that, I suppose, it was this
circumstance
which caused evil-minded persons to
affirm he was captured by private enemies and
white men. Their course was at least very
singular
,
for it carried them rather to the north-east,
along the foot of the mountain, than to the north
VOL. I.H
and west. They dragged their prisoner on till
after midnight, which has been mentioned as an
unusual circumstance, at least with Indians; and,
at dawn, they tied him to a tree, and piled around
him dead boughs and pine-knots, intending, as he
now saw, to torture him alive.
The narrator here paused, and looked upon her
friend, who, after a slight shudder, very
composedly
said,
Poor pa! he must have been horribly
frightened
!
I should like to know how he looked, the
moment he made the discovery!
Catherine heard her with unconcealed
amazement
,
but appreciated her philosophy, when she
added, with an affected laugh,
Why, my dear Kate, as, after all, he was
not
tortured, it would be but folly to fall into hysterics.
I never grieve over misfortunes that were never
happening. But come; how got he out of this
doleful dilemma? You said something about the
three HawksAh! you spoiled the dramatic point
of the story, by enabling me to forestall a
discovery
.
And so the three Hawks discovered the six
buzzards, and fell upon them, and took their
lambkin
from them? They are no true fishing-hawks,
after all; for it is the part of these ravagers, not
so much to rob, as to be robbed. They should
have been called Eagles, for it is these birds that
take such little liberties with the feathered Isaac
Waltons, as I have once or twice seen with my
own eyes. But these were heroical kites, I must
acknowledge.
They were, certainly, said Miss Loring,
not well pleased with the levity of her
kinswoman
;
and, methinks, you should do them the
justice
to consider that it was no child's play for three
menthree boys we may call them, to assail six
stout Indians, vanquish them, and rescue a poor
doomed prisoner out of their hands. If you will not
do justice to their courage, acknowledge at least,
the dreadful cost at which they exercised their
humanity. Hyland Gilbert, the second son, the
best beloved of all, as Elsie assured me, was shot
dead, while he was cutting your father loose from
the tree.
Good heavens! cried Miss Falconer, with an
emotion, that seemed, however, to be rather horror
than grief, was this so indeed? Did one of them
fall?
He did, replied Catherine, and his poor
brothers, buried him where he fell. According to
Elsie's superstitious belief, they were punished by
the genius of their fate, for exercising their
humanity
on an undeserving object. You know
she,
at
least, holds on to her angry prejudices. She said,
that from that moment, which was the first
unlucky
one to them, the Gilberts never more
prospered
in their undertakings; every thing that came
after was mischance and disaster; death followed
death, sorrow succeeded sorrow, and now not one
remains alive of the whole family, unless it may be
the youngest son, who was sent to the Islands in
his infancy, and of whom Elsie knows nothing
whatever, although they have a report in the
village
that he also is dead.
I am much obliged to Elsie, said Miss
Falconer
,
sullenly; after eating my father's bread,
she might have the grace to abate her malevolence
a little.
Alas, Harriet, said Miss Loring, do not call
it malevolence; but the prejudice, the absurd and
unjust prejudice of weak, dreamy old age, if you
will. And you know, that she is ignorant from
whom I derived the power to relieve her wants.
I did but hint once that your father would befriend
her, when she exclaimed, not in the heat of
frenzy, but with a cold, iron-like determination,
that she would gnaw the flints on the way-side for
food, rather than receive a morsel of bread from
the hands of Colonel Falconer. Indeed, your
father himself directed me to conceal his agency
in the benefaction.
Peace to the silly old woman! said Harriet,
and let us speak of her no more. Resume your
story: I see, by your looks, that the worst is yet to
come. But fear not: I am not so much shocked
as I was, since the thing comes from that bitter
old bundle ofoh, prejudice, my dear. Well, the
two survivors saved my father's lifewhat
then?
Then, said Catherine, they bore him on a
litter of boughs to their father's house; for, before
they fled, the murderers had assailed him with
their axes, and left him almost dying. The
journey
was very laborious; for to avoid the
war-parties
,
now swarming through the country, they
were obliged to steal along by circuitous paths,--
and it was several days before they could procure
assistance. They got him safe, however, to their
father's house, and then played the good
Samaritan
with him. If you would like, I will show you
the room where he lay, while recovering,it is
the chamber over the armoury, as you call it,
that is, my father's study, where he takes his
afternoon's
nap. Elsie told me there was a pane of
glass on which he had cut his name with a
diamond
ring; but the sashes were changed, before
she told me this, and I know not what has become
of them. But, if you like, we will inquire about
them.He did not recover entirely before the
autumn, and then he left the valley. I am told
that there is an oak-tree on the lawn, at which he
used to shoot pistols.
Catherine! said Miss Falconer, with a piercing
look, you flutter about the subject, like a bird
over the jaws of a serpent, unable to retreat and
yet afraid to descend. Is there any thing so
horrible
to come?
There is indeed! said Catherine, trembling;
but it is not true, cousin,you must not believe
it is true! It is about Jessiethey say she was
very good and handsomea kind nurse,
simple-hearted
,
of an affectionate disposition, and
Hold! hold! cried Miss Falconer,
vehemently
,
starting to her feet, with a pale face, and lips
ashy and trembling, this would be to make out
my father a fiend! Saints of heaven! this is too
much! Come,let us proceed.
And thus muttering out her oppressive emotion,
she darted down the stream, followed hastily by
her friend.
Tall trees still overarched the rivulet; but its bank
became smoother as they advanced. A few rods
below, the channel was again contracted, but not
by impending crags. A huge sycamore, ancient
and thunder-scarred, but still flourishing, had been
tumbled over the stream by some forgotten
tempest
;
but so tightly were its roots twisted in the
rocky soil of the one bank, and so tenacious was
the hold of its gnarled and elbowed boughs upon
the sward of the other, that it maintained its place
despite the floods, which, it was evident, often
washed over it, and thus afforded a bridge, rustic
enough, but secure, though by no means easy of
passage.
Upon this Harriet, still perturbed and driven
onward by painful emotion, was about to place her
foot, when she was restrained by the trembling
grasp of her companion.
What means the child? she exclaimed, with a
feverish accent: there are no savages here.
But, said Catherine, with a faint voice, it
was over there, by the rock, they dug the poor
girl's grave!
Miss Falconer recoiled for a moment, and then
saying, with a firm voice, It matters notlet us
visit it, she sprang upon the bridge, followed by
Catherine, and made her way across. About
thirty paces below, the stream darted over a rock,
making a cascade ten or twelve feet high; and it
was the roar of this fall, borne downwards by the
breeze, which had attracted the painter's curiosity,
as he paused for a moment on the road side. It
possessed no very striking beauty, nor was the
body of water that leaped over the rock of any
extraordinary magnitude; yet it had a violent and
even impressive look, and the waters hurrying
impetuously
towards it from above, shot under the
sycamore with an appearance of fury that might
have tried the nerves of any over-timid person,
crossing by so precarious a bridge.
CHAPTER VII.
Dull gravethou spoil'st the dance of youthful blood,
Strik'st out the dimple from the cheek of mirth,
And every smirking feature from the face,
Branding our laughter with the name of madness.
Where are the jesters now?
Ah! sullen now,
And dumb as the green turf that covers them.
Blair
The Grave
.
The
spot which the maidens now reached, after
crossing the rivulet, was wild and gloomy, yet
exceedingly
romantic. A little ascent led them up to
a sort of platform, or shelf, of earth, the highest
portion of the table-land, from which the torrent
leaped downwards, making its way, in a series of
foaming rapids, to the parent river. It
therefore
overlooked the sweeping hillocks and rustling
forests below, and commanded a prospect of the
river and the southern portion of the valley, both
extensive and beautiful; and, indeed, a more
charming nook could not have been imagined for
one, who, though preferring personally to be
surrounded
by solitude, yet loved to send back his
spirit to the world, and survey it from that distance
which lends it the sweetest enchantment. On the
summit of the platform lay two huge masses of
rock, that approached each other in one place so
nigh as scarce to permit a passage between them;
towards the rivulet, however, the intervening space
was wider, and covered with a grassy turf; and a
sort of wall, composed of smaller fragments, ran
from the one crag to the other, yet so rudely, that
it was difficult to say whether the irregular barrier
had been piled up by the hands of nature or man.
Besides a majestic growth of trees behind and
around the rocks, there was one tall beech
flourishing
within the enclosure; and from its roots there
gushed a cool fountain, that went dripping and
leaking through green mosses, until it yielded its
meager tribute to the streamlet. Both the crags
were overgrown with lichens and ferns; and
under
the larger one, which, in the afternoon, cast
its shadow over the whole nook, there flourished
a luxuriant array of arums, mandrakes, violets,
and other plants that delight in cool and moist
situations. On the face, and at the foot, of the
castern rock, where the sunshine lingered longer,
were dusky columbines, rock-daisies, and other
plants, now in bloom, and, in the summer, their
places would have been supplied by the aster and
the golden-rod; and at the foot of the rock, among
a heap of brambles, that seemed to have almost
choked it, there grew a rose-bush, the only
remarkable
thing present, being obviously of an
exotic
species. It bore a single flower, visible among
the green leaves and white blossoms of the
black-berry
,
and it immediately attracted the notice of
the maidens.
Elsie told me, whispered Catherine, with a
voice of fear, that the poor old father planted a
rose-bush on the grave,it is strange it should
live so long.She said there was a grave-stone
tooah! there it is!Let us go away.
As Harriet, bolder than her friend, or affecting
to be so, reached forward, to remove the brier
from the more lovely plant, in hopes that the rude
and thorny veil might conceal other flowers, it
yielded to her grasp, and revealed a hollow or
sunken place in the ground, at one extremity of
which was a rude stone, entirely shapeless and
undressed, yet so placed as to mark undeniably
the couch of some human clod of the valley. No
name, letter, or device of any kind,no
inscription
to record the virtues of the dead, no legend
to perpetuate the grief of the living,appeared on
the rude monument; and, indeed, however
expressive
the shape and appearance of the hollow place
to those already aware that a grave had been dug
in this unsanctified nook, it is scarce probable that
a stranger, stumbling upon it by chance, could
have believed that in that coarse and dishonoured
fragment, his foot pressed upon a funeral stone. It
was a singular graveit was a singular
cemetery
;
and the maidens regarded the brambled pit
and the solitary flower with awe, the one because
her spirit was especially susceptible of impressions
from melancholy objects, and the other because
the legend of her companion had invested the
place with an interest personal, it might be said,
to herself.
How little reflection is expended upon,yet how
much is called for, by the grave,by the lowliest
hillock that is piled over the icy bosom, by the
grassiest hollow that has sunk with the
mouldering
bones of a fellow creature! And in this
narrow
haven rots the bark that has ploughed the
surges of the great vital ocean! in this little den,
that the thistle can overshadow in a day's growth,
and the molewarp undermine in an hour of labour,
is crushed the spirit that could enthrall a world,
and dare even a contest with destiny! How little
it speaks for the value of the existence, which man
endures so many evils to prolong; how much it
reduces the significance of both the pomp and
wretchedness of being, reducing all its vicissitudes
into the indistinguishable identity which infinite
distance gives to the stars,a point without
parallax
,
a speck, an atom! Such is life,the gasp of a
child that inspires the air of existence but once,
a single breath breathed from eternity. But the
destiny that comes behind us,oblivion! It is not
enough that we moralize upon the equality of the
sepulchre; that the rich man, whose soul is in the
ostentation of a marble palace, and his heart in the
splendour of the feast, should consider how small
a pit must content him, or that the proud, who
boast their `pre-eminence above the beasts,' should
know that the shaggy carcass and the
lawn-shrouded
corse must fatten the earth together.
We should teach our vanity the lesson of
humiliation
that is afforded by the grave; neglecting the
mighty mausoleums of those marvellous spirits
which fame has rendered immortal, we should
turn to the nameless tombs of the million, and in
their deserted obscurity, discover the feeble hold
which we ourselves must have upon earth and the
memory of men. Friendship forgets what the
devouring earth has claimed; and even enmity
ceases at last to remember the resting place of a
foe. Love ourselves as we may, devote our
affections
to others as we can, yet must our memory
perish with us in the grave; and all the
immortality
we leave to be cherished among friends, is
expressed in the distich of a poet, whom the
anticipation
of enduring renown could not blind to
the transitoriness of real remembrance:
Poor Pope will grieve a month, and Gay
A week, and Arbuthnot a day.*
But there were other thoughts necessarily
associated
,
and other feelings excited by this lonely
sepulchre; and while Miss Falconer preserved a
moody and painful silence upon its brink,
Catherine
bent over it, scarce conscious that she bedewed
the rose-bush with a tear, or that her own shadow
had descended, as it were, into the pit, with an
ominous readiness.
It was a delightful evening; the air was full of
balmy freshness, the landscape resplendently
verdant
,
and the sky cloudless, save in the west,
where the sun was sinking among curtains of gold
and pillars of flame; and the solitude and quiet of
the whole scene, broken by no sounds, except the
ceaseless turmoil of the water-fall, and the
plaintive
scream of the fishing-eagles, which had
deserted
their gray perch, to bathe in the pure floods of
sunset, that beautified the upper air,the solitude,
quiet, and beauty of every thing around and nigh,
were additional arguments for silence.
But silence, long continued, was not consonant
to the restless and impatient temper of Miss
Falconer
;
and notwithstanding the indignant
incredulity
with which she had interrupted her friend's
narrative, the same curiosity which compelled the
commencement of it, still thirsted for the
conclusion
.
The presence of the dead, however, in so
wild, so forlorn, so unblest a spot, where, as it
would seem, the shame of proud but humbled
hearts had dug the neglected grave, worked
powerfully
on her feelings; and it was with a hesitating
and quivering, though an abrupt voice, that she
demanded, after gazing for a long time on the
grave,
Did others,did any beside this bitter-tongued
woman, accuse my father of this thing?
I know not, replied Catherine, with accents
still more unsteady; all that I have gathered
was from Elsie; and when she speaks of these
things, as I mentioned before, she becomes
fearfully
agitated, so that I have sometimes thought
her wits quite unsettled. She never pretended to
tell me the whole story; nor indeed would I have
been disposed to ask or listen, knowing it would be
improper to do so. All these things have come in
broken hints and exclamations. What others in
the neighbourhood may say or think, I know not,
never encouraging any to speak to me on the
subject
.
The step-mother soon followed the
daughter
,
Elsie says, heart-broken; you may see her
tomb in the village church-yard. The old father,
too, became another man, gloomy, solitary, and
indifferent to his friends, so that the neighbours
ceased to visit him. His sons no longer hunted
with the young men of the country, but went, as
in their war-expeditions, alone; and when others
thrust themselves into their company, they
quarrelled
with them, so that they began to be
universally
feared and detested. To crown all, as soon
as the Revolution burst out, they went over to the
enemy; and being distributed among the wild and
murderous bands of savages forming on the
northwestern
frontiers, they soon obtained a dreadful
notoriety for their deeds of daring and cruelty.
Of course, this remarkable defection of the sons
caused the unlucky father to be suspected and
watched. He was accused, at last, of aiding and
abetting them in their treasonable practices; and
soon, either from timidity or a consciousness of
guilt, he fled, seeking refuge within the royal lines.
This was sufficient for his ruin; for after the usual
legal preliminaries, he was formally outlawed, as
his sons had been before, and his property
confiscated
.
He died soon afterward, either at New
York, or in Jamaica, where he had gone to seek
his youngest sonthe lad he had sent away as a
substitute for the daughter.
And this son? demanded Miss Falconer; did
you not say that he was dead?
Of him, said Catherine, Elsie knows
nothing
;
but if we can receive a belief that prevails
in the village on the subject, it would seem as if
the vials of wrath had been poured to the
uttermost
on the poor devoted family. They say, that
the young man, just raised to wealth and
distinction
by the death of his munificent kinswoman,
was one of the many victims to that dreadful
tornado
which ravaged the island of Jamaica two
years ago. But I never heard how this
intelligence
was obtained.
And the other sons? the rest of this brood of
traitors! demanded Miss Falconer, who strove to
merge the unpleasant feelings that had possession
of her bosom, in patriotic detestation of the
unfortunate
family.
They met the fate they must have anticipated,
said the Captain's daughter. They perished, one
by one, in different bloody conflicts; one fell at
Wyoming, another at Tioga Point, where the
combined
forces of savages and refugees were routed
by General Sullivan; Oran himself, with a fourth
brother, was killed at the battle of Johnstown,
near the Mohawk river, where another refugee
leader, Walter Butler, not less blood-thirsty and
famous, met a similar fate. Their death was
terrible
;
they cried for quarter, being wounded and
helpless; but the victors bade them `Remember
Wyoming, and Cherry-Valley,' two prominent
objects
of their cruelty, and killed them without
mercy. Another, I have heard, was somewhere
hanged as a spy; and these, with Hyland, killed
as I mentioned before, and the youngest, deceased,
if indeed he be deceased, in Jamaica, made up the
whole seven sons, all of whom therefore died
violent
deaths. The eighth child,the poor
daughter
,
undoubtedly sleeps under this rock; and
there are none left to mourn her. The
destruction
of the family was dreadful and complete.
VOL. I.I
CHAPTER VIII.
Run! run! run!
Quickly for a surgeon!
Call watch, constable! raise the hue and cry!
What's to be done?
Why the devil don't you stir, John?
This way, that way, every body fly!
Don Giovanni.
Thus
ended the sketch of a story, imperfect,
perhaps tedious and unsatisfactory, but still a
necessary
preliminary to the series of events that
completes the tradition. A mere womanly
curiosity
was perhaps at the bottom of the nobler
feeling
with which Miss Falconer sought to excuse
to herself the impropriety of urging the relation.
From the first to the last, it was meted out to her
reluctantly; and nothing but the command she
had long since obtained over a character less firm
and decided than her own, could have persuaded
the Captain's daughter to breathe a syllable of it
into ears, which, she could not but feel, ought not
to be opened to it. Miss Falconer had, moreover,
overrated her powers of scepticism; she had
provoked
the story, as men commonly provoke an
argument,that is, with a resolution not to be
convinced; but like the logician, in many
instances
,
when the discussion is over, her
incredulity
was sorely, though secretly, shaken, and
nothing but her pride and strength of character
checked the humiliating avowal. Some
circumstances
a delicate consideration for the feelings of
her friend, and an unconquerable repugnance to
speak more on the subject than could not be
avoided, had prevented the Captain's daughter
from relating. These would have thrown a still
darker stain upon the character of Colonel
Falconer
.
There was enough, however, said, to force
one disagreeable conviction upon Harriet's mind;
and this was, that, if her parent were even as
guiltless of ingratitude and wrong as her fondest
wishes would have him, calumny had, at least in
one secluded corner of the world, sealed him with
the opprobrium of a villain. It was a sore
addition
also to her discomfort, that her penetrating
mind discovered how deeply her kinswoman was
affected by the hateful history: if she doubted,
she did not doubt strongly. Vexed, humbled,
displeased
with herself and with Catherine, she rose
from the rocky shelf, on which both had seated
themselves when Catherine resumed the story, and
prepared to leave the scene, equally mournful and
unpleasant, when an incident occurred, which at
once gave a new turn to her feelings.
The Captain's daughter had observed the look
of dissatisfaction, and anticipated the movement,
by rising herself, to lead the way to the bridge.
As she started up hastily, her hat, which she had
loosened from her forehead, to enjoy the evening
breeze, now puffing among the flowers, fell from
her head, and her beautiful countenance and golden
ringlets were fully exposed. She raised her hands,
naturally enough, to catch the falling hat, and thus
assumed an attitude, of which she was herself
unconscious
,
but which, to one spectator at least, had
a character apparently menacing and forbidding.
This spectator was no less a person than the young
painter, who had rambled up the stream, and was
now making his way across the sycamore, to
obtain
a view of the cascade, entirely ignorant of the
presence of such visiters; for while they
maintained
their seats, their persons were concealed
behind the low wall, and their voices drowned by
the murmur of the water-fall.
A sudden exclamation, loud enough to be heard
over this lulling din, drew Catherine's attention to
the bridge; and there, to her extreme surprise, she
beheld the young stranger struggling among the
branches, as if he had lost his footing, while all the
time, his eyes, instead of being employed in the
more needful duty of looking to himself, were fixed
upon her with an air of the most unaccountable
wonder and alarm. The next instant, she beheld
him, to her own infinite horror, fall from the tree,
just as Harriet, starting up after her friend, had
also caught sight of the strange spectacle. Both
beheld the unlucky youth drop through the boughs,
and both at once anticipated the most dreadful
termination
to such a misadventure; for a pitch over
the cascade among the savage rocks below, could
scarcely be less than fatal. The very instant she
saw that the young man had lost his footing,
Catherine uttered a loud scream, and then, driven
onwards by an irresistible impulse, darted towards
the river, to render him what aid she could. As
for Miss Falconer, the shock had deprived her of
her self-possession, and her tongue clove to her
mouth with terror. She neither screamed nor
rushed forwards to give aid, until her lethargy was
dispelled by a distant voice, that suddenly echoed
the scream of Catherine:
Hark ye, Kate, you jade! hark ye, Kate, my
dear Kate! my beloved Kate! what's the matter?
I'm coming! I'll murder the villain! I'm coming,
Kate!
There was no mistaking the tones of Captain
Loring, even altered as they were by anxiety and
vociferation; and Miss Falconer recognising
them, screamed out, Quick, uncle, quick! for
heaven's sake, quick! and ran to the side of her
friend.
The torrent, leaping along like a mill-race for
the little distance that intervened betwixt the
treacherous bridge and the fall, had immediately
swept the young man from his feet; and as
Catherine bounded to the verge, flinging out, with
as much daring as presence of mind, the scarf of
Harriet, which she had instinctively snatched up,
in hope that he might seize it, she saw him swept
by her like a feather in a whirlwind, and instantly
hurried over the falls. The spectacle was really
terrific; and as Miss Falconer caught sight of the
dreary figurethe outstretched arm and the
despairing
countenance, revealed for one moment, as
some rocky obstruction on the very brink of the
cascade lifted the body half from the flood, and
then instantly plunged it out of viewshe lost what
little courage remained, and was no longer capable
of yielding the slightest assistance. If such was
her overpowering terror, it might have been
supposed
that the Captain's daughter, who, whatever
the vivacity and quickness of her mind, possessed
little of the boldness of spirit that characterized
her friend, would have been reduced to a state of
imbecility still more benumbing and helpless. But
this youthful girl concealed within the cells of a
heart all of feeble flesh, a principle of feeling that
could upon occasions, though she knew it not
herself
,
nerve the throbbing organ into steel; and, at
such times, if her brain was confounded, impulse
governed her actions with an influence more
useful
,
because more instant of operation.
Dreadful, therefore, as was the spectacle of the
youth dashed down the abyss under her eyes, and
almost in reach of her arm, she did not pause, like
Harriet, to scream after the Captain, who was
undoubtedly
drawing nigh, and at an unusual pace;
12
but leaving this to be done by her companion, she
ran down the rocks that led to the base of the fall,
and the next moment Harriet beheld her rush boldly
into the water. The instant she reached the basin at
the foot of the cascade, which was broken by rocks,
black and slippery from the eternal spray, she
caught sight of the bodyfor such it seemed
rolling
in the flood where it boiled over a ridgy mole in
a sheet of foam. It was scarce two paces from the
bank, and though the torrent gushed over the rock
with great impetuosity, it was shallow, at least in
the nearer portion; and, unless too rash and daring,
there was little danger she could be herself swept
over the ledge among the deep and dangerous
eddies below. She stepped therefore upon the
rock as far as she durst, and stretching out her
hand, succeeded in grasping the insensible figure,
as it was whirling over at a deeper place and in a
fiercer current. All her strength, however,
availed
nothing further than to arrest the body where
it was; and she must have speedily released her
hold, or been swept with it herself from the ledge,
when a new auxiliary, attracted by the same cries
that had alarmed Captain Loring, came
unexpectedly
to her assistance, crackling through the
bushes, and bounding over the rocks on the
opposite
side of the pool, which was a wilderness of
rock and swamp. No sooner had this personage
beheld her situation, than he ran a little lower
down, where the stream was again contracted,
sprang across from rock to rock, and immediately
darted to her side. With one hand he dragged
or, to speak more strictly, he flung her, (for his
actions were none of the gentlest,)out of the
water; and with the other, he lifted the unlucky
painter from the torrent, and bore him to the bank,
saying, as he laid him at the maiden's feet, in a
voice none of the mildest in the world,
Why, here's fine sport for a May-day, and a
rough end to a fool's frolic! How many more of
you must I fish up?
By this time the gallant Captain Loring, urged
by anxiety for his daughter, (not knowing that the
danger concerned another,) into a speed that he
had not attempted for twenty-five years, made his
appearance at the top of the fall, and seeing her
stand shivering with fright over what she
esteemed
a dead body,for the painter showed not a
single sign of life,with a stranger of
questionable
appearance at her side, he burst into a roar of
passion, crying, Hark ye, you vagabond villain!
if you touch my girlwhen his rage was put to
flight by Miss Falconer suddenly finding tongue,
and exclaiming, He has saved the poor youth's
life;that is, Kate saved him, and this man helped
her. I never was more frightened in my life! Let
us go down, uncleI fear the young man is hurt.
Meanwhile, Catherine, whose courage and
presence
of mind had almost deserted her, so soon as
she beheld the young man safe ashore, being roused
by the rough accents of the stranger, and the
death-like appearance of the youth, exclaimed, in
tones of entreaty, for the man had turned away,
as if to depart,
Do not go.Alas! you came too late! Help
us yet a little, or the poor youth will die where he
is. Pray, hold up his headindeed, he is very
much hurt!
Hurt! To be sure he is, cried the stranger,
with infinite coolness, bordering upon a sort of
savage contempt, or at least disregard, of the
miserable spectacle, knocked as clean on the
head as if a refugee had been at him. So, d'ye
hear, my young madam, there's no great need of
troubling yourself more about him; and here come
enough of your good folk to groan over him. As
for me, I have no time for moaning. If you want
help, just scream over again; and, I reckon, you'll
have the whole road at your elbow.
Catherine had herself performed the office of
humanity she had so vainly asked of the stranger;
she stooped down, and beckoning to her father
and Harriet, who were descending the rocks, to
hasten their steps, she raised up the painter's head,
and endeavoured, with a faltering hand, to lossen
the neckcloth from his throat. Struck by
expressions
so rude and unfeeling, she looked up for a
moment, and for the first time took hasty note of
the person and lineaments of her preserver. He
was a man of middle age,perhaps forty or more,
with a long shirt or frock of coarse linen thrown
over his other garments, and a broad-brimmed,
round-crowned, slouching hat, like the favourite
sombrero
of the Spanish islands, which was,
however
,
painted of a fiery red, and varnished, so as
to resist the rain. His stature was not
considerable
,
nor was his appearance very muscular, yet
he had given proof of no mean strength in the case
with which he dragged the painter and herself
from the water. His countenance, without being
coarse or ugly, had yet a repulsive character,
derived
in part from several scars, the marks of
violent
blows from sabres or other weapons, one of
which seemed to have destroyed his right eye, for
it was bound round with a handkerchief; but
perhaps
the forbidden air was rather given by the
savage fire that glimmered in the other, and the
perpetual frown that contracted his brows. His
hair was grizzled, and fell in a long lock over
either dark and bony cheek. His mouth was
particularly
stern, grim, menacing, and even
malevolent
of character,or so the Captain's daughter
thought. All these things Catherine observed in
a moment; yet, however unfavourably impressed
by them, she could not refrain from again
imploring
his assistance, saying, with the most earnest
accents,
If you be a Christian man, do not leave us.
We are none here but two feeble women, and an
infirm old man; and before we can procure
assistance
,
the young gentleman may perish. We will
thank you,we will reward
Good heavens! cried Miss Falconer, who had
now reached the foot of the rocks, and beheld the
pale and bleeding visage that Catherine so
falteringly
supported, he is dying!
Dying! Who's dying? echoed the Captain,
limping up to the group; Adzooks; what! my
painter? my handsome young dog, that was to
paint me my son Tom Loring? my Harman
What-d'ye-call-it
from Elsie Bell's? Hark ye, Mr.
Red-hat
,
or whatever your name is, I intended to arrest
you on suspicionAdzooks, I believe the young
dog's dead! He looks amazingly like my son Tom.
Hark ye, Mr. Harmer What-d'ye-call-it, how do
you feel? Why, adzooks, he's clean gone!Hark
ye, Mister Red-head, fetch him up the rocks
We'll carry him to the Folly.
While the Captain thus poured forth his mingled
wonder and lamentation, a surprising change came
over the visage of the stranger. He no sooner
understood from the mention of the lodging-place
and profession of the young man, that he did not
belong to the party before him, and had therefore
no greater claim upon their humanity than on his,
than he at once dropped his rude and disregardful
air, saying, as he released the others from the care
of supporting the wounded unfortunate,
I am neither stock nor stone; but I thought
you had idlers enough to bury your own dead.
And so the younker is a stranger to you? a bird
of old Elsie's, and none of your own roost? And
this young lady was trying to save his life? I beg
your pardon, if I have been rough with you, young
madam.He pronounced these words with a
tone mild, and almost regretful; then turning to
the Captain, he resumed, Well, Captain Loring,
for I believe that's your name,what shall we
do with this broken-headed fool? You see, here's
an arm broke, and a gash on the head that might
do credit to a tomahawk! How shall we get him
to Elsie Bell's? I can carry him, sure enoughbut
'tis a long mile off.And then for a doctor?
Here's a shoulder slipped, Captain. The fool! that
must tumble down this dog-hole water-fall!
Captain
,
you have servants and horsesyou must send
for a doctor.Poor boy, how he groans!
Hark ye, Mr. Red-head, said Captain Loring,
we will carry him to the Folly, and cure him
like a Christian. Just get him up these rocks here,
and I'll give a lift myself; and hark ye, Mr.
Readhear
But the doctor, Captain? the doctor? cried
the stranger.
He is at the house! cried Catherine, eagerly.
We saw him ride there ourselves!
Adzooks! to be sure he is! so Sam told me!
What a fool I was to forget it! exclaimed the
Captain. Come along, up the rocks, double-quick
stepmarch!
The eyes of the stranger sparkled at the
announcement
of surgical assistance being so
unexpectedly
close at hand; for he seemed to have
conceived as sudden a liking to the luckless painter
as had the Captain himself. He raised him tenderly,
and with singular ease, from the ground, and
without
a moment's delay, clambered up the rocky
path that led to the platform. Then striding rapidly
to the treacherous bridge, though encumbered by
a burthen at once so inconvenient and piteous, he
crossed it with a better fate than had distinguished
the attempt of the painter, and, almost before the
others had reached the deserted grave, was
making his way over the shaded path at a pace
that soon promised to carry him out of sight.
Haste, father, dear father! cried Catherine,
to whom the terrible scene of peril and suffering
she had witnessed and almost shared, had given
a new energy, and, indeed, a new nature; haste,
or the man will miss the path, and the young
gentleman
die. Or stayI will climb the hill here,
and run to the house for assistance, and Harriet
will walk faster, and point out the way.
The path is broad, the wild fellow pursues it,
cried Miss Falconer, giving the veteran the
impulse
of her own activity. What could have
brought the young man to the brook? What could
have brought this wild barbarian? Nay, uncle,
what could have brought yourself?
Sam told me, muttered Captain Loring; and
of a thousand broken and confused expressions
that now fell from his lips, all that the maidens
could understand, as they hurried him along, was
that he had met one of his labourers at the
parkgate
,
who had seen them take refuge in the wood,
and was then engaged catching their ponies,
which were running wildly about,that he had
instantly left his carriage, and was seeking them
along the stream, when he heard the shriek of his
daughter. Something else of much more
importance
,
he seemed labouring to give utterance to;
and this being nothing less than the fearful
intelligence
in relation to Colonel Falconer, which he
knew not how to impart, his mind became so
confounded
betwixt fear of its effect upon the lady,
indignation at the outrage, and the thousand other
emotions which were distracting his breast, that
the more he essayed to speak, the more
mysterious
became his expressions; so that the whole
group had reached the door of the mansion, before
a single suspicion of his object had entered the
mind of either Miss Falconer or her friend. He
mingled the oft-repeated name of her father with
that of the dreaded Gilberts, and this again with
Tom Loring's, and the painter's; now he burst
into a frenzy of apprehension lest Catherine, whose
garments were dripping with wet, and, in one or
two places, spotted with blood from the wounds of
Herman, should have suffered as many hurts as the
youth himself, and now he fell into lamentations
over the loss of `that grand picture of Tom
Loring
dying!' which, it seemed not altogether
improbable
,
death might prevent the poor painter ever
attempting.
But if the Captain brought confusion with him
to the mansion, it was evident, at the first glance
Miss Falconer had of it, that the deranging fiend
had been there before him, and still kept
possession
.
The sun was then settinga multitude of
persons, old and young, sallow and sable, were
bustling about in the shadows of the porch, some
running to and fro with burthens in their hands,
others shouting and screaming, or staring about
them in speechless wonder; the carriage stood at
the door, the ancient charioteer sitting whip in
hand, as if expecting orders to start at a moment's
warning, while a smart mulatto in livery was
engaged
strapping a portmanteau behind it. Horses,
saddled and bridled, were hitched to trees, or held
by servants; dogs were barking; pigeons flying
about; and in a word, it seemed as if the
inhabitants
of the Folly, male and female, human and
animals, were one and all preparing, in some
ecstasy
of confusion, to desert its troubled walls.
In the name of heaven, uncle! what means all
this? cried Miss Falconer, recognising in the
livery-servant a personal attendant of her own
father
,
and in the portmanteau which he was
fastening
to the carriage, one of the repositories of her
own womanly vanities.
Before the Captain could answer a word, the
confusion was doubly confounded by the clatter of
hoofs, and in an instant two horsemen in military
apparel, came thundering up the avenue, as if the
lives of a community depended upon their speed.
My brother Henry, as I live! cried the lady,
starting forward. Captain, what
is
the
matter
?
Brother! heavens, brother! what can all this
mean?
At this, one half of the human elements of the
chaos lifted up their voices, and groaned aloud,
Oh, the Gilberts! the bloody Gilberts!
Sister! cried the foremost of the young
soldiers
,
flinging himself from his steed, catching
Miss Falconer in his arms, and speaking with a
manner strangely compounded of horror and
merriment
,they
have been at dad again! but don't
fall into a fitthere's no murder this time! no,
egad, only a few scratches. Don't be alarmed.
Ah, Miss Loring! my dear Miss Catherine!you
look dreadful paledon't be frightenedbeg
pardon
for coming in such a condition. Heard of it,
Harry?(my friend, Brooks,Lieutenant Brooks,
of the troop)knew they'd send for you,bent
out of coursedeflected, made a
detour,
as we
say,to fetch you. Not a moment to losemust
be in town by sunrise, if horse-flesh can carry
us.How d'ye do, Captain? All ready for
marching
?
Yes, all ready, said the Captain, recovering
his tongue. Don't be afraid, Harriet, my dear
Kate, bid your cousin good-bye. No great harm
done,only a little flesh wound that you can stitch
up with your needleby the lord, that's all! Must
VOL. I.K
send you awayfather sent a message after you
must have you to nurse him. Be a good girl,
don't cry; 't an't all bad wounds do damage; saw
many tomahawk-slashes at the fatal field of
Braddock
,
and some got well. Tell the Colonel I'll be
down to see him, and hope to fetch the assassin
along.
The assassin, Captain? cried the young
officer
,
as he leaped upon his horse, his sister having
been already, almost without any exercise of her
own will, thrust into the carriage, and the door
secured. Quick, Phil, you scoundrel, will you
never have done strapping?The assassin,
Captain
!
oh yes, the assassin!Remember the
description
tall man, lantern-jawed, white horse,
with a dappled near fore-leg, a black coat, and
preaches!
Hah! cried Captain Loring, with a shout of
triumph, saw the rascal, and meant to arrest him,
but couldn't stand his sermons! I couldn't, by the
lord!Your horse, Phil! your horse! doctor, I'll
take yours!Whoop, Harry, you dog! down to
the old witch's, and we'll nab him yet!
While the Captain gave utterance to these
expressions
,
he seized upon the nearest horse, and
mounted hima feat, that nothing but the frenzy
of his enthusiasm could have urged him to attempt;
for his infirmity had almost altogether
incapacitated
him from riding, save at the gentlest pace.
But the recollection of the zealous Nehemiah, the
assassin of his friend, now sheltered under a roof
that he fancied, in the ardour of the moment, he
could almost touch with his handand that holy
impostor a villain so notorious and redoubted as
the chief Hawk of the Hollow!the fiery
conception
scattered his years and infirmities to the winds,
and in an instant he was astride the beast of mettle,
galloping over the park at full speed, followed by
the two soldiers, as soon as they comprehended
the meaning of his wordsby the coach, which
the venerable Richard set in motion upon an
impulse
of his ownand by some half a dozen of the
male loungers, some on foot, some on horse, and
all fired with the prospect of capturing a foe so
famous and so deeply abhorred.
The pale gibbering ghosts, that start in affright
at the magical alarum of the early chanticleer,
could not have vanished from their doleful divan
with a more impetuous haste, than did full
two-thirds
of those human beings from the mansion,
who had given such life to it a moment before.
In an instant, as it seemed, the hall was left to
solitude
;
and the rough stranger, who still sustained the
mangled frame of the painter, and had stood staring
in astonishment at a scene so unexpected and
confounding
,
had some reason to fear he was left to
relieve the sufferings of his charge as he could,
and to relieve them alone. A dark frown gathered
over his visage, as he beheld the crowd rush away
almost without bestowing a look upon his piteous
burthen, or upon him; and he was about to
mutter
his indignation aloud, when it was pacified by
a husky voice exclaiming in his ear,
Hum, hah! bless my soul! what, drowned, eh?
is the gentleman drowned? a case of suspended
animation?Hillo, Jingleum, stop! Come back,
Pepperel! 'Pon my soul, 'tis the identical
redjacket
we saw at the Rest! Why, what the devil's
all this?Beg pardon, Miss Loring!Bless my
soul, I hope you ain't hurt? Blood about your
sleeve, and look very pale and nervous! A little
wine, with
Think not of me, doctor, replied Catherine.
Attend to the young gentleman. This dreadful
surprise and the hurry of my fatherit will
explain
all, and excuse all. Aunt Rachel will show
you a chamber: command every thingevery
thing shall be done that you order. Hasten,
doctor
,
pray hasten, and relieve the young gentleman's
sufferings. Gentlemen, pray give your assistance
to this good man, and heavenyes, heaven will
crown your exertions with success!
With these hurried expressions, and still more
earnest gestures, the young lady gave an impulse
to the group now gathered about the wounded
man, and he was immediately carried into the
house and out of her sight.
Oh, Miss Katy,beg pardonthat's to say,
Miss Catherine, cried a buxom, blubbering
damsel
,
whose quavering treble had borne a
distinguished
part in the late din of voices, and who had
no sooner laid eyes on the young lady, which she
did as soon as the tumult was over, than she ran
bustling hysterically to her side,never saw you
in such a pucker! hope we shan't all be murdered.
Such dreadful contractions were never heard of
great big hole in your sleevethe Gilberts all
come to life again, and will murder us as sure as
we live!
Be quiet, Phbecome with me to my
chamber
I
don't think he will die!
Hope not, Miss Katy,that's Miss Catherine;
but they shot him right through the head with a
blunderbush, and slashed him to pieces with a
baggonet
.
Oh, the cruel murders! And Philip, the
yellow boy, saysLor' 'a' mercy! Miss Katy,
what's the matter?
I am sick, Phbe, very sickit will be over
directly. Don't call your motherdon't disturb
any one; let them stay with the young
gentleman
.
With great difficulty, assisted by the girl, whose
station in the house, without being altogether so
exalted as that of an humble companion, was yet,
at least in her own estimation, far removed from
that of a menialthe young lady made her way
to her apartment; when the impulse that had
supported
her energies through a scene of distress for
so long a time, passed away, and was succeeded
by prostration both of mind and bodyby
shuddering
chills and assaults of partial insensibility,
that terminated in fits of weeping, and these again
in deep dejection of spirits, such as of late years
had been a more prevailing characteristic than
any other.
K 2
CHAPTER IX.
Whither shall I go now? O Lucian!to thy ridiculous
purgatory
,to
find Alexander the Great cobbling shoes, Pompey
tagging points, and Julius Csar making hair-buttons,
Hannibal
selling blacking, Augustus crying garlic, Charlemagne
selling lists by the dozen, and King Pepin crying apples in a
cart drawn with one horse?
Then here's an end of me; farewell, daylight;
And, oh! contemptible physic!
Webster
Vittoria Corombona
.
Conducted
by the old woman, an heir-loom
dependant
in the Captain's family, whom Miss Loring
had designated by the familiar and somewhat
endearing
title of Aunt Rachel, the grim-faced
stranger
bore the young painter to a chamber, where
he was laid upon a couch, breathing forth
occasional
groans, but still insensible. His bearer,
having
thus finished what might have been considered
his peculiar charge, lifted up his eyes, and looked
around him, not however with any intention of
departing. On the contrary, his rude indifference
seemed gradually to have melted away, and been
succeeded by an anxious wish to render further
services to the youth, or at least to be assured they
should be rendered by others as capable as
himself
.
He fixed his eyes upon the physician, as if
to determine the amount of his professional ability
by such outward manifestations of wisdom as
might be traced in his visage and person; and the
result was so little to his satisfaction that he
resolved
to remain in the apartment, to give the
physician the benefit of his own counsels.
The man of science, who bore the undignified
name of Merribody, was a youth of twenty-five
or six, though the gravity of his countenance was
worthy a practitioner of fifty. His frame was
short, and roundest in the middle, and his limbs
and neck of conformable brevity and dumpiness.
His face corresponded with his body, being round
as a melon, with features all highly insignificant,
except his nose, which had a short and delicate
pug that gave it some importance. His complexion
had been originally fair, and his locks flaxen; but
a few years' exposure to sun and sleet had
communicated
a certain foxy swarthiness to both, so
that his eyes, which were of a light gray, were
now entirely visible. His eye-brows had
maintained
their original creamy hue; and being the
only part of the countenance possessing any great
mobility, their motions up and down, and to and
fro, were always distinguishable; and indeed they
flitted about under the shadow of his hat, like two
snowy moths entangled in a cobweb. Though no
figure in the world could have been worse
adapted
to purposes of dignity, Dr. Merribody had
thought proper to assume an important air, which
he always preserved, except when irritated out of
his decorum; a circumstance that not unfrequently
happened, owing to a temper naturally testy and
inflammable. His countenance he kept in a
perpetual
frown; and he cultivated an attitude he
thought expressive of professional dignity, in
which his feet were planted as far from one
another
as the length of his legs permitted, his head
thrown back, or rather his chin turned up, for his
neck was too short to allow much liberty to the
temple of the soul, and his hands thrust into his
breeches pockets; in which attitude he presented
a miniature representation of the Rhodian
Colossus
.
He had even bestowed much cultivation upon
his voice, which being of a childish treble, and
therefore highly incompatible with all pretensions
to gravity, he forced it into artificial profundity,
and spoke with a husky, catarrhal tone, a sort of
falsetto bass, exceedingly pompous, and indeed
sometimes majestic. However, the same testy
temper which so often robbed him of his dignity
of carriage, as frequently threw his voice into its
hautboy alto; and on those occasions, he did not
appear to advantage. At the present moment, the
doctor certainly might be said to be in his glory;
for the sight of a patient threw him into the best
humour in the world;and by the presence of his
two friends, without counting the stranger and
Aunt Rachel, he was assured of witnesses to his
skill in a case, which he declared, while trudging
up stairs, to be `exceedingly critical and
interesting
.'
Notwithstanding this favourable condition
of things, however, the man of the red hat
conceived
but a mean opinion of Dr. Merribody's
professional skill; and having eyed him a second
time, without finding any reason to alter his
opinion, he demanded, in no very respectful
terms,
Well now, doctor, here's the man lying half
dead and groaning,what's to be done with
him?
What's to be done? echoed the doctor,
turning
up the cuffs of his coat, throwing out his legs,
and looking important and complaisant together;
Why, sir, we are tobut, hark'e, sir, who are
you? Don't know youthought you was Dan
Potts, the raftsman, but see you a'n't. Who are
you? and what are you doing here? Can't suffer a
crowd in the room; it smothers the air. Must beg
you to decamp, sir. Have plenty assistance,
sir,
Be content, doctor, said the man, drily, but
not roughly. My name is Green, John Green,
the trader; every body knows Green, the York
trader, as they call me. I fished up the young
gentleman;that is, I helped the lady; and I must
see him through his troubles.
Never heard of you, Mr. Green, said the
doctor; but you may stay. You have something
the matter with your eye! Now I don't boast; but
I believe I am good at the eyesI will look at it
directly.
I don't doubt it, doctor, said Mr. Green;
but suppose, instead of talking of my eyes, you
make the best use of your own. Here's the young
man in great suffering.
Oh, ay, said doctor Merribody. The first
thing to be done is to strip the patient, and see
what's the matter with him. Method is the soul
of business. Hurrah, Jingleum; come, off with
his coat,strip it off.
Rip
it off, you mean, said the trader,
touching
the fractured arm significantly, and indeed
somewhat angrily. Of all fools I ever heard of,
those are the greatest who break their arms, when
necks are so much less valuable. Here's his right
arm smashed like a sassafras-bough; and, I reckon,
slipped at the shoulder, too!
Ay! the deuce! you don't say so! a luxation!
cried the physician. Set the old woman to work
with her scissors. Aunt Rachel, my good woman,
rip up this sleeve; and rip it as gingerly as if
every stitch was the nerve of a man's elbow. A
comminuted fracture, I can tell by the feel!
Here, Pepperel, pour some warm water into the
basin, chill it a thought from the ewer, and soak
this rag in it. A very genteel-looking dog, I
protest
!Jingleum,
lay out my pocket-case, tear an
old shirt into bandages two and a half inches wide,
and roll 'em up; and you, Mr. York,that is, Mr.
Green, hand me the crooked scissors there, till I
shave some of the hair from the wound. A devil
of a job, if it turns out a trephine case! We must
send off to town for Dr. Muller and his case of
round sawsI don't object to consult with Dr.
Muller; and if it comes to trephining, why the
sooner we are ready for it the better. Method is
the soul of business!
The cut on the head is but a scratch, said the
trader: I v'e looked at it myself. Goody, rip up
the shirt-sleeve here, or let me do itthere's
blacker work to look at.
Method is the soul of business, cried the
doctor
,
whose spirits were beginning to rise to a
rapture
,
as business thickened on his hand, and who
now raised himself a tip-toe among his temporary
assistants, like a generalissimo surveying the
man
uvres
of his subordinates on a field of battle,
which is perhaps to determine the destinies of a
nation; there's nothing like method! he
ejaculated
.
Aunt Rachel, scrape me a little lint
there are more scratches to be filled.Hah! what!
what the devil's the matter? he cried, as the
trader
,
groaning with sympathy at the sight, tore
away the damp shirt from the shoulder, and
displayed
it deformed and shapeless from luxation.
Bless my soul, what! a dislocation, really, under
the
pectoralis major,
anteriorly luxed! Oh, here's
the devil to pay! Method is the soul of business:
but what method is there in having at once an
arm broke, a shoulder disjointed, a head cracked,
and to be half drowned into the bargain?
Murdering
work, sir! murdering work, sir! murdering work! Where the
deuce can I clap my pulley? and where the deuce,
now I think of it, am I to get one?
A pulley! exclaimed the trader, with scorn
and indignation; a pulley to drag a man's arm
off! Why, where's your fingers? Come, doctor,
now's the time.
Method is the soul of business! exclaimed the
physician, waxing wroth. Are you a doctor, a
surgeon, a gentleman of the profession, Mr.
Whatd'-ye-call-'em
,
that you take it upon you to
instruct
me
what to do? I tell you, sir, a physician
is not to be prescribed his duty, sir; and I allow
no man to interfere with me in my practice, sir!
The strength of this declaration was increased
by its being delivered in the doctor's natural voice,
high and shrill; but it produced little effect on the
obdurate trader.
Come, doctor, said he, I know all about
these matters of broken and disjointed bones, from
the toe up to the top-knot, having had a hand in
making many of them, as a man who has been an
Indian trader, in war-times, may well say. So
take the benefit of my advice; for I intend to give
it.
Then, sir, said Dr. Merribody, with
becoming
indignation, you may take the matter into
your own hands; I wash mine clear of it. I'm not
to be ruled by any ignoramus Indian trader, who,
I believe, is no better than an Indian himself, and
blind of an eye into the bargain; if you are to
dictate
,
you Mr. What-d'-ye-call-'em, I'll have
nothing
to do with the case,if I do I'll be hanged.
No, sir! work away yourself, and kill the patient
as soon as you like: he is at death's door already.
Not at all, said Mr. Green, with a bitter
sneer; if he had been in any danger, I should
have taken the matter up myself. Come, doctor,
he added, more civilly; don't be in a passion,
and don't play the fool. I tell you, if it will be any
satisfaction to you to know, that I, John Green,
simple as I stand here, have seen more wounds
and broken bones than you, and a dozen other
such younkers, will ever have the mending of;
and, for the matter of that, I have seen more
mended
than ever you will see hurt, ay, and helped in
the mending, too,as any man must, who has
traded among Indians. So, come; look to your
duty; the young gentleman will pay you for your
services; and, as he seems to be forlorn-like, with
no better friend at hand, I shall stand by him, to
see he gets the worth of his money.
The amazement with which the insulted leech
listened to these contumelious expressions, was
prodigious, and would have been expressed
otherwise
than by a simple, common-place whew!
had it not been for the dark scowl that clouded the
trader's visage, at the first sign of explosion. It
was a look of more than ordinary resentment or
menace; and, indeed, expressed equal malignance
with the grin of a wild-cat, preparing for the
spring. The terror it struck to the bosom of the
doctor, was communicated to his friends, who
betrayed
at first some inclination to enter into the
controversy, but ended the heroic impulse in
sundry
grumbling murmurs.
A devilish strange fellow as ever I saw!
growled the doctor in the ear of one. A case of
monomania,
sir; he is mad, sir: yes! I see mania
in his eye; he has been hurt on the head, you can
tell by the knocks there, the scars on his
phys'nomy
;
and his eye shows the infirmity. So we
must humour him, sirs, we must humour him.
'Tis the method; and method is the soul of
business
.
Thus apologizing for the surrender of his wrath
and dignity, the surgeon betook himself again to
his patient.
Hum! hah! he cried, laying his fingers on
Herman's wrist,pulse irregular, intermittent.
The struggle between life and deathvery low,
sir, very low!Aunt Rachel, make me half a
dozen mustard-plasters, roast me a dozen bricks,
and get me a coal of fire, to try if there's any
feeling
in him. One dare not bleed with such a pulse
as this.
Green listened with visible impatience to the
physician; and then, with as little consideration as
before, exclaimed,
What needs all these knick-knackeries? Clap
this shoulder into place, and then think of them.
My friend, said the doctor, his indignation
supplying the place of courage, I don't like to
offend the feelings of any man; but you talk like
an ass. Method is the soul of business; and there
is no method in reducing a luxation for a man
hovering
upon the brink of the grave, unless you may
consider the act a method of helping him into it.
No, sir; the violence of the operation would do his
business as expeditiously as a thump over the head
with a tomahawk, which I think, as you are an
Indian trader and fighter, you know something
about. Yes, sir; I'll allow you to be a complete
master of the science of tomahawking, skinning,
and scalping; but when you come to talk of bones
and dislocations, then, sir, I say, in the words of
the Latin poet,
Ne sudor ultra crepidam
I don't
know whether it is
sudor
or
sutor;
but it means,
`Mind your own business.'
I speak of nothing but what I know, replied
Green, impatiently; and I say, now is the time to
fix the bone with the least trouble. Feel the lad's
muscles; they are as loose and limber as a girl's
in a swoon; wait till he opens his eyes, and you
will find them as tough as ash-boughs. So go to
work, doctor; for if you don't,
I
willI have
clapped a bone in place before now. So, doctor,
VOL. I.L
you or John Green, the York trader; and much
good may it do you, when I tell the folks up the
river how I out-doctored you!
The argument was conclusive, and luckily it
was given more in the spirit of persuasion than
command; Dr. Merribody condescended to adopt
the advice of the rude philosopher. As he had
intimated, the muscles of the sufferer were in a
condition so relaxed, that it required but little effort
to restore the bone to its place.
There! it is done! cried the surgeon,
triumphantly
;
but it hurt him like the mischief! He
groaned as if I had been cutting his throat. Now
for the mustard-plasters
Now, if you please, said the trader, for your
lancet; and leave such things for the old women.
The doctor was again offended; but the
interference
of his adviser had effected one desirable
object, and he now thought him worthy of
remonstrance
:
This, my friend, said he, striking his attitude,
sinking his voice to its most majestic depth, and
stretching forth his hand, to give emphasis to the
oration,this is a case of concussion of the brain,
that is, while considered without reference to
other minor injuries, such as the wound, the
fracture
,
and the luxation. In concussion, sir, I would
have you to understand, sir, the practitioner has
to contend, or rather to provide beforehand, sir,
against two insidious and dangerous consequences,
videlicet
depression and inflammation. Ehem, sir!
do you understand that? If you don't, sir, you are
no better than aI won't say numskull, sir,but
something of that sort. Bleeding may undoubtedly
prevent the latter, but it may as certainly
aggravate
the former,it may sink the patient into the
grave,it may send him to the devil,it may
Open his eyes, and so rob the doctor of a
patient
,
said the trader, gruffly. Do you see how
the blood begins to flush over his face? do you
hear how hard he draws his breath? Bleed him,
and he opens his eyes; warm him with bricks, and
plasters, and such stuff, and he will have a
brain-fever
.
Come, doctor, I'll take the blame. If it
should hurt him, why a vein is easier stopped than
a fool's mouth.
Probatum est,
muttered the physician; for
nothing but a gag could do that for one that shall
be nameless.The fellow has some gumption,
though, he muttered to himself. Well, I'll bleed
himbut I
should
like to put Dan Potts, the
raftsman
,
on him, or some such two-fisted fellow, and
have him drubbed for his insolence! yes, I should
like it!
And grinning with the agreeableness of the
fancy, the doctor phlebotomized the patient.
The wisdom of the trader's suggestion was again
shown in the event. The blood, at first merely
oozing in drops from the vein, at last gathered
strength and volume, and the poor painter opened
his eyes, and rolled them wildly from person to
person. The trader surveyed him for a moment
with a much gentler visage than he had hitherto
displayed; then turning to the doctor, he said,
softly, as if to avoid disturbing the patient,
Now you can bind up the broken bone at
leisure
.
Only keep him quiet, and the hurt is
nothing
.
I did not mean to offend you, doctorI
have a rough way with me. Treat the young man
well, and he will soon recover.
With these words, he took up his hat, left the
apartment, and was soon heard stepping from the
porch down to the avenue through the lawn.
An impudent, ignoramus, unconscionable,
rascal
,
with no manners, and half mad! growled the
doctor, giving his indignation full swing.
A wasp-mouthed, sharp-tongued, malicious
savage
!
exclaimed his friends; and even the matron,
who had all the time bustled about, seemingly
regardless
of all conversation that was not specially
directed towards herself, concluded the chorus, by
muttering,
And a man that never goes to meeting, I
warrant
me!
Let's have candles here, Aunt Rachel! cried
the doctor, indulging his importance, in all the joy
of liberation from restraint. It is as dark as
oh! here they come, eh? Hark! there's horses'
feet in the park! They're coming back from the
Rest.Bless my soul! I forgot all about the
murder
and the assassin! Hope they don't bring him
here, slashed all to pieces by the soldiers; work
enough on hand for one surgeon.Only a simple
fracture, after all! Hold the splints here, Jingleum.
Don't be distressed, sir; won't hurt you more than
I can possibly help.
With these words, the surgeon proceeded to tie
up the fractured limb, the painter having
recovered
so far as to be able to wince and groan to the
heart's content of the practitioner. Before the
operation was concluded, Captain Loring came
puffing and blowing into the room, and being
instantly
assailed by the doctor's friends with anxious
questions concerning the result of the late assault
upon the Traveller's Rest, answered in his usual
hurried and broken manner,
Bird flown, adzooksbeat retreat in time,
struck colours, crossed the river; young Brooks
and a posse after him; will have him before
morning
,we
will, by the lord! But, adzooks, here's
my young painter that's to paint me that picture.
Hark ye, Harman What-d'-ye-call-it, my boy, he
exclaimed, taking a seat on the bed-side, and
speaking
with rough hospitality; glad to see your eyes
open. Mean to treat you as well as if you were
my son Tom. How do you feel now, hark ye, my
lad? What the plague sent you tumbling down the
rocks, hah? A mighty stupid trick, that, adzooks!
How d'e do?
The young man's wits were not yet clear
enough to comprehend the question, or to digest
a reply. He merely turned his eyes, with a wild
and ghastly stare, upon the interrogator, and then
rolled them vacantly from one individual of the
company to another. He sighed heavily, and
mumbled a little, as the doctor proceeded to
secure
the splints, but made no resistance.
I don't like that stare, cried the Captain;
he looks as wild out of the eyes as a squeezed
frog; and that's no good sign. I remember me,
Tom Loring stared the same way, when the
doctor
was fishing for the bullet among his ribs. He'll
never live to paint me that picture! He'll die,
doctor
,
won't he?
Can't venture to say, Captain, replied
Merribody
;
a very critical situation, sir, a very
critical
situation. But I never despair, sir; for while
there's life there's hope. My preceptor, the late
celebrated Dr. Bones, of Bucks county, used to tell
his patients, `he never despaired till he heard the
joiners screwing up the coffin.' A very good rule,
that, sir! We'll hope, sir, we'll hope. Pulse very
full and vigorouswill take a little more blood,
and remain a few hours to watch him.
Stay all night, said the Captain; won't let
you go, sir.
As to staying all night, Captain, said the
physician, with an air, I can't say. Must look
to my patients in the villagebut will stay to
tea with great pleasure. Jingleum, hold the
basin!
The practitioner removed the bandage from the
L 2
vein he had before opened, and (the Captain, in
the meanwhile, hobbling out to inquire into the
condition of Catherine,) had soon the pleasure of
seeing his patient recover his wits so far as to be
able to answer questions, though he displayed a
much greater inclination to ask them.
His first demand was, What's the matter?
what ails my head, and my arm? and who are
you all here about me?Oh! ay! he continued,
I rememberthat confounded brook! I vow to
Heaven, I thought I saw a ghost, though 'twas
broad daylight! Heavens! how my shoulder aches,
and my arm, how it twinges! Are you a doctor?
Where's Elsie?
Well, now, I warrant me, doctor, whispered
Aunt Rachel, he begins to wander.
My dear sir, said the physician, I must beg
you to hold your tongue. Take this cooling
draught, and go to sleep; and, for your comfort,
know that you are now in much better quarters
than you could have had at old witch Elsie's.
You are now in Captain Loring's house.
In Captain Loring's! What, Avondale?
Gilbert's
Folly, cried the painter, starting up.
Be quiet, sir, cried Merribody. Lie down,
and keep yourself quiet; or I won't insure your
life two hours.
Nonsense, sir, cried the patient, petulantly.
I will dress, and get me to the Rest forthwith;
and I warn you to take your hand from my
shoulder
;
for, besides that, you hurt me insufferably, I
don't choose to be treated like a prisoner of war,
nor to be quartered on strangers.
I warn you, cried the physician.There!
was there ever such a dolt?Hartshorn,
Jingleum
!
The painter's resolution was greater than his
ability. His struggle to arise upset the little
strength he had remaining, and he fell back almost
immediately in a swoon. When recovered again
from this, he seemed sufficiently sensible of his
impotent
and helpless condition; but was still
reluctant
to remain where he was. He conjured the
doctor to have him carried in a coach, an
arm-chair
,
a cart,in any thing,but certainly to have
him carried to the widow's hovel. Then,
discovering
the physician to be inflexible, he lowered his
tone, consented to remain in the Captain's house,
but implored so earnestly that he should send
immediately
for old Elsie to nurse him, that the
doctor's
heart was moved, and he condescended to
argue the matter:
Sir, said he, I never saw a man with such
ridiculous notions. Mrs. Rachel Jones here is the
best nurse in the world. Old Elsie Bell is a witch
and an ignoramus, and knows no more about
nursing than she does about Greek; and she would
poison you with some quack weed or another. I
never trust these old women, that ramble about
among the woods. And then, sir, what makes you
think she will come to you? Why, sir, it is
notorious
,
she never comes nigh the Folly; they say
she swore an oath, when the Hawks were driven
out, never to cross the threshold again, until they
returned to it. Sir, a lady in this house has as
much as admitted, that the old hag refused to come
to it point-blank, a dozen times over. She won't
come.
Try her, murmured the patient, eagerly.
Say, I conjure her to come to me; tell her I am
sick, dying, and will trust nobody's nursing but
her's. And, hark'e, doctor, where's my waistcoat?
There's a key thereit opens my saddle-bags
that's it! Send it to her; bid her fetch me some
linen, and such things as she thinks I may want.
My life upon it, the good old soul will come. Send
it, doctor, and I'll take all your vile stuff without
grumbling,yes, all you have the conscience to
give me. It is an awful thing to take physic!
Having prevailed thus upon the physician to
send his message and summons to the Rest, though
no one perhaps save himself, expected to see it
followed by the widow in person, he swallowed,
with divers wry faces, the draught repeatedly
offered to him before, groaned heavily once or
twice, and then turning his face towards the wall,
endeavoured to compose himself to sleep, while
the physician and all his attendants, save the
matron
,
Mrs. Jones, stole from the chamber.
CHAPTER X.
The trout within yon wimplin burn
Glides swift, a silver dart,
And safe beneath the shady thorn,
Defies the angler's art:
My life was ance that careless stream,
That wanton trout was I.
Burns.
To the surprise of every individual in the
mansion
,
who had been made acquainted with the
summons sent by the painter to his late hostess, it
was answered in less than an hour by the
appearance
at the door of Elsie herself. She was
followed
by the little negro wench, bearing a bundle
of linen and other apparel, and in a short time was
inducted into the sick chamber, from which she
contrived, before many hours, to expel dame
Rachel
,
whom she had found listening very curiously
to the sleeping murmurs of the sufferer, as well as
all the officious auxiliaries. Indeed, she betrayed
some inclination at first to be as free even with
the physician, who had been easily prevailed upon
to remain all night at the Folly, while his friends
returned to the village; but the young man became
so extremely ill in the course of the night, that she
soon pretermitted her scruples, and was glad to
receive the doctor's assistance in quelling the
threatened brain-fever.
This remarkable repugnance of the old woman
to divide with any one the labours of watching
over the stranger's couch, excited no little surprise
among the domestics, and seemed to them to
attach
a degree of mysterious importance to his
character, which none had dreamed of attaching
before. Long and anxiously, in consequence, did
the good Aunt Rachel and her daughter Phbe, in
the dearth of all better occupation, apply their ears
to the chamber door, and their eyes to the
key-hole
,
in the hope that some murmur of the sick
man, some whisper of his privileged attendants, or
perhaps some movement in the room, might give
a clew to the enigma, of the existence of which
every circumstance now left them still more
strongly convinced. Thus, they persuaded
themselves
that in the delirium, which all night long
oppressed the painter's brain, he was betraying
divers dreadful secrets, not at all to his interest to
be generally known; and they demonstrated also
to their entire satisfaction, that Elsie Bell, who had
acquired by some
witchcraft
or other a complete
knowledge of the young stranger's history, was
imparting it to the physician, coupled with many
injunctions on the one hand, and as many
promises
on the other, of honourable secrecy. Nay,
they both affirmed, in after days, that they
distinctly
heard Dr. Merribody, in reply to some
question or appeal of Elsie, say, with a manner
highly characteristic of his dignified sense of
honour
,
The secrets of the sick room are as sacred
as those of the confessional; and as for a doctor,
Mrs. Bell, why you must know, we are all as mum
as blacksnakes. A snake was the ancient symbol
of physic, you know; because that's an animal
which, if it don't
hold
its tongue, never makes any
great noise with it! They observed, too, as they
surveyed her through the key-hole, that Elsie's
countenance was darkened and troubled in an
unusual
degree; and once, they thought, they saw
her shedding tears. However, they heard and
saw little except what inflamed their curiosity to
an intolerable extent; and, in consequence, they
came within an ace of being caught in the act of
eavesdropping by the physician himself, who came
suddenly out of the room to demand ice to apply
to the patient's head. Luckily, however, the
degree
of trust reposed in him by the widow, as they
supposed, had filled him with uncommon
importance
,
so that he made no remark on discovering
them so near at hand, except to express his
pleasure
;
for, said he, I supposed you were all
sound in bed, and that there would be the devil to
pay to get any out-of-the-way thing that might be
wanted.
Lord love you, doctor, said Aunt Rachel,
why we're all keeping awake, just a-purpose to
be ready and handy; and besides, the young
gentleman
makes an awful groaning and taking on;
and besides, there's my young madam, Miss Katy,
who can't sleep a wink, out of concern for the
young man; and she told me to ask you, doctor,
what you thought of the young man's case, and
whether he'll die or no?
To this the doctor answered, with a look of
great wisdom, `that every thing depended upon
circumstances.'
And besides, doctor, said Phbe, emboldened
by the gracious reply vouchsafed to her mother,
she is mighty curious to know what all these
things is, the young gentleman is talking about?
Sorry it is not consistent with the honour of
the profession to gratify Miss Loring in that
particular
,
replied the physician, with extreme
gravity
.
Must have ice, Mrs. Jones. Mighty
fortunate
I was able to remain all night! You must
bring me ice, Mrs. Jones; and you must just scratch
on the door, to give me warning; and then you
must keep all quiet, and let none approach the
room, unless summoned by myself. And if you can
venture to disturb the Captain, and tell him to turn
over on his side, (the
right
side, mind you,) he won't
snore so hard. Very prejudicial, to sleep on the
back, I assure you! It sets the liver tumbling over
the lungs, and so half smothers one. But let me
have the ice, d'ye hear; and keep all things quiet
in the house.
Notwithstanding the skill, and (what was
perhaps
a less questionable virtue,) the zeal of Dr.
Merribody, and the faithful vigilance of poor Elsie,
the patient continued to grow worse, and was
indeed
,
towards morning, in an alarming situation,
and so remained during the greater part of the
two following days, not a little to the surprise of
the physician, who phlebotomized him with
extreme
liberality, expecting on each occasion to
give the
coup-de-grce
to the disease. The truth
is, the doctor, from having witnessed its efficacy
at first, had grown enamoured of the remedy, and
now applied it, we will not say without judgment,
but entirely without mercy; and had not Elsie at
last rebelled against his blood-thirsty humour, and
resolutely resisted all further encouragement of it,
there is no saying where the matter might have
ended, unless in the grave. However, as the patient
possessed a youthful and vigorous constitution,
capable of withstanding disease and his tyrant
together
,
he was at no time in absolute peril of death;
and being left a little to himself, he began at last to
mend, and in the course of the fourth day was, to
the infinite satisfaction of Captain Loring and his
fair daughter, pronounced entirely out of danger.
His convalescence was rapid, and would perhaps
have been still more so, had it not been for the
pains his hospitable host took to expedite it; for
Captain Loring beset his bed-side from the first
appearance of a favourable symptom, mingling
many joyous congratulations with a thousand
exhortations
and instructions in relation to `that
grand picture of the battle of Brandywine, and
Tom Loring dying!'
From Captain Loring he also learned some of
the particulars of those bustling events, which had
taken place during the evening of his insensibility.
He was much struck with the strange
transformation
of the sanctimonious Nehemiah Poke into no
less a personage than the refugee and assassin,
Oran Gilbert, and was very curious to hear the
particulars of his escape. They were told in a
moment: the pursuers, headed by Lieutenant
Brooks, (young Falconer having proceeded on his
journey with his sister, and the Captain, much the
worse for his gallop, having been forced to return
to the Hall,) had followed across the river, and
continued the search until nightfall rendered it
useless to prolong it. They had, at one time, been
close upon the fugitive's heels, having lighted upon
a pedler, (not, however, Mr. John Green, the Indian
trader, who was safely lodged at the time in the
wounded man's chamber,) to whom the pretended
preacher had sold his old gray horse, or exchanged
it for a better; and from this man they obtained
instructions, which put them in good hopes for
awhile of coming up with him. Night, however,
fell upon them, and the Lieutenant returned to the
right bank of the river, to rejoin his friend and
Miss Falconer, committing the whole charge of
the pursuit to his volunteers, from whom the
fugitive
escaped, having baffled them completely. As
for Mr. Green himself, he left the little inn betimes
on the morning after the accident, and was seen
no more.
In regard to the outrage upon Colonel Falconer,
Herman was informed that it had been committed
in a mode especially daring and audacious. He
was entertaining certain gay and distinguished
VOL. I.M
guests at his villa on the Schuylkill, and had
stepped
for a moment, in search of certain papers, to a
little pavilion, which he had caused to be fitted up
as a study, not sixty paces from the house, where
he was presently found weltering in his blood by
the guests, whom his sudden shrieks had drawn to
the place. The assassin had already vanished,
having added robbery, as Captain Loring averred,
to murder. The sufferer had, however, recognised
his well-known visage, and in the course of the
following
day some traces of him were discovered.
It was found, at least, that a man answering the
description had stolen a horse from a
neighbouring
farmer; and upon this horse, or one very like
him, Mr. Nehemiah Poke, the parson, had been
seen wending his way up the Delaware; and as no
one knew or had ever before heard of this
reverend
gentleman, it was at once supposed that the
assassin had assumed the character as a disguise.
Before this second discovery had been made, a
courier, whom the Captain stumbled upon in the
village, was despatched to Hawk-Hollow, to
recall
Miss Falconer to the city. His intelligence
therefore, though it caused the Captain to arrest
the true offender, was not sufficient to legalize the
capture, especially when this was opposed so
strongly by the zealous exhortations of Nehemiah,
and the discreet remonstrances of the painter.
When Captain Loring remembered the agency of
Hunter in robbing him of his prey, he burst into a
towering passion, and reproached and railed at
him with as little ceremony as he would have done
with his own son, or near kinsman. It was in vain
that Herman pointed out the improbability of a
wild hunter of the hills, like Oran Gilbert, being
able to assume the character of a ranting
preacher
,
and preserve it so well, and endeavoured to
convince him, that, if Nehemiah were really not
the assassin, he must be some other and some
secret enemy. The Captain swore that Colonel
Falconer had no other enemy in the world, and
therefore, of course, Nehemiah, the parson, must
be the identical Oran of the Hollow. This opinion
he maintained with such fury, that the painter, if
indeed he had no stronger reason for holding his
tongue, did not choose to meet it with an argument
derived from his own previous acquaintance with
Nehemiah. He suffered the Captain to have his
own way, and believe what he liked; and, in
consequence
,
the Captain soon dropped the subject
altogether, to take up another that now occupied
his brain, almost to the exclusion of every other.
This was the `picture of the battle of Brandywine,
and Tom Loring dying,' the consideration of
which, and of the painter's ability to execute it to
his liking, was the main cause of the extraordinary
affection he conceived for the youth.
Another piece of information, which the young
man obtained from the Captain, was an account
of the agency of Miss Loring in his deliverance
from the brook, and perhaps from death. He had
turned upon her a despairing eye, at the moment
when, as he was pitching over the fall, she had cast
out the end of the shawl to him; but of this
circumstance
he had retained not the slightest
recollection
,
and indeed, it is more than probable that
his faculties were at that moment in a state of
torpor
.
Not content with this deed of daring
humanity
(for if he had clutched upon the mantle, the
chances were that she would have been jerked
into the torrent after him,) she had plunged among
the boiling eddies below, and thus preserved him
from a second and perhaps greater peril, and all
the time with imminent risk to herself. His
emotions
upon making this discovery, mingled
surprize
and admiration with the gentler sentiment
of gratitude.
Is it possible, he cried, that a young lady
should have such spirit, such presence of mind,
such courage?
Adzooks! said the Captain, setting the matter
to rest at once, is n't she
my
daughter? By the
lord, sir, when my son Tom was but a boy of ten
years, he could trounce all the boys of the
Brandywine
of his own age, and two years older.
So heroic! ejaculated the painter; instead of
committing me to my destiny, with a pathetic
scream, to run at once to my assistance, like an
angel, rather than a woman!
Adzooks, cried Captain Loring, it was no
such thing, when I carried Tom Loring home; for
then she fell to weeping and bewailing; and hark
ye, Herman, my boy, that's the way you must
paint her.
So noble! so benevolent! so humane!
continued
Hunter. Noble impulses are only
produced
in noble spirits.And I really, then, owe my
escape, perhaps my life, to the humanity of this
young lady, to whom I was but a stranger!
Captain, it was the noblest act in the world!
Adzooks, cried the Captain, do you think
so? Why then, by the lord, we'll paint that too!
And, now I think of it, 'twill make a most
excellent
picture! Why, yes,what a fool I was, not
to think of it before! 'Twas very brave of her,
and it shall be painted: You shall stick yourself at
the bottom of the brook, and my Kate Loring
fishing
you out, with Harriet and me on the top of the
rock; and as for that rusty fellow, the pedler, why
you may leave him out.
I am very curious about that man, said
Hunter
;
but 'tis no matter.
Then he fell to musing, and in spite of the noisy
rapture with which the Captain danced about his
bed, filled with the new conception of
immortalizing
paint, of a picture which was to perpetuate
the heroism of his daughter as effectually as the
other was to record the glorious death of his son,
the painter indulged his meditations for a
considerable
time. The result was, first, a perfect
conviction that the sooner he made a due
acknowledgment
of his gratitude the better; and,
secondly
,
that he felt himself strong and well enough to
undertake a duty so pleasing, without further
delay
.
In this opinion Captain Loring coincided
with great satisfaction; and neither the physician
nor his nurse being at hand to restrain him, (for so
soon as he recovered his wits, and began to
amend, they deserted his bed-side, returning only
at stated periods,) he got up and dressed himself
as well as he could, the Captain having in the
meanwhile, descended, to apprize his daughter of
the meditated visit. It was indeed lucky that the
Captain did so; for after the young man had risen,
and caught a view of himself in a mirror, his
resolution melted away like wax in the fire.
Heavens! said he, how villanous I look!
Such lobster eyes, and such lantern-like jaws!
That confounded doctor has bled me like a Turk:
I wonder he did not make a Turl of me in
earnest
,
and leave me with a poll as naked as a
peeled
yam. Truly I am now the
Caballero de la
Triste Figura
, Don Quixotte in good earnest, as
far as looks go; and truly I had better get me to
bed again, and wait a month or two, before
showing
myself to any handsome young lady.
His objections, however, to descend were
overruled
by the Captain, and having been announced
at his own instance, and the young lady having
expressed great satisfaction at the happy change
in his condition, as indicated by a renovation of
strength so unexpected, he was even forced to do
as he proposed, and suffer himself to be conducted
into her presence.
M 2
Miss Loring was evidently surprised and
shocked
by the change in his appearance, which was
still odiously visible, notwithstanding the great
pains he had been at to arrange his battered
person
to advantage. The hair, massed over his
forehead
,
to hide an envious patch, added but little
ornament to his bloodless visage; nor did the
splint on his right arm, the riband-ties of his sleeve
which could not wholly conceal it, and the black
silk sling that supported the arm on his breast,
impart
any peculiar elegance to a person of ghostly
tenuity. However, the surprise of the young lady,
though confirmatory of his own assurances in
relation
to his unprepossessing looks, served the good
purpose of drawing what blood was left in his
body into his cheeks, and thus, for an instant,
removed
one item of deformity.
The little confusion into which he was thrown
by this inauspicious reception, was luckily driven
to flight by the boisterous and triumphant
introduction
immediately commenced by Captain Loring.
Look ye, Catherine, my girl, he cried; here's
my young Herman Hunter, the painter, that you
fished so finely out of the water; and, adzooks, he
says, he'll paint the action for you, as well as your
brother Tom on the Brandywine, and General
George Washington on the fatal field of
Braddock
!
You see how quick we are curing him
begin to have quite an opinion of that fellow,
Merribody!As soon as we get his arm out of the
stocks here, he's to begin. Don't intend to let him
go back to Elsie's; but Elsie's a good nurse,will
say that for her. Have somebody to talk to, now!
Will have cousin Harriet back as soon as possible.
So be civil to my young Herman
What-d'ye-call-it
.
Think he looks very much like my poor Tom!
With such characteristic expressions, the
ancient
soldier dispelled the young man's
embarrassment
;
and Herman now turning his eyes upon the
maiden with a disposition to be pleased, he found,
in her countenance, so much to admire of beauty
both physical and spiritual, that his approbation
added a double emphasis to his expressions.
Indeed
he spoke of her act of heroism, and his own
gratitude, with a warmth and energy of feeling
that, to her own suprise, nearly startled the tears
into her eyes, while they filled the Captain with a
new sense of his daughter's merits.
Adzooks! he cried, in a rapture, he tells the
truth, and he speaks like an honest fellow! 'Twas the
noblest deed in all the world, and 't shall be painted.
Anxious perhaps to escape the praises of her
father, which, as he had a whimsical docility of
temper, might be obtained at any moment,rather
than to avoid those of the guest, which struck her
as being unusually agreeable, Miss Loring
hastened
to protest against all panegyrics, by referring
to the more efficient aid rendered by the trader;
and then, with an attempt at pleasantry, to lead
the conversation still further from herself, she
required
to know `to what mysterious cause of alarm
on Mr. Hunter's part she owed the happy
opportunity
she had enjoyed of playing the heroine?'
You will be astonished, Miss Loring, he replied;
but you were positively the cause yourself.
I? said she. Ah! I understand, she
continued
,
with a smile of infinite mirthyou were
thinking of the assault made by the two dragoons
upon poor Elsie's habitation, which we were so
near taking by storm; and you looked for nothing
less than a repetition of the charge, while you were
at a disadvantage on the narrow bridge!
By no means, said Herman, sharing
somewhat
of her animation, and smilingI really
took you for a spectre; and being of a
superstitious
turn
A spectre! cried Captain Loring; does my
Catherine look like a ghost?
And A spectre! re-echoed Miss Loring,
though with a more serious emphasis.
I had heard, said the young man, that there
was a grave beyond the falls
Adzooks! exclaimed Captain Loring, I never
heard of it.Who's buried there? One of the
Hawks, hah? By the lord, I'll root him uphave
no such villain's bones lying about the place
Father, said Catherine, it is a woman's
grave.Which answer instantly checked the
veteran's rising indignation, and some little
disgust
with which Hunter heard him threaten the
lowly sepulchre with violation.
In truth, resumed the painter, my mind was
affected by the solemn scenery that conducted me to
the burial-place; and when I had reached the bridge,
and, lifting up my eyes, beheld a figure rising, as it
seemed out of the earth, and to all appearance
commanding
me, by menacing gestures (for such, Miss
Loring, was your appearance,) to retire, you may
judge how much my imagination was excited. I
assure you, such was the hallucination of my mind,
that I beheld, even in
your
countenance, the pallied
hues of death, with tears, too, dropping from your
eyes, and such an expression of mingled sorrow
and displeasure, as I thought could exist only on
the visage of a disembodied spirit. In the sudden
alarm produced by such an impression, I forgot
entirely where I was, and so stepped off the
narrow
bridge into that malicious torrent, and
thereby
,
as I may also add, fell under the obligation of
owing you a lifean obligation, which, I assure
you, is of so agreeable a nature, that
If you say so, cried Catherine, perceiving that
her father was preparing for another burst, and
interrupting the speaker with a smile, I shall
undoubtedly expect you to give occasion for some
second display of my heroism, by leaping into the
brook again, as soon as you have recovered your
strength. You have indeed lowered my own vain
estimate of the obligation conferred, by showing
how much I was the cause of your misfortune;
and I now perceive, that I shall not have entirely
atoned for my fault, until you are wholly restored
to health. Allow me therefore to work out my
pardon, by assuming the character of a mentor
and governess.You are yet unfit for the toils of a
courtier, and the exertions of the visit have
already
exhausted your strength. I must command you
back to your chamber, to rest and recruit your
spirits; and to-morrow, if Dr. Merribody consents
to such unusual grace, I will perhaps permit you
to enjoy another half-hour of liberty.You must
obey me, Mr. Hunter; my father is a soldier; and,
in his house, you are under martial law.
The painter would willingly have disputed the
orders of the `Lieutenant-commandant,' (for such
Captain Loring, transported with her military
spirit
,
immediately pronounced his daughter to be,)
but Miss Loring spoke as if she had assumed the
command in earnest; and Hunter admired how so
much firmness could be expressed with so much
pleasantry, and how both these qualities could be
mingled in the same spirit with the maidenly
gentleness
becoming her youthful age. But, indeed,
the young lady had found it convenient to put on
both the former appearances, to terminate an
interview
irksome to herself, and perhaps prejudicial
to the convalescent; for no sooner had he taken
his leave, and her father with him, than she
immediately
walked into the garden, the supervision of
which was the chief delight, and indeed passion,
of her existence, and, sitting down under an
arbour
of honey-suckle and trumpet-flowers,
indulged
herself in a long fit of weeping.
CHAPTER XI.
Ladies' honours
Were ever, in my thoughts, unspotted ermines;
Their good deeds holy temples, where the incense
Burns not to common eyes. Your fears are virtuous,
And so I shall preserve them.
Beaumont and Fletchen.
The
happy constitution which had empowered
the young artist to contend successfully with fever
and phlebotomy, soon enabled him to exchange
his quarters under the Captain's roof for those he
had occupied so short a time in the cottage of
Elsie. This was a change he made with no little
reluctance; for, independent of the superior
comfort
of Gilbert's Folly, there was a charm in the
society of the Captain's daughter, which, with all
the drawback resulting from the addition of the
Captain's company, was not to be replaced by the
attractions of the melancholy widow.
Nevertheless
,
a consciousness that his presence at the
mansion
,
however welcome to its inmates, was, at
best, an intrusion, soon forced itself upon his mind;
he felt that it was highly improper to take
advantage
of the affection of a whimsical old man, and
the kindness of a solitary and almost unprotected
girl; and accordingly he revealed the
determination
he had made to leave them, upon the third
visit he made Miss Loring. His resolution was
however combated with such violent hostility on
the part of the veteran, who commonly devoted
three-fourths of his time to expatiating upon the
subjects of the three great pictures, and with such
agreeable dissuasives on that of the lady, that his
resolves easily melted away, and his sojourn was
prolonged for a week or more beyond the period
of his first visit. At last, however, he grew
ashamed of his effeminate abandonment to an
enjoyment
which he had no right to consider his
own; and one morning, having surveyed himself
in the glass, and discovered with peculiar
satisfaction
,
that his cheek-bones were burying themselves
in their former insignificance, and that his eyes
were twinkling again with their natural sunshine,
he took the sudden resolution of retreating to the
Traveller's Rest that day; and this design, maugre
all the furious opposition of the Captain, he was
strengthened to put into immediate execution, by
the frankly-expressed consent of his fair governor.
Yes, I will go, he soliloquized, in his
chamber
,
to which he had ascended for the purpose of
collecting his scattered moveables; it is plain
enough, the girl is vastly delighted to get rid of
me. `You are now well enough to be released
from captivity.' These were her very words; and
she smiled as she uttered them, as if my discharge
were a deliverance to herself!Well,and why
should it not be? he muttered, after a pause;
Why should my presence be a pleasure to her?
and why should my departure afflict her? and
why should I care whether she be pleased or not?
A girl engaged,betrothed,and betrothed to a
Falconer! Tush, I am a fool. I was a fool to
come hither, too. The devil take the wars, and
the king's commission into the bargain. I will
leave the placeI would my arm were but sound,
and I would leave it to-morrow,ay, I vow I
would!
`Oh, the bonny bright island,'
I wonder she don't sing: for a speaking voice, she
has the richest
soprano,
a
mezzo-soprano,
I think,
I ever heard; it is a positive music, mellow,
rich, and wild, like the hum of a pebble in the air,
darted out of a slinga most delicious, wondrous,
incomprehensible voice. And then her eyes
Death! what care I for her eyes?
`Oh, the bonny bright island'
Pshaw! I would I were home again.Home?
home!
he muttered, with long pauses betwixt
each interjection, and nodding his head the while,
as if surprised at his own reflections. Then, as if
these silent comets of the brain had returned to
the orbit in which they had so lately vapoured, he
resumed,At all events, old Elsie's is not far
off; and in common civility I must call and see
her two or three times.And, besides, I don't
see how I can get off without painting the Captain
`that grand picture of the battle of Brandywine,
and Tom Loring dying.' What an absurd old
fellow
!A
precious picture I should make of it!
Yet I must do something to requite their
kindness
.Kindness!
There's no doubt she saved my
life. The Captain swears, nothing living that gets
into the deep eddy under the fall, can get out
living. His cow lay under there three days. To
think I was so near my head-and-foot-stone! and
to think this girl, this Catherine Loring, saved me
from the destiny of a crumpled-horn! The most
remarkable, fascinating.Ah! the island's the
place for me, after all.
`Oh, the island! the bonny bright island!'
Well, now she's in the garden among the flowers,
and the Captain's taking his siesta. A little
medicine
,
with some of its concomitant starvation, is
quite a good thing for the voice.
During all the time of this soliloquy, the young
man had ever and anon, sometimes insensibly to
himself, been humming the
refrain
of a familiar
air; until at last, being seduced by the sound of
his own voice, and betrayed into a mood of
melody
by his reflections, he gradually fell to
humming
with more confidence; and, finally, supposing
no one to be nigh, he even began to sing, though
in a low voice, the following idle stanzas, that had
been all the time jingling through his brain.
I.
Oh the island! the bonny bright island!
Ah! would I were on it again,
Looking out from the wood-cover'd highland,
To the blue surge that rolls from the main.
How sweet on the white beach to wander,
When the moon shows her face on the sea,
And an eye that is brighter and fonder,
Looks o'er her bright pathway with me!
II.
Oh the island! the bonny bright island!
Never more shall I see it again,
Never look from the wood-covered highland,
To the blue surge that rolls from the main.
Never more shall I walk with the maiden,
On the beach I remember so well:
Farewell to my hope's vanished Eden
Oh my bonny bright island, farewell!
Pshaw,nonsense! he went on, pursuing his
reflections;  `the island, the bonny bright island,'
is a very fine thing, but what do I care about it?
I wonder if Elsie spoke the truth about the match?
If I thought the girl's heart were not in it.Pshaw
again! She is the merriest-hearted creature I ever
saw,only of quick feelings, and strangely
attached
VOL. I.N
to the memory of her brother: her eyes always
fill when the Captain talks of himthe very name
makes the tears start; and good heaven! how
superb
her eyes look, with tears in them! But then the
Captain is poor, and she knows it,bent upon the
match, and she knows that, too; and young
Falconer
is a soldier, and a handsome fellow, and she
knows that, too. And he was here! I wish I had
seen him. He has wealth, tooso have
I;
he is
gay and handsomeI am neither sour nor ugly.
'Sdeath! where am I getting? I will find out, at
least, what are her feelings towards him: if her
heart be not in the match, why then.Could any
man stand by and see such a saint of heaven
bartered
away, sacrificedsold to tears and
captivity
?
Here he fell to musing again, and again his
spirits seeking that vent to melancholy, he began
to hum an air, extremely mournful, the words of
which were in unison with his reflections.
I.
Darkly the wretch that in prison is pining,
Turns to the dim, dismal grating his eye;
Darkly he looks on the day-star that's shining,
The far-soaring eagles that float in the sky,
In the pale cheek, so furrow'd and wet,
The story of anguish is spoken;
The sun of his hope it is set,
The wing of his spirit is broken,
Darkly the wretch, &c,
II.
Heart! in thy dreary captivity heaving,
The fate of the poor, hopeless pris'ner is thine
To look through a grate at the world thou art leaving,
And slowly the long silent sorrow resign.
But the vial is emptied at last,
The bolts have been shot from the quiver,
And the future has buried the past,
With the tears of the captive, for ever.
Heart! in thy dreary, &c.
Having despatched this second madrigal and his
preparations together, he descended into the little
apartment in which Miss Loring was wont to
while away the time in reading, or plying her
needle,which latter employment she often
followed
in company with the girl Phbe and the
matron. On these occasions there commonly
prevailed
a proper degree of female noise and
chatter
;
for which reason such convocations were
strictly forbidden during that portion of the
afternoon
which Captain Loring devoted to napping
not indeed because any sound short of the blast of
a trumpet or the roar of a musket, could disturb
his slumbers, but because his brain was of too
excitable
a nature to sink into repose, so long as a
single vocal murmur came to his ear. Herman
had chosen this period to take his departure, for
the sake of avoiding any altercation with his
violent
host; and he now stepped into the parlour,
which opened into the garden, where he expected
to find the Captain's daughter. However, he had
no sooner entered the apartment, than he saw her
therein, sitting by herself, plying her needle with
unwonted industry, and her eyes filled with tears.
Good heavens! Miss Loring, said he, I hope
nothing has happened?
By no means, she replied, displaying her
countenance frankly, with a smile, and then
proceeding
,
without any embarrassment, to wipe
her eyes. You must know, in the first place,
that I come of a tearful tribe, a very lachrymose
stock, and shed tears very often for no
comprehensible
purpose, except to pass the time; and in
the second place, I have been paying the auditor's
tribute, and rewarding your music with the utmost
stretch of sentimentality,that is to say, by
crying
.
I wonder where you could light upon such
melancholy tunes? But I like the last song
extremely
:
that release from captivity,that
ending
of
`The tears of the captive for ever,'
I should suppose you would have sung that line to
the gay whistle of a blackbird!
I assure you, Miss Loring, said the painter,
my deliverance comes to me with no such spirit
of rejoicing. I am ashamed you overheard me
I thought you were in the garden; I would not
have otherwise presumed to hum so loud.
Oh, I like your singing, I protest; and if you
remain long enough in the valley, I shall claim a
future exertion of the faculty, perhaps even a
serenade
.
But beware of my father; if
he
discovers
this new virtue in you, rest assured, you will have
to sing him Yankee Doodle and God Save Great
Washington, all day long; and this too, she added
with a mirthful smile, without any hope of
escaping
from `that grand picture of the Battle of
Brandywine
andand Tom Loring dying.'Ah, Mr.
Hunter, she said, apologetically, for her eyes
again glistened, and her lip quivered, as she
pronounced
the familiar name, you have perhaps
laughed at my father, perhaps you will laugh at
me, when you behold our usual insanity on the
subject of my brother. But he was one whom it
was not easy to forget,one long to be
remembered
by both sire and sister.But I see you are
displaying your generalship; you intend to beat a
retreat, while the enemy is sleeping. Perhaps you
are wise. Richard will have the carriage ready
in a few moments.
Not so, Miss Loring: I will depart on foot,
like a pilgrim, as will be best. An unlucky jolt in
the carriage over a stone, might bring me under
the tender mercies of the doctor again. And he
touched his wounded arm significantly.
You are right, said Catherine, after a pause.
The distance is short; Richard shall escort you,
for fear of accident; and Phbe and myself will
add to your retinue as far as the park-gate. Do
you really consider yourself equal to the walk?
I do, replied the young man; but pray be
not in such a hurry to discharge me. In a very
few days,perhaps as soon as I am able to
resume
the saddle, I must take up my line of march,
(to borrow your military illustration,) from
Hawk-Hollow
,
with but little expectation,that is, I
think so,of ever seeing it again.
Must you, indeed? I thought you were to
explore
every cliff and brook in the county.
However
,
I cannot blame you. I am afraid my father's
strange conversation about `those grand pictures,'
must annoy you; and you are right to escape.
On the contrary, Miss Loring, said the painter,
I am sincerely desirous to gratify him in that
fancy; and, though sorely convinced of my
inability
to paint him any picture worthy acceptance,
yet, were my arm well, I should do my best to
paint him something; and if I had but a portrait
or miniature of your deceased brother for a few
hours, to secure a likeness
You must not think of it seriously, Mr. Hunter.
It is but a whimsical fancy, which my father will
soon forget. There is no portrait of my brother;
he was but a boy of eighteen, and his likeness was
N 2
never painted. Indeed, I wish it had been, for my
father's sake.
Perhaps I can yet gratify him, said the painter.
I owe you a deep debt of gratitudeI have some
skill in taking likenesses, and sometimes obtain
them, even with but little aid of the sitter. The
Captain has averred that you yourself bear an
extraordinary resemblance to your brother
Perhaps, perhaps, Miss Loring, if you were to
honour me so farthat is to say
Ah! cried Catherine, with sparkling eyes,
I see! Do you think it possible? I am indeed
like my poor brother, if I can trust my own
recollections
.
Do you think it practicable, from
my
visage, to construct a likeness of my brother's?
Then, indeed, I would sit to you, and gladly!
With such a resemblance to begin upon, said
Herman, greatly pleased with the satisfaction of
the young lady, and the help of your
recollections
and criticisms, I do not doubt of success;
and then the pleasure of presenting such a
portrait
!
Of
presenting,
Mr. Hunter! cried Catherine;
we cannot permit you to think of that. We will
not convert your gratitude for a slight hospitality
into an excuse for taxing your professional
exertions
.
Professional, madam? said the other, with
some little petulance; I hope you will not
consider
me a mercenary, hireling dauber?
A dauber, we hope not,mercenary, assuredly
not;and hireling is a word not to be applied to
one who receives payment for any generous
labour
,
said Catherine. If you insist upon
painting
`the grand picture' for nothing, Mr. Hunter,
you will certainly escape from all trouble in
relation
to it. Not even my father would think a
moment
of imposing such an unrecompensed task
upon you, or such dishonour upon himself.
You mortify me, Miss Loring, said Herman:
I can scarce call myself a painter by any thing
more than inclination. If I have adopted the
profession
,
it is not to make my bread by it; and
indeed
I can scarce say, I have adopted it at all.
That is, he added, in some confusion, for
Catherine
regarded him with a look of surpriseIn
short, Miss Loring, it has been my good fortune
to be put above the actual necessity of adopting
this profession, or any other, for my support. I
paint, because I love the art, and have nothing
better to do; it suits my idle habits. I never have
received a recompense for my labour, (you should
have called it my amusement, for such it is,) and
perhaps I never will;not that I scorn recompense
as being degrading, but because I need it not.
The pleasure I feel in the labour is my reward;
and I am doubly rewarded, when my poor sketches
afford pleasure to those whose good opinion I
covet. You have thrown me under obligation,
Miss Loring; and I claim of your generosity, or
if that word will not be permitted, of your justice,
an opportunity to oblige in return.
Your argument is singular, yet almost
conclusive
,
said Catherine, with a pleasant accent,
yet with a more distant air. And so you are no
poor paintera wandering son of geniusafter
all; but a knight of romance, roaming the world
over, with palette for buckler, and brush and
maul-stick in lieu of lance and sword? Really,
you have lost much by the transformation: it was
a great pleasure to me, to think I could patronise
youencourage an unfriended genius. But now
ah! my folly offends you! I beg your pardon; I
will trifle no more.
I am not offended, Miss Loring, said the
youth, who had coloured deeply while she spoke;
but I
did
think your tone satirical, and
indicative
of a suspicion that I was not what I profess
myself to be. Suffer me then to be a poor painter,
as I really am; though not a man in very
restricted
pecuniary circumstances. I confess, that I was
presumptuous, to think youthat is, your father,
would accept any gift at my hands; yet the
persuasion that I had it in my power to give you
that is,
him,
a particular gratification,
emboldened
me to think I might presume to attempt what I
thought a mere simple, allowable compliment.
Pray, Mr. Hunter, said Catherine, say
nothing
more about it. I believe you are right, and
I wrong. We act hereand here she smiled as
merrily as beforeentirely upon impulses and
instincts; and if impulses and instincts be
conformable
,
as doubtless, some day, they will, we
will accept the picture as freely as it is offered.
But I see you are impatient to go;this was a
discovery authorized by no particular symptom of
dissatisfaction on the part of the painter, who, on
the contrary, seemed well pleased to continue the
tte--tte;you are impatient to go, and here
comes Phbe.Phbe, my dear, have the
goodness
to call Richard, to attend Mr. Hunter to
Mrs. Bell's.I am glad to see you walk so firmly,
and look so well.I will positively be your escort
to the gate. It becomes me in my function of
Lieutenant-commandant; and I will dismiss you
with all the honours of war.
Thus speaking, and whiling away the walk with
light and joyous conversation, Miss Loring
conducted
the guest to the park gate; where her eye
suddenly caught sight of a little bush, of no great
beauty of appearance, but exhaling an agreeable
odour. This she instantly began to rob of its
branches, expressing pleasure at the discovery.
It is sweet-fern, she said, in answer to the
painter's question, not very rare, to be sure, but
the first specimen that has come into the paddock
of its own accord; all the rest I planted myself.
Now, sir, this is neither myrtle nor sweet-grass;
but it is good to smell at; and in token that my
extreme hurry to drive you out of my father's
house proceeded from no ill will, but from true
benevolence, and as much friendship as one can
feel at a week's notice, I present you this same
odoriferous plant, and advise you to make a
medicine
of it. It is said to be a fine tonic and cordial;
and, I warrant me, Elsie will know all about it.
I shall apply it to a better use, said the painter,
gaily. You know, it is fern-seed which enables
man to walk invisible.Now, as a knight of
romance
,
I may have need of such a magical
auxiliary.
Oh, if you laugh at me for that, said
Catherine
,
I see there is peace between us.
You could have added but one more
injunction
,
said Herman, to make the gift agreeable.
Had you told me to follow its exampleyou know
it came into the paddock of its own accord!I
should have
Thought me immensely witty, said Catherine.
Certainly, Mr. Hunter, I will expect you to call
upon my father if you remain in the valley; and
certainly, if he do not fetch you to the Folly
tomorrow
,
I shall be vastly astonished. But pray,
sir, she added, observing that the gentleman
looked mortified, and abashed, do not consider
such an invitation necessary. A visiter at
Gilbert's
Folly is too much of a Phnixa
rara avis,
I think you scholars call it,to be turned lightly
away. I wish you, sincerely, a happy and speedy
recovery.Good day, sirI commit you to
Richard's keeping.
With these words she turned from the gate,
plucked another branch from the fern-bush, and
then, with Phbe, pursued her way back to the
house. The painter received her valediction with
much less satisfaction than had been produced by
the fragrant present. He saw her return to the
bush, and then, looking once back, and waving
her hand, resume her steps, walking on towards
the mansion; and he was himself astonished at
the feeling of melancholy that instantly came over
his spirit. What is there in her, he muttered
within the recesses of his bosom, that should
interest
me so strongly? Why should I be
gladdened
by the wave of her hand? why darkened at
once by the turning away of her face?She
is
unhappy after all, whatever skill she may have to
conceal it; and, by heaven, it is a piteous thing to
ponder on. Well, well.Such an admirable
creature
!
so gentle, and yet so firm! so frank, yet so
modest! so merry, yet so dignified! so natural in
manners, yet so refined! so sensitive, yet sensible!
so kind,nay,openly affectionate of disposition,
yet so womanly in all!sure I shall never more see
her equal!
Thus the young man mused, remaining so long
with his eyes following the retreating figure of the
young lady, that Richard, the venerable coachman
so often mentioned before, thought fit to presume
upon the arguments of his age and standing, as a
faithful and highly-prized servant, and interrupt
the meditations of his charge. He first scraped
his feet over the gravelly road, then coughed, then
hemmed, and at last opened his lips, and spoke:
A-well-a, massa Hunta, he said, werry bad
practice this here, 'sposing broken bones in the
open air, 'specially when a gemman are
sickishlike
.
No offence, massa,but why we no go
down to Missus Elsie's?
Right, Richard, let us go, said Hunter,
walking
down the hill, but ever and anon casting his
eye over his shoulder, as long as Miss Loring was
visible, or a single flutter of her garment could be
detected among the green shades of the avenue.
How long have you lived with Captain Loring,
Richard?
Ebber since he wa' born.Wa' a mighty
fine boy, Massa John Loring!
Oh, then you were in the family long before
Miss Catherine was born?
Lorra-golly, yes! said the negro, with a
triumphant
grin; Massa no s'pose young missus
born afo' her fader: Lorra-massy, yaugh!
An excellent, lovely young mistress! said the
painter.
Lorra, massa, yes; a lubly young missus;
and makes lubly fine hoe-cake, if massa Cap'n
would let her.Old Nance taught her, when she
wa' no bigga naw my foot. Massa must know,
old Nance wa'
my
wife Nancy. So't o' nuss'd
young missus Katy, for all what missus Aunt
Rachel
say; always liked old Nance betta, 'case
how? Why old Nance larned her all she knew,
make hoe-cake, corn-cake, johnny-cake, short-cake,
hominy, pie, pone, and cream-cheese.
Well Richard, and so you are to marry her
off, and see her no more?
Golly, massa, yes; what for she young lady, if
no?
And when's the wedding to be, Richard?
Merry times you'll have!
Lorra, massa, don't know. Some says one
day, some anoder. Wa' to been married soon,
but faw the white nigga Gilbert, what cut the
Colonel's throat!
What, so soon? said Herman, feeling a
sudden
thrill run through his frame. Why, Richard,
they were in a hurry, for such young folks. Miss
Catherine is only seventeena very great hurry!
No, massa; long standing 'fair that; and put off,
put off, Lorra knows how long; 'case young missus
says she too young. Lorra-golly! old Nance wa'
but fo'teen o' so; and I reckon there's more naw
all that. An old nigga man, what's brought up a
gemman, knows what's what!
Eh, Richard! you don't say so? You have
the secret then? Come now, my old boy, here's
a dollar. Come, put it in your pocket.
Saddy, massa; God blessa massa!
Well now, Richard, what's the reason the
marriage has been put off?
Golly! massa gib me the dolla' to tell? cried
Richard, looking alarmed.
Certainly, Richard.It's not a long secret, I
hope?
Lorra, massa, can't do dat. Gib back a dolla',
if massa call him back; but no tell on young
missus
.
Brought up a gemman, massa; and no tell
secrets out of the house.
Oh, well, never mind, Richard; keep the
money
;
I did not want to bribe you to tell any thing
improper on your mistress; and I am glad to see
you are so honest. It makes no difference: but
what's the reason your young mistress does not
like the Colonel's son?
Not like Massa Harry? cried the coachman,
in great dismay. Sure old fool Dick no tell
massa dat?
Oh, no; you kept the secret very well. But it
is quite odd the young lady should not like so fine
a young man?
Yes, massa, wery strange; but women's
women
,
massa. Massa Harry werry fine young
man.
Well! muttered the painter to himself, I am
playing an honest gentleman's part with this old
ass, truly! I'll befool him no more. It is true,
then!even this dolt can tell that his mistress is
sacrificed. So young, so fair, so good!I would I
had never seen her.
With such reflections as these, and many others
of a painful nature, the young man continued his
path; and, finally, having come within a short
distance
of the hovel, he discharged his attendant,
and bade him return to the mansion. He then
pursued his way alone, and reaching the solitary
cottage, took possession of his former quarters
with a sigh, a saddened brow, and a spirit no
longer composed and mirthful. The bunch of fern
he placed betwixt two leaves of paper, with as
much care as became the first tribute to an
herbarium
.
VOL. I.O
CHAPTER XII.
Oh, now I see where your ambition points.
Take heed you steer your vessel right, my son:
This calm of heaven, this mermaid's melody,
Into an unseen whirlpool draws you fast,
And, in a moment, sinks you.
Drynen
The Spanish Fryar
.
The
summer had just set in, when the painter
returned to the Traveller's Rest, with the prospect,
so rapid was his convalescence, of being able to
leave the valley within the space of a fortnight.
But week came after week, June exchanged her
green cloak for the golden mantle of July, the
laurels bloomed on the hills, and the fire-flies
twinkled in the evening grass, and still he lingered
among the pleasant solitudes of Hawk-Hollow, as
if unable to tear himself away. This faintness of
purpose, for weekly, at least, he vowed he would
depart, he excused to himself, by pleading the
strong necessity he was under of delighting
Captain
Loring's heart with a picture, which he could
not begin until his arm was released, not only
from the wooden bonds of splints, but from the
weakness resulting from the fracture. Until that
happy period arrived, he was a frequent and
indeed
a welcome visiter at the mansion, his society
being not less agreeable to Catherine than it was
absolutely indispensable to her father. Young as
she was, and with a spirit so gay and frank, there
was much good sense in all Miss Loring's actions;
and this had been doubtless sharpened by the
necessity
,
imposed upon her so early, of playing the
matron in her father's household, and guarding
against the consequences of his many
eccentricities
.
It was this good sense which taught her the
propriety of getting rid of the stranger guest, as
soon as humanity would sanction his expulsion;
and this she had, in part, indirectly confessed to
the party herself, with her usual good-humoured
openness. This being accomplished, and Herman
now assuming his proper station at a distance, and
visiting the house as an avowed favourite of her
father, she felt herself delivered from restraint, and
received him without reserve. His manners and
conversation were at all times those of a
gentleman
;
and this is always enough, in America, to
entitle a stranger, of whom no evil is known or
suspected, to hospitality and respectful
consideration
,
especially at a distance from the larger cities.
That curiosity, which travellers have chosen to
saddle upon Americans as a national
characteristic
,
along with the two or three forms of speech
that have belonged to the mother-land since the
days of Chaucer, is in no country less really
intrusive
than in America. If it be irksome, and, at
times, ludicrously impertinent, it is easily satisfied.
It springs, indeed, not from a suspicious, so much
as an inquisitive, disposition; and is the result of a
certain openness of character, such as arises
under
every democratic government, and is well
known to have prevailed to an extraordinary
extent
among the old Greek republics,
notwithstanding
the proverbial craftiness of individual
character
.
With this curiosity is associated an equal
quantity of credulity; and Americans are very
content to receive the stranger, whose deportment
is at all prepossessing, entirely upon his own
self-recommendations
.
No jealousy accompanies an
introduction made only by accident; and the same
generous confidence is reposed in the new
acquaintance
,
which the bestower will expect, under
similar circumstances, to have lavished upon
himself.
It did not, therefore, enter into the thoughts of
Miss Loring to question Hunter's claims to such
friendly courtesies as were accorded to him; and
if any doubts of the propriety of continuing his
acquaintance had occurred, they must have been
dispelled by a remembrance of the circumstances
under which he was introduced. Her happy
instrumentality
in rescuing him from a dreadful
peril, had given her a right to be interested in his
behalf; and the great pleasure the young man's
society afforded her father, was an additional
argument to banish reserve. The visits of Herman
were therefore received and encouraged; the
young lady's spirits, animated by such
companionship
,
became more elastic and joyous; and
Captain
Loring rejoiced in the painter's acquaintance
as much on her account as his own. Adzooks,
Kate, he was used to exclaim, the young dog
is as good company for you as cousin Harry,
so he often called Miss Falconer, as well as her
brother,and the lord knows how much
better
for me! And then the picture, Kate, adzooks, is'n't
it a charmer! that is to say, it
will be;
but the
young dog won't show it to me.
The picture,` the grand picture of the Battle
of Brandywine, and Tom Loring dying,'had
been at last begun, or rather a drawing in water
colours, meant to represent that double calamity;
and from the few samples of proficiency in his art
which Herman had already shown, the
expectations
of the daughter were almost as agreeably
kindled as those of the parent. The painter had
presented Catherine with a few little sketches from
his port-folio,landscapes, representing views of
Southern scenery, which to her appeared highly
spirited, while to the Captain they seemed sublime,
only that
he
had a perverse facility at seeing
rocks and stumps of trees in groups of kine on the
meadows; and in distant flocks of sheep, nothing
better than so many rambling killdeers on the
barren
upland. Notwithstanding these unlucky
mistakes
,
he conceived so high an opinion of the
artist's ability, that he strenuously urged him to
begin the Battle of Brandywine upon a scale of
magnitude commensurate with the grandeur of
the subject; `He would have it,' he said, `done
magnificently. He would go down to the village,
and buy Ephraim Gall, the tavern-keeper's, big
sign, that had the great Black Bear on it; or he
would have another made just like it; and, he had
no doubt, his young dog Haman,'for the
Captain
could never fall upon his proteg's true
name,`would beat John Smith, the sign-painter,
hollow,'a flight of panegyric that somewhat
nettled
the artist, but vastly diverted Miss Loring.
But the greatest accession to his reputation was
obtained when Herman, as the only means of
securing
a likeness of the Captain's deceased son,
prevailed upon Catherine to sit to him for hers,
and the radiant features beamed at last from the
ivory. The delight with which the Captain seized
upon this happy effort of art, was not merely
boisterous
;
it was obstreperous,nay, uproarious; and
Catherine, laughing and weeping together,
acknowledged
that, in thus enrapturing her father's heart,
the painter had made her his friend for ever.
Now, Captain, said Hunter, with a beaming
eye, now, all I have to do, is to take that sketch
home
Shan't let it go out of my hands! cried
Captain
Loring. Why, it's my Kate herself! Give
up my heart's blood first.
O 2
You shall have it again, Captain; I promise
you that. It is only to copy it, you knowthat
is, to paint the likeness of your son from it.
Shall do no such thingmust do another,
cried Captain Loring; and it required all the
arguments
of the painter, backed by those of Catherine,
to prevail upon the obstinate old man to surrender
the sketch, that it might be devoted to the purpose
for which it was executed.
Thus passed the time of the painter in an
employment
,
which, as much as his conversation,
recommended him to the friendship of two isolated
beings, simple-hearted, guileless, and unsuspicious
of any coming ill. Thus he passed his time,
confiding
and confided inthe gayest, the merriest,
and perhaps the happiest visiter who had ever
been admitted to the privileges of Avondale; yet,
all the time, whether rambling with the frank
maiden
in search of summer flowers to transfer to her
garden, whether listening to the gay music of her
conversation, or gazing, in the exercise of his art,
upon her beautiful features, drinking in a poison
which he felt and feared, yet without knowing the
deep hold it was taking upon his spirit, until the
sudden crash of coming events made him
dreadfully
aware of its influence. He was neither too
young nor too short-sighted to be ignorant of the
impression made on his feelings by each daily
interview
with a maiden so bewitching; no did he
attempt to repress the humiliating consciousness,
that, in thus giving his heart to the affianced bride
of another, he was preparing for himself a
retribution
of pain and penitence, and perhaps of shame.
From the moment in which he discovered himself
treasuring away with such jealous care, the gift of
withering fern,a bagatelle of compliment, which,
he well knew, was only given by Catherine to
remove
a mortification she had inficted,he saw
that he was sporting upon the brink of a precipice
trifling upon some such slippery bridge as that of
fatal memory over the streamlet, from which his
folly might at any moment hurl him. With this
consciousness before him, he perceived the
necessity
of flight, yet fled not, deeming that the power
of escape at the right moment could not be denied
himof taking some antidote with the poison, but
took none, resolving it should be swallowed
thereafter
;
and, in fine, while still thinking that he
resisted
,
or was prepared to resist, when the peril
should become urgent, he gave himself up to the
intoxication of the new passion, and, in reality,
sought every means to augment it.
`When the flame of love is kindled first,
'Tis the fire-fly's light at even,'
the flash of an insect, which one can admire,
without
fearing its power to create a conflagration.
A vague impression that Catherine's want of
affection
for the licensed lover would prevent the
completion
of the marriage contract, gave a sort of
encouragement and hope to his selfishness, which
he interpreted into the more generous sympathy
of one who lamented her hard fate, and desired
only to shield and protect her. In this delusive
thought, in this romantic willingness to watch over
the safety of another, he lingered around the
vortex
of fate, until the ripple became a current, and
the current an impetuous tide, from which there
was no escape, except by exerting his remaining
strength to the utmost. At the very period when
the exertion should have been made, he bore to his
solitary chamber the idol lately completed by his
own hands, and as he gazed upon it, felt that the
moment of salvation had passed by.
Yes, it is now too late, he muttered,
apostrophising
the miniature; I have fooled myself a
second time into the whirlpool; and who,
Catherine
,
will play thy part with me again, and again
save me? It
is
too late; it is too late to retreat,
and now therefore I must go onyet with what
hope go on? With none. She heeds me not, she
dreams not of my folly, she cares not.
Friendship
is the grave of love; and in her friendship my
love is entombed, before it has breathed twice in
existence. I will speak to her, and be derided!
I will confess myself, and be driven from her
presence
!
And this is honourable of me too! to take
advantage of her unsuspicious frankness, her
anxious desire to gratify her father, and steal a
portrait
from her! I saw she doubted the propriety of
sitting; and yet I, by base dissimulation and
affected
indifference, cajoled her to consent. Well, if I
can copy, I can destroy; and if this foolthis
slavethis Falconer wed her, why, then good-by
to the knavery and the folly together! I will tarry,
at least, until I see the privileged woer; and then,
if she like him not, if she recoilnay, if she shed
but a tear of repugnance, may heaven forsake me
if I do notWell, what? Kill him!There
has been enough of that among us already.
Thus murmuring to himself, and expressing
invectives
against his folly, with the usual arguments
for continuing to indulge it, he sat down before a
table, and despite his convictions of the
impropriety
,
if not the meanness of the act, began to copy
the miniature. He laboured assiduously until he
had completed the outline, and then exclaimed,
with a species of reproachful triumph,
Now, foolish father of the best and loveliest!
though you rob me of my labour, yet have I
secured
its counterpart. Send me a thousand leagues
away, and within this dim outline shall my hand
reproduce the image of your sacrifice.But here
come the fools again! Now for a smooth face, a
merry voice, and a frolic with my jolterhead
admirers
.
The vow which the painter had made, when the
doctor and his two friends passed by the widow's
cottage, and smiled at his choice of lodgings, that
he would make them fonder of the Traveller's
Rest than their own village quarters, he had in
part fulfilled. Whatever was his secret and
growing
care, it was yet confined to his own bosom;
and he was altogether of too joyous a
temperament
,
had he even desired to nourish his
melancholy
,
to bear a sad spirit in company. He was
one of those who suffer most, and suffer longest,
by grieving only at intervals, and enjoying
themselves
heartily among friends. The idea of a
continuous
grief, of any duration, at least, is
preposterous
.
The body can live upon the rack only a
few hours, or days; and the spirit's powers of
endurance
are not much greater.
His gay and agreeable manners had strongly
recommended him to the trio; and the two
lawyers
,
having nothing better to do, were wont to
mount their horses, and accompany the doctor on
his professional visitations, which he continued for
some time after the patient had taken refuge
within
the Traveller's Rest; and even after he insisted
upon being cured, they wasted their tediousness
upon him at least twice or thrice a week, in the
way of friendly calls; and he was wont to
entertain
them as well as he could. Of the doctor he
had made a conquest by asking for his bill, and
paying it in good English guineas, a handful of
which coin gave doctor Merribody more sensible
delight than could the bushel of paper with which
he expected to fill his saddle-bags; the amount
charged against the unlucky amateur being some
few thousands of dollars,Continental currency.
One of the doctor's friends, whom he usually
addressed by the familiar title of Jingleum, but
whose real name was Jackson, or Johnson, or
some such unhappy dissyllable, was the poet of the
village, and a bard of renown for at least ten miles
round. Him the painter won by praising his verses,
and what was still more captivating, by singing
them, and what was yet more enslaving, by
requesting
permission to cull all the stanzas of a
cantabile
nature from the long blue-covered
log-books
,
in which Mr. Jingleum had carefully
recorded
his labours. Seeing what a congenial soul
he had found in the painter, Jingleum freely
supplied
his wants, and wrote divers madrigals at his
suggestion, with which Herman charmed the ears
of Miss Loring. The poet soon became his intense
admirer and perpetual visiter; they grew fast
friends, and soon came to regard each other, the
one as the divinest poet, the other as the most
finished singer, under the moon. It would have
been an interesting sight, could one have invaded
the sanctity of the painter's apartment, on such
occasions, to see them together, industriously
fixing
a tune to each affecting ditty,a labour that
was sometimes none of the lightest; and
sometimes
,
when the genius of the bard, as it often did,
chose to disdain the base bonds of metre and
rhythm, and none of the thousand melodies in
their service could be forced or wheedled into
nuptials with his independent verse, they were fain
to betake themselves to their own resources, and
finish the business with such a
quodlibet
as they
could manufacture between them. It was a divine
enjoyment to the poet, when they had at last
succeeded
with any refractory song, to hear his lines
breathed out from the mellow lips of his friend;
for then his poetry seemed as celestial as his
pleasure
.
His bliss, however, was not complete, until
he lighted by accident, one day, in the village, upon
a battered guitar,an instrument of such
venerable
antiquity, that there was not a soul therein who
was able to pronounce for what unheard-of
purpose
such an extraordinary engine had been framed,
until Herman Hunter, swearing it could discourse
most eloquent music, and was
not
a banjo,
managed
,
by dint of much exertion, to fit it up with
fiddle-strings and the savings of some demolished
harpsichord, and set its dumb tongues twangling:
it was not until he heard his rhymes trolled forth
to the clatter of this romantic instrument, that the
joy of the poet mounted to the heaven of ecstasy.
He would sit distilling with delight, while the lips
of his friend warbled over the seraphic lines, and
while his fingers hopped over the amaranthine
strings; and then, sometimes, with a sudden
feeling
of inspiration, he would snatch the lyre, as he
poetically called it, into his own hands, doubtless
expecting an overflow of ineffable harmony from
the mere fulness of his spirit, until warned by the
dreadful dissonance of his touches, and the
remonstrances
of his admirer, he found, however
extraordinary
it seemed, that the drum and the jewsharp
were the only instruments the playing of which
came by nature.
This peculiar friendship betwixt the bard and
the singer it is perhaps necessary here to mention,
in order that it should be understood to whom
should be given the credit of those canzonets sung
by the painter, which seem to have any peculiar
reference
to his own condition. He did not carry his
affection so far as to bestow any of his private
confidence
on the bard; nor did the latter ever suspect
that any call, however urgent, for a ballad
especially
sad and amatory, was to be understood as
indicating a passion deeper than that of the mere
songster. There was little suspiciousness in the
poet's frame, and no scandal-mongers in the
neighbourhood
.
It was indeed the golden age of that
part of the world; although the country was
somewhat
overflowed with paper-money.
It was one result of this generous spirit,
doubtless
,
that caused the story of the resuscitation of a
Hawk of Hawk-Hollow to be so soon forgotten.
The account of the outrage upon Colonel
Falconer
,
as having been perpetrated by Oran Gilbert,
did indeed at first create a considerable sensation;
and many excitable individuals, hearing of the
chase after the fugitive Nehemiah, mounted their
horses, and resumed the trail, the next day, with
the resolution of sifting the mystery to the bottom.
But the trail ended where Lieutenant Brooks had
left it; the raw-boned white horse had passed
through divers hands, and was, in course of time,
supposed to have been recovered by the rightful
owner; but the rider had vanished as if swallowed
up by the earth, or melted into the air, and was
never more heard of. The story died away, or
was remembered only as a jest, which finally
expired
in the vapour of its own silliness. The
reasonable
men laughed at their late fears, and forgot
them.
About the present time, however, there arose a
rumour, no one knew how or why, which created
a new sensation among the credulous and
foreboding
.
It was whispered that a band of tories was
secretly forming among the hills; but where, or
for what purpose, no one pretended to say. It was
a vague and mysterious apprehension, that spread
from person to person, by virtue, perhaps, of its
enigmatic character; for no inquiry could detect
a better reason for its prevalence. As it carried
its contagion further and further, men began again
to talk of the Hawks of Hawk-Hollow; the
refugees
,
in imagination, rose again from their tombs,
and the scalp-hunter stole anew through the
forests
.
The rumour had reached the Traveller's
Rest; but it made little impression on the spirit of
the painter.
He laid aside his drawing in haste, so soon as
he heard that clatter of hoofs in the oaken yard,
which, he thought, betokened the coming of his
friends; and having secured it beyond the reach
of any prying eye, he descended to meet them.
VOL. I.P
CHAPTER XIII.
Unto you, quod I, with all my whole assent,
I will tell trouthe, and you will not bewraye
Unto none other my matter and entent.
Nay, nay, quod he, you shall not see that daye:
Your whole affiaunce and trust well ye may
Into me put; for I shall not vary,
But kepe your councill as a secretary.
Hawes
Pastime of Plesure
.
Instead
of the bard or the physician, Hunter
discovered that the clatter which had interrupted
his secret labours, was caused by the arrival of a
personage entirely unknown, and, as he soon began
to believe, unworthy his notice. He was a stout
but ill-looking man, with a soldier's coat and hat,
both worn and shabby, and Herman inferred at
once, that he was some private from a
disbanded
regiment, returning to the life of industry
and obscurity he had left for the wars. As he
reached the porch, Herman saw that Dancy, the
farmer, who happened to be about the house, was
showing the new guest the way to the stable; and,
however, unprepossessing his appearance, he soon
perceived that he had already struck up a
friendship
with Dancy, who talked and laughed, as they
jogged together round the crag, as if with an old
acquaintance. This set the painter's heart at rest;
and he soon afterwards discovered that the man,
being as humble in his desires as prospects, had
visited the Traveller's Rest less in search of
entertainment
than employment, and had agreed with
the widow, or rather with Dancy, who assumed
the privilege of striking the bargain, to remain and
assist the hireling in the labours of the
approaching
harvest, in consideration of receiving free
quarters
and forage during that period.
In the conversation of such a man it is not to be
supposed the painter could have looked for any
source of interest; and, accordingly, he merely
gave him a glance as he strode away with Dancy,
leading a sorry gelding in his hand, and then took
a seat on the porch by Elsie, whose wheel, as usual,
was droning out its monotonous hum near the door.
Though hand and foot plied their accustomed task
with accuracy and effect, it was evident that the
poor widow's thoughts were not with her
employment
;
on the contrary, she was engaged in
profound
and sorrowful contemplation; and, indeed,
for a sennight past, Herman had observed that her
fits of abstraction were unusually deep and
frequent
.
He sat down at her side, and addressed some
few questions to her in relation to the stranger, but
received such vague and irrelevant answers as
convinced him her meditations were too
engrossing
to be easily broken. He proceeded therefore
without delay to seek some other means of
amusing
his mind; and casting his eyes towards the
distant hall, he was, in a few moments, plunged in
reflections as absorbing, or even more so than her
own. Indeed, his interrogatories, though they did
not immediately rouse the old woman from her
lethargy, served the purpose of interrupting and
distracting her thoughts a little; so that she, by
and by, woke up, and recovered herself so far as
to look round her, and perceive she was not alone
on the porch. She surveyed the young man very
earnestly, until, at last, tears gathered in her eyes,
and her wheel stood still. The sudden ceasing of
the sound at once broke the spell that enchained
the painter's spirit; and looking up to Elsie, he
displayed a countenance on which the turn of
some darker thought had imprinted a character of
sternness, and even fierceness.
Elsie rose up, and stepping towards him, laid
her palsied hand upon his shoulder, saying, in tones
both solemn and impressively appealing,
Drive these thoughts from your bosom, and
now depart. Why should you rest longer in this
place? Your limb is sound, your strength is
restored
;
and now begone, ere the calls of others,
and the anger of your own heart, shall drive you
into acts of blood, which, if you die not among
them, you will live only to repent.
Fear me not, mother, said the youth, with a
faint smile. On this subject, I have told you my
resolution before. I am, at the least, as good an
American as yourself; and whatever may have
been my original loyal and subjugating
propensities
,
I have now not a wish, nay, not a thought, of
playing the enslaver. Nothing on earth shall draw
me into the matter you think of.
Ay, but revenge though! said the widow,
warningly. You are dreaming of him whom
you think you should hate, and thirsting perhaps
for an opportunity to shed his blood?
You are deceived, Elsie. I will never lift my
hand against him, unless in self-defence. God is
the avenger, and, one day, he
will
avenge. I hate,
Elsie, but I will not shed blood.
And why then do you remain? If
he,
whom
neither knife nor bullet can destroy, looks upon
you again, as surely he will, and that perhaps
sooner than you dream of, he will entice you into
his bloody schemes; and though he escape, yet
will you perish.
Into his schemes I will not be enticed, said
Herman; and I rather hope, by argument and
persuasion, to draw him from them.
Argument and persuasion! and these to be
tried on
him?
muttered Elsie, looking around her
as if in dread. When you can argue the wolf
from the neck of the dying deer,when you can
persuade the rattle-snake not to strike the naked
foot that is trampling his back, then may you think
of turning him from his purpose, or changing his
wild and dreadful nature. He will have revenge,
and I know that he will obtain it. Years have
passed by,(how many and how bitter!)the
gray hair has joined with the black, the smooth
brow has turned to the furrowed, but the purpose
of his heart has not grown old and fainted; all is
now as it was, and so will be till the end. Think
not of drawing him to your opinions; but be
certain
he will draw you to his. Go not near him,
avoid him, let him not see you, or speak with
you.
Fear me not, Elsie
I
do
fear you. Alas, young man, trust not
yourself in his power; if he touches you with his
hand, you will fall. God forbid you should be
joined with him in the matter that is coming! I
had rather you were struck down by lightning
where you stand;better were it for you, had you
slept under the Fall of the Grave.
Sure, Elsie, said the young man, there is
nothing so criminal and horrid in the enterprise,
after all. The rescue of a poor captive,a boy,
too, of nineteen years, and the only son of a
doting
and noble mother, condemned to death
unjustly
and perfidiously, (that is a harsh word,
Elsie
!)
to expiate a crime committed by another,
sure, this is an enterprise of humanity rather than
iniquity.
And do you think this is all? cried Elsie. A
P 2
darker project is in his mind, and a darker deed
will be soon accomplished. Why then do you
stay? Have you not seen enough, and mourned
enough? I tell you, when the marriage-day comes,
the wronger will come, and after him the
avenger
;
and who knows what dreadful deeds will be
done, before all is over?
If it be a marriage of blood, said the youth,
why so let it be. They are, I firmly believe,
leading
Catherine Loring like a sheep to the shambles.
If they mean to wed her to young Falconer against
her will, why then, though there should be no other
man in the world to befriend her, I will stand by
her myself;I will, Elsie, he exclaimed,
impetuously
;
and, if Falconer do not at once
surrender
his claims, I will compel him!
What! cried the widow, starting from him
in dismay: What is this I hear? What! you,
have
you
looked at Catherine Loring, then, as a
creature to be loved! Have
you
dared
Nonsense! cried the young man, with a
visage
of flame; I am enslaved to her by gratitude,
and I wish to do her a service. I owe her a life,
Elsie; and I will yield it up ten times over, before
she shall be driven into a marriage she abhors, and
which, I believe, is breaking her heart.
Miserable, insane, cruel young man! cried
the widow, with unexpected energy,and it has
come to this, then? You have repaid her humanity
and kindness, by stealing away her affections from
her betrothed husband, and so making a lot,
sorrowful
enough before, still more wretched! You
have
Hold, Elsie, exclaimed Herman; it is you
who are insane. You told me yourself, she was
averse to the match.And, as to stealing her
affections, If have done no such thingthey are
not so lightly come by. If they were, Elsie,nay,
if they were really mine, Elsie, why should I not
make my claim to them, as well as another? I am
neither poor nor humble, neither degraded nor
corrupted; in all things of worldly good, I am
young Falconer's equal, and perhaps, in some, his
superior.
Ay! cried the widow, with increasing
vehemence
,
and if she smiled, and if that would win
her, you would shoot Harry Falconer through the
brain! Is it not so? This is dreadful! Oh, young
man, begone; remain not a moment longer in the
valley. You will commit a crime worse than
self-destruction
,
and one more hard to pardon!
I will commit no crime, Elsie; and none have
I yet committed. Your anxiety is absurd; and so
is your suspicion. That I have the most friendly
regard for Miss Loring, the most ardent
friendship
,
is true; but as to loving her, Elsie, thatwhy
that is all nonsense.
Perhaps it is, cried the widow, and Heaven
grant it may prove so. But go not near her again,
do not expose yourself to the intoxication of her
society. If not a wrong to yourself, it is an
unkindness
to her. If you talk to her of escaping
from the marriage she hates, and she finds she has
a friend left in the world to aid herah, that
would ruin her! The desire of escape may madden
the wisest.
Fiddlesticks! cried the youth; I have no
such coarse and meddling ways of testifying my
regard; and a presumption of that kind would
banish me from her presence for ever. But, Elsie,
I tell you, I cannot bear the thought of her being
married against her will.
And how can you prevent it? By wedding her
yourself? That cannot be. By breaking her heart?
Yes, there you may succeedit is breaking
already
;
and when you have added one more pang
to it, it will soon cease to suffer. Hearken, young
man; if you persist in this thing, you will be a
villain. Go up to the groveget you to Jessie's
sleeping place; and consider how fast you are
treading in the steps of him who slew her.
I, Elsie! This is extraordinary!
It is true. Both of you were carried, sick and
dying, into the house of a stranger; both of you
were received by guileless and open hearts; and,
when you have gone a little farther in your folly,
it can be perhaps said, that both left sorrow and
death behind them.
Elsie, this is shocking? Do you think me such
a villain as that man?
I do not, said Elsie; if I did,if I thought
you were now, like him before you, plotting, even
in conceit, a wrong to that noble girl,if I thought
this, she added, with singular asperity, I would
put hemlock into your food, though you were the
child of my own sister, and you should die before
morning!
I commend your zeal in the lady's cause, and
will myself endeavour to imitate it. But there, an
end, Elsie; we will talk of this no more. Your
fears are even more groundless than injurious. I
will leave the valley soonperhaps very soon;
and I will murder no one, while I remain in it.
So saying, to end a discussion which was
becoming
disagreeable, he left the house, resolved to
make his way to the scene of his late disaster. In
this resolution he continued, until he reached the
park-gate; when, suddenly observing the flutter of
a white garment under the trees near to the
mansion
,
he turned from his path, and again found
himself in the presence of the Captain's daughter.
And thus it happened with him on the next day,
the next, and again the next; until the little thread
that tangled his spirit had become a web from
which there was no escape, unless by rending
away some of the vital limbs it encircled. He
sang and painted as before; nay, he assailed the
Battle of Brandywine with zeal and industry, and
had advanced so far with the work, before the
occurrence of unlooked-for events chilled his
enthusiasm
and palsied his hand, that he was able to
carry it to the mansion, and exhibit it to the father
and daughter, that he might derive all the
advantage
of their remarks on the most difficult feature
of his subject,that is to say, the figure of the
Captain's deceased son.
In the meanwhile, he confirmed the good
impression
he had long since made on his two friends,
and was indeed admitted to such intimacy with
both, as marked, not only their sense of his merits,
but their own simplicity of character. In the case
of the Captain, he certainly began to fill up the
gap made in his affections by the death of his son;
and as for Catherine, she soon appreciated the
value of a friendship based upon grateful
recollections
,
and, what seemed to her, a delicate and
purely disinterested regard for her weal and
happiness
.
The situation of this unhappy girl,for such,
in truth, she was,was of a nature to engage her
feelings warmly in favour of any one approaching
her with real friendship, as it was also to touch the
sympathies of the discerning and compassionate.
Naught is there under heaven's wide hollownesse,
That moves more dear compassion of mind,
Than beautie brought t' unworthie wretchednesse,
Through envie's snares, or fortune's freaks unkind.
She was still very young, yet old enough to
feel the desolation of her father's house and
fortunes
,
and to be willing to sacrifice her own
happiness to secure that of her parent. At the
very moment when her father became a
beggar
,an
outcast from the home of her nativity,
her charms had won the heart of the young
Falconer,`A lad,' as Captain Loring was
wont to say, `after a man's heart, and a woman's
too;' and the enamoured youth, with his father's
fullest approbation, and indeed warm
encouragement
,
claimed permission to throw himself at her
feet, and received it. Perhaps the consideration
of her father's misfortunes had greater weight
with Catherine than the temptation of wealth and
splendour; and perhaps the indifference of a young
and wholly unoccupied heart had also its share of
influence in determining her decision. It is
certain
,
if she did not consent with alacrity, she did
not refuse so earnestly as to make the Captain
believe
the proposal was otherwise than vastly
agreeable
to her; and, in truth, it was some considerable
time before she began to lament her easy consent,
and to feel that there was merit, because pain, in
the sacrifice. The great youth of the pair (for at
the time of betrothal, the lover was yet in his
minority
,)
had caused the nuptials to be deferred
until
the close of the spring of the present year, but
a short time previous to which the attempt was
made on the life of Colonel Falconer; and that
occurrence had necessarily produced another
postponement
.
In the meanwhile, the maiden had
grown older and reflected more deeply; and the
regrets that began to wake in her spirit, though,
at first, she scarce knew why, became more
frequent
and painful, as fame, or scandal, brought to
her ears stories of wild frolic and dissipation on
the part of her absent lover. These reports, to be
sure, were combated by Miss Falconer, and the
excesses they proclaimed made to appear, as they
always are in the case of the rich and happy, only
the natural outbreakings of a joyous and generous
spirit. But Harriet's skill could not prevent her
friend discovering that the young soldier had little
beside a comely face and a merry temper to
recommend
him to her favour; and perhaps no
circumstance
will sooner prejudice a woman against
a lover, not previously adored, than the discovery
that his mind is inferior to her own. The
passion
of love is a material instinct; the
sentiment
is a
particle of the divinity, and can only exist when
called into action by the breath of spirit. Woman's
love is only deserving the name when it is purely
a sentiment, and based upon reverence for the
idol of her affections. In a word, Catherine found
she was to be wedded to a man she could never
hope to love; and it required her constantly to
keep before her eyes the situation of her father,
himself wholly incapable of retrieving, as he had
been of preserving, his fortunes, to prevent her
openly repining. To him, therefore, she could not
look as a friend, in her difficulty; his affection
could be indeed counted upon, but it could be
exercised in her favour only at the price of his
ruin. As for Miss Falconer, though she loved her
well, she knew that
her
spirit was entirely with
her brother, and that she encouraged, and did all
she could to promote, the match, for his especial
benefit, as a means of weaning him from a gay
and dissolute carrer, which threatened, if not
speedily checked, to terminate in confirmed
profligacy
.
With feelings of this kind constantly weighing
upon her breasta consciousness ever present,
that in the death of an only and beloved brother,
she had lost a friend to whom she might have
unbosomed
herself in grief, and from whom she
might have expected sympathy and relief,it is
not extraordinary that the kindness even of a
stranger, expressed ever with delicacy and
gentleness
,
and uttered not so much in words as
actions, should make a strong and enduring
impression
upon her feelings, and that she should
bestow upon him the frankest evidences of regard.
Ne evil thing she fear'd, ne evil thing she meant.
A circumstanceand it was the only one
which seemed at first to threaten a speedy
interruption
of their good understanding, served in the
end even to strengthen her confidence and
friendship
.
In an unguarded moment, and while under
a strong impulse, the young man alluded to the
approaching nuptials, and that in a manner so
plainly indicative of his knowledge of Catherine's
feelings, and of the sacrifice she was to be
compelled
to make, that she was justly alarmed and
offended. She felt as a woman, that this was an
indecorum and presumption of the most
unpardonable
nature; and the reproof it brought upon
the offender's head, was the stronger for being
mingled with the tears of humiliation. But even
this was forgiven, when several days elapsed
without
bringing the youth back to the mansion, and
she reflected how much his offensive intermeddling
must have been caused by the sympathy she was ever
so glad to possess. She was really rejoiced, when
her father, astounded and concerned, and finally
enraged, at the unaccountable absence of his
favourite, sought him out, and dragged him, almost
by force of arms, to the mansion, and she heard
his footsteps once more sounding on the porch;
and Herman soon perceived that she had
discharged
from her mind all anger, if not all
remembrance
of his ungoverned zeal, and was disposed
to treat him with as much confidence as before.
In truth, she was one of the few we meet in the
world, and perhaps as seldom even in woman as
man, of that angelic quality of spirit, which
mingles
inaptness to take offence with the greatest
readiness to forgive it; and as all he had said was
made offensive not so much by its nature as by
the position of the offender himself, and would
have been proper in the case of a near kinsman
or old and familiar friend, she easily persuaded
herself that the very rudeness was an evidence of
regard, which she did wrong to punish with
severity
.
She never perhaps afterwards smiled with
the same gayety, or conversed with the same
unreserved freedom; but she treated him with
much confidence; one proof of which, from its
singular nature, and the important, though secret,
influence it had upon the young man's conduct, it
is necessary to mention. She took occasion one
afternoon, when her father was sleeping, and her
female
companions were occupied afar-off in various
domestic duties, to call his attention to the subject
of the outrage on Colonel Falconer, with which
as an intimate at Gilbert's Folly, he was, of course
familiar. `She had,' she said `a letter from Miss
Falconer
in relation to the unhappy and mysterious
affair
,
and to certain steps that lady was taking in
consequence
of it. These,' she added, `though of a
singular nature and questionable propriety, she
would not perhaps have presumed to communicate
to another, as they were in a degree confidential,
were they not accompanied by a call upon herself
for co-operation, under circumstances so
perplexing
and embarrassing, that she felt herself at liberty
to ask Mr. Hunter's assistance and advice,the
former for her friend, the latter for herself. She
judged, from many expressions he had let fall, that
Mrs. Bell had made him acquainted, in part at
least, with the history of the Hawks of
Hawk-Hollow
;
for which reason, he would be able to
understand the letter without comments from her.
VOL. I.Q
He had seen one individual who figured
prominently
in the letter; and his opinion and
recollections
of
him
would undoubtedly be acceptable to
Miss Falconer. On the whole, she was persuaded
he could assist her in what she felt to be a
difficulty
;
and perhaps he might be able to suggest
something for the benefit of her friend.'
With this preliminary explanation, she proceeded
to read Miss Falconer's letter, not stopping at
those parts which alluded to the painter himself,
and of which she made diverting use, though here
and there for obvious reasons, altering some of the
expressions, and apologizing for others in a
humorous
way. It may be supposed, and with
justice
,
that she carefully abstained from reading all
those passages in which she was herself spoken
of, in connexion with her affianced lord; and,
indeed
,
the occurrence of these always caused her
lip to quiver, and her finger, tracing the lines as
they occurred, to hasten onward to the next fitting
paragraph.
The letter was to the following effect:
And so Monsieur Red-Jacket is alive and well,
and handsome, and paints, and has a good singing
voice, and is altogether a genteel young personage!
Well now, though I detest his very memory, and
never see a scarlet waistcoat, without thinking of
two galloping fools, and another standing on a
porch grinning, I am quite glad you fished him out
of the river, since you have thereby got such a
conformable well-behaved young man to keep you
company, for lack of a better,the doctor and the
rest of those village noddies being all insufferable,
as I always agreed. If he can really succeed in
obtaining your likeness, retain him in the Hollow
by all means, even if you have to break an arm for
him over again. We must have at least two
copies, one of which will set our beloved Harry
frantic, and the other I will keep myself. The man
may fix his own price; and, besides, I'll patronise
him, though I
do
detest him. Harry shall sit to
him, I assure you; and perhaps I alsojust as I
happen to like himthat is his painting, not
himself
.
Do you remember, as we sat at the
sycamore
tree, I wished him `a harder sleep that night
than he ever had before?' There's something odd
in the coincidence; a hard night he had of it, from
your own account, poor rouge. I only thought of
an old bed and damp sheets, such as I supposed it
likely enough he would find at that old witch's. I will
wish bad luck no more, believing I have some
magical
power that way, which might, sooner or later,
lead me to commit murder. However, I have more
important matter for discoursing on.
Papa is recovering fast; indeed, he was
pronounced
out of danger before I reached him; and
he already talks of banishing me again to the green
fields. To tell the truth, I have grown more
inquisitive
than ever; and it is plain, he is tired of me.
That story, Kate, has set my brain spinning; but
blessed be thou for telling it! There will such
good come of my knowledge as will perhaps
astound
you, and him too.But you shall hear.
The assassin is wrapped round about with
mystery,a most singular doubt. My father is, or
rather
was
, (for he never pronounced the wretch's
name, except in the first moment of confusion and
terror,) positive that the blow was struck by the
Hawk of the Hollow; and who should know
better
?
Yet, I can tell you, there are circumstances
pointing so strongly at another man, that every
body pronounces him guilty, except myself and, I
suppose, papa; and these they are. There was (I
speak of the man as if he were dead, for he seems
to have killed and buried himself,) a certain
vagabond
in our town, called Sterling, or Starling,a
man of much shrewdness, some talent, and
possessing
a degree of rough humour and wit which
made him a favourite with many of our citizens,
some of them quite respectable, and delegates in
Congress. Nobody exactly knew how the man
lived; though it was generally supposed by
gambling
.
An accident of no great importance in
itself
,
revealed the fellow's true character and
occupation
to my father, who forthwith acted as honour
and patriotism commanded him to do. This
Sterling
was a spy,a pensioned spy, whose duty
was to reside at our Congressional head-quarters,
and by cultivating acquaintances among the
honourables
,
pick up as much intelligence in relation
to secret legislation as he could; and there is no
doubt, the villain has laboured so well in his
vocation
,
that the British commander-in-chief has been
often apprised of our intentions as early as our
own leader. It is said that Sterling was once an
actor; they say, he has strong comic talents, but
has a mad conceit he was made to shine in
tragedy
.
He once got up a sort of company in our town,
with the expectation of establishing a theatre.
However
,
his friends all turned upon him the first night,
the piece being tragedy, and laughed and ridiculed,
and finally carried the matter so far as to hiss the
poor wretch off the stage. They say, my brother
Harry (1 believe it was before he entered the
army,) was a ringleader among the hard-hearted
censors.An exemplary youth, he! He was ever
a most incorrigible mischief and plague,
notwithstanding
his excellent heart; and the duel he
fought with his captain last winter, (a warm
friend of his now,) was caused by one of his
freaks of humour.But marriage cures all that,
you know.However, I must speak of Mr.
Sterling
.
My father obtained such proofs of the treason
of the lord of the buskin as might have brought
him to the gallows, and he was thrown into
prison
;
from which, however, he escaped as soon as
was convenient. I think, it happened eleven days
before the outrage was attempted; and long before
that, he was supposed to have succeeded, by
verifying
Shakspeare's words, (that is, by esteeming
the world at large the boards of a theatre, and
playing many parts thereon,) in passing the lines
of the army, and reaching New York in safety.
Indeed, he was, in a week's time, almost forgotten.
But now comes the marvel.
My father had entered the pavilion, (as I wrote
you before,) to get certain papers. They were
the very documents in relation to this man's case,
the proofs of his treasonable practices, &c.,
which were put into papa's hands, when he
volunteered
to conduct the prosecution. The man was
really such a favourite, that all others were quite
cool in the matter, and rather disposed to let him
off, than push matters to extremity, especially as
hostilities were almost over: even Harry
interceded
for him. Papa, however, was determined
to bring him to justice; and therefore volunteered
in the case. He had these very documents in his
hands, when the assassin, (whoever he was,) who
had previously concealed himself in the pavilion,
or stole into it after him, suddenly assailed him;
and, what is curious, it was found, when they
came to examine afterwards, that these papers
had all vanished, together with my father's purse,
and a small-sword which he always kept hanging
up in the study.
The next thing discovered was, that a certain
horse, the property of this Sterling at the time of
his arrest, but which some one had seized upon and
sold, to satisfy some claim or other, had
disappeared
Q 2
from a neighbouring farm, where it was at
pasture
.
The animal being traced, it was found that
he had ambled up the river, supporting the weight
of an individual, who, although assuming to be a
fanatical parson, had so many points of
resemblance
to the original owner of the horse, that it
was immediately affirmed, he could be no other
than Sterling himself, playing off a character of
which he was notoriously fond;a ranting,
canting
parson, as Harry says, being one of the
impersonations
with which he was wont to set the table
in a roar. You know the rest of this man's story;
his sudden appearance at Elsie Bell's, at the very
moment when we were discoursing of the Hawks
under the sycamore;his flight over the river,
and his sudden disappearance. I suppose, he
assumed
some new disguise that deceived the
pursuers
.
These things favour the opinion of the mass, who
will believe nothing less than that the murder was
attempted by Sterling, in revenge of my father's
zeal in bringing his villany to light. But now
remember
,
that papa was the only one who
saw
the
assassin; that he knew the faces of both parties;
and that he affirmed the villain to be Oran Gilbert,
without so much as mentioning Sterling's name.
Can there be any striking resemblance between
the two traitors? Might not a course of
extraordinary
coincidences have assisted the Hawk in
adopting (even without knowing it himself) the
appearance and manner of Sterling in disguise?
Nothing should be thought too incredible in such
a case, for the whole matter is a wonder.
I have not space to mention all I wish, or all I
have learned, that confirms my father's words.
This, however, is certain: Oran Gilbert
is not dead,
but alive, and is engaged
somewhere
upon
some
villany; but where and whatay, there's the rub.
I have received intelligence not to be doubted a
moment, that he was in New York, and that he
left that city, about two months since, on some
secret
enterprise.
Now, Kate, I have little more to tell you,
except
that I have turned thief-taker; that I am
convinced
Oran Gilbert was the midnight assassin,
and is, at this moment, lying in wait in a certain
place, with the expectation of renewing the attack
on my father's life; and that I, weak woman as I
am, have laid a trap for the cruel and remorseless
villain, which may bring the doom he is projecting
for another upon his own head. Don't stare; and
don't say any thing of the matter. You cannot
comprehend the spirit that now inspires me; I am
playing the part of a man, but in a very ladylike
way, and all to guard my father from the knife
that is still outstretched against him. You shall
know all in good timesooner perhaps than you
imagine. It is necessary to my purpose that I
should have a minute description of Gilbert, his
height, figure, eyes, hair, nose, mouth, his age, &c.:
get it of Elsie Bell, and don't let her suspect you
have any object beyond mere simple curiosity.
If we could make the old creature speak, I
warrant
me she could tell us enough of the villain. I
entrust this matter to you. Don't scruple: you
can
deceive as well as any body, when the spirit
of woman seizes you; and the end we have now
in view will excuse a mountain of duplicity. You
can also make inquiries (but, mark you,
not of her
don't let her suspect suspicion,) in relation to the
appearance of the preacher Poke. Your bonny
Red-Jacket, the dauber, can doubtless answer
satisfactorily
on this point, painters being commonly
good observers. As for your father, I interdict all
counselling with him; for, first, his memory is not
to be relied upon, being somewhat dependent upon
his imagination, you know; and secondly, because
we must take no more confidants into the
confederacy
than we can help. Every thing depends
upon secrecy. I long to tell you the whole
matter
,
but dare not
yet
no, not even so much as the
names of my counsellors, auxiliaries, agents, &c.
By the way, did you observe Lieutenant Brooks?
He is very genteel and agreeable, I assure you
and the shrewdest, boldest-witted brain for his
youth I have ever seen. He will attend upon
Harry, and you will adore him.But my third sheet
is out, and so I must conclude.
As for your fourth of July jollification that you
talk of so sentimentally, I hate all such
merry-makings
.
What do I care about Jingleum, and
his orations? Could they find no more reasonable
Demosthenes? And then the folly of dragging up
drums, and cannons, and militia companies, dogs,
horses, and women in their Sunday clothes, to the
sacred solitudes of Hawk-Hollow! Sure, you are
all gone crazy: it is profanation. I should not
wonder if the martial din of the jubilee should bring
a regiment or two from the lines upon you. We
shall see what will come of it.
Addio
Do my bidding, and keep my
counsel
.
Mem
. It is very odd, I forgot the postscript.
The contents of this epistle, as Catherine saw,
greatly surprised, and indeed confounded the
painter
;
and it was some moments before he could
shake off his embarrassment so far as to comment
upon it. `He esteemed it very singular,' he said,
`and very improper, that Miss Falconer should
engage in an enterprise such as she so significantly
hinted at; and he thought she was impelled by a
species of frenzy. Her suspicions, that the assault
upon her father had been committed by a Gilbert,
were ludicrously absurd. How was it possible
her father should, in a single glance, and almost in
darkness, recognise a countenance he had not seen
for more than twenty years? How could it be
believed that such a man, a refugee captain, long
since formally outlawed, should force his way into
the very strong-holds of his enemy, commit a crime
of unexampled daring, and then, with audacity
still more astonishing, direct his steps towards the
district where he was so well known? How
incredible
,
that a man of his wild and stubborn habits
could adopt a disguise so outr as that of
Nehemiah
!
How much more incredible, having taken
such pains to shed a foeman's blood, that he should
have done his work so bunglingly! The idea was
preposterous. Every thing went to show that
Sterling was the assassin; and it was quite
probable
,
nay, it was almost certain, that Nehemiah and
Sterling were one and the same person. He could
not pretend to say, or to know, or to be very
certain
,
of course; but he was sure Nehemiah was an
impostor, much more familiar with tags from
play-books
than scraps from the Bible, and so he had
told the man himself, though not in direct words;
the consequence of which was, that he instantly
took the alarm, crossed the river, and escaped.
As to the request made of Miss Loring in relation
to the information she was expected to obtain of
Mrs. Bell, that was as unworthy of Miss Falconer
as compliance would be on the part of Miss Loring.
It was quite proper, indeed, she should ask Elsie
for information, but not without apprizing her of
the object in view. But even this was needless;
he
had heard Elsie speak of Oran Gilbert's
appearance
,
and he could assure Miss Loring that no two
persons could be more unlike than he and the
ranting
Nehemiah, the one being a man of middle size,
the other a giant. He would advise Miss Falconer
to adopt two measures, which would go farther to
effect her objects, (which, he supposed, were, to
protect her father from future danger, and to
punish his enemy,) than all the witty and
masculine
stratagems in the world. If Oran
Gilbert
were really alive, and within the American
lines, then let her persuade her father to remain
in the city, afar from his dreaded vengeance;
there
he most certainly was safe. To punish the
assassin, application should be made to the British
commander-in-chief at New York; and as the
atrocity was purely of a civil naturea case of
malicious, inexcusable violenceit was highly
probable he would be at once brought to justice.'
With remarks of this kind, which appeared to
her to be founded in good sense, he satisfied
Catherine
that her confidence had not been misplaced
or unprofitable; and the time waxed on, without
causing any abatement of her good opinion, or any
interruption of an intercourse highly agreeable to
her own feelings.
CHAPTER XIV.
I called on Vengeance; at the word
She came.
Sir Eustace Grey
.
The
letter of Miss Falconer contained an
allusion
to an approaching festival, which she
characterized
as a `4th of July jollification.' This day
was already rendered sacred in the affections of
Americans; and the prospect of a speedy and
successful close to the battle of independence had
disposed them, throughout the whole confederacy,
to signalize its recurrence with all the pomp and
glory of observance. The spirit had awakened
even in the precincts of Hawk-Hollow; and the
villagers, taking advantage of the patriotic offers
of Captain Loring, had made extensive
preparations
to celebrate it among the solitudes of that
lovely valley. They assembled in public meeting,
appointed committees of arrangement, purveyors,
marshals, and masters of ceremonies; and that
the occasion might not pass without a due share
of national glorification, they selected an orator,
who, it was universally supposed by all his friends,
would electrify the souls of his auditory by a
display
of impassioned and heaven-inspired
eloquence
.
It happened, however, that the
appointment
of Mr. Jingleum to this honour had disgusted
the adherents of another candidate; and the
consequence
was, that, in the end, there were two
different celebrations, held at different places, one
in the village itself, which being more convenient
to the mass of citizens, was much more numerously
attended than the rival jubilee in the Hollow.
Indeed
,
the spirit of faction running very high, there
were found so many arguments against holding
the convocation at the latter place, that the
current
of public opinion soon set decidedly against
it, and it promised to be quite a failure. It was
indeed but thinly attended; although circumstances
arose to give it an eclat entirely wanting at the
other.
The gentlemen of the committee, finding how
matters were going, redoubled their exertions, and
by adding preparations for a
fle champlre
to
those for the more public object, succeeded in
awakening an interest on the side of the female
portion of the community; so that, as the day
drew nigh, they began to hold up their heads and
boast aloud, that, go the day as it might, the beauty
of the country would be found displayed only in
the valley. The scene of festivity determined upon
was the little promontory at the mouth of
Hawk-Hollow
Run, and the river-bank at its base, where
were such green plots as might have enticed
fairies, as well as mortal women, into the joys of
the dance. A small piece of ordnance was
dragged
upon the promontory; the venerable
habitation
of the fishing-hawks was tumbled about their
ears, and the tall and naked trunk that supported
it, converted into a gigantic flag-staff, from which
the striped banner was seen waving as early as
the afternoon of the 3d. A scaffold some five or
six feet in height was also erected around the
trunk, and a tribune, or orator's desk, with seats
behind it, constructed thereon; the whole forming
a rostrum suitable to the occasion, which the good
taste of the supervisors caused to be canopied and
adorned with branches of laurel, that were also
wreathed around the tree almost to its top. The
whole of the day preceding the celebration was
occupied with these and other preparations, in
most of which the painter contributed his personal
assistance with great zeal. He had consented, after
first flatly refusing the honour, tendered him at the
instance of his friend the poet, to accept the
appointment
of reader of the Declaration, with the
pronouncing of which sacred instrument the
exercises
of such a celebration are always begun; and
although, on many occasions, when his auxiliaries
were all as busily occupied as himself, he betrayed
a strong disposition to desert, and betake himself
to the distant mansion, there was no one, when all
were assembled together under its roof, sharing
the hospitality of the Captain and the smiles of his
daughter, who exhibited a more disinterested
anxiety to hurry all back again to their duties.
The evening came, and the preparations
having
been completed, the bustling Committee-men
mounted their horses, and retreated to the village,
leaving Gilbert's Folly to solitude; for not even
Herman returned to it that evening. But an
unexpected
guest made her appearance, an hour
after night-fall. As Catherine sat musing on the
porch, perhaps moralizing, as she watched the
spark of the fire-fly, now struggling in the moist
grass, now fitting among the oak-boughs, and
traced the resemblance it seemed to figure forth
to the life of man,a tissue of linked light and
darkness,a bolder beam flashed along the park,
the roll of wheels was heard on the gravelled
avenue, and before she had time to wonder or
surmise
,
a carriage stopped at the door, and in a
moment she was clasped in the arms of Miss
Falconer
.
Brava for my dear self! cried the lady; my
generalship is completeI take even my friend
by surprise! Wo therefore to my enemies! for this
VOL. I.R
is a part of my practice.
Eureka! Eureka,
Kate!
as the old philosopher said, when he discovered
what the little fishes knew before him: I have
discovered
the enemy, and to-morrow I will take
him! Never trust me if Congress do not order me
a vote of thanks for my doughty services.
Where's your father?
Sleeping in his arm-chair, replied Catherine,
confounded by the vivacity of her friend's
expressions
;
tired with entertaining so many people,
and being so much on foot; and I believe he would
have gone to bed, except for Mr.that is to say,
Monsieur Red-Jacket.
Hang Monsieur Red-Jacket! cried Harriet,
quickly: If he is here, get rid of him,I've a
thousand things to tell you.Not here, then? but
coming? Shut up the house, and fasten the doors
no admission to any superfluities to-night. And
pa's sleepy, too? Pack him off to bed, dear Kate;
tell him 'tis ten o'clock; or wait till we get the
carriage
away, and all quiet, and don't let him know
of my arrival; we'll surprise him in the morning.
I tell you, you unconscionable girl, I have such a
secret to relate!a secret so big and mighty, that
I have been more than half dead with keeping it
already!
Ardent as were the lady's desires to escape the
welcome of the return for that night, she was
doomed to a disappointment. The bustle of
arrival
broke the Captain's slumbers, and he rushed
into the porch, after a host of domestics bearing
lights, expressing his rapture that `his dear Harry'
had arrived at such a lucky time; For, said he,
we've laid in two hundred and fifty charges for
the six-pounder, and we'll have such a roaring
racket as has never been heard this ten years; and
there's Tom Terry, the trumpeter,was regularly
brought up in the troop school, and blasts a charge
to make your blood boil! and there's the drums
and fifes! and there's my boy Haman to read the
Declaration! and, by the lord, now I think of it,
there's the Battle of Brandywine and Tom Loring
dying! There never was such likenesses painted
by mortal man.
The Captain yawned fearfully while he spoke;
but his enthusiasm was fast dispelling his
drowsiness
.
Miss Falconer groaned in spirit; but
woman's
wit came to her assistance. She imitated
his example, opened her lovely mouth, with an
expressiveness his own could not resist, exclaimed,
Oh, how tired I am! and concluded by vowing
she could not keep her eyes open, but must retire
to rest forthwith. In this manner, she succeeded
in escaping to Catherine's chamber, whence she
immediately expelled both Phbe and her mother,
charging the latter, as the Captain had also
signified
his disposition to retire, to lock up the house,
and admit no visiters to disturb her or her
companion
.
As soon as these instructions were given, she
turned to Catherine, and cried, with extraordinary
eagerness,
The man with the red hat! that fellow that
helped the painter out of the brook,what has
become of him?
I know not, replied Catherine, surprised at
the question.
What! has he never been seen in
Hawk-Hollow
again?
Really, I know notI have never heard: I
suppose not.
Oh, you poor owls! blind birds that you are!
exclaimed Harriet, laughing, yet preserving an
earnest air: I believe, if Beelzebub himself came
riding into the valley, nobody would suspect him
to be a bad Christian, provided he kept his tail in
his coat-pocket. As for the cloven hoof, he might
wear that naked; no one would think of looking
at it. And Gilbert, the Hawk of the Hollow? have
you heard of him no more?
Oh, there is some idle rumour among the
people
,
but I think it foolish. But, Harriet, you got
my letter, with the advice I gave you? You must
know, I had that from a sensible person I was
obliged to take into the secret
Good Heaven! cried Harriet, in alarm, you
have not told any one? Catherine, how could you?
This may ruin all.
I do not know what it is to ruin, Hal; but it
will not ruin by betrayal of the secret. Mr.
Hunter is
Mr. Hunter! exclaimed Harriet, in as much
wonder as dismay. What! Red-Jacket? a
stranger
,
a vagabond dauber, to be made the repository
of such confidence! Really, Kate, you will drive
me mad. How could you be so insane?
These are severe rebukes, Harriet, said Miss
Loring, and perhaps, in my case, they are just
and well deserved; but you will not be so harsh
with Mr. Hunter, when you know him better. He
is a gentleman, Harriet,in every particular, a
high-minded, honourable man. On his good will
and friendly co-operation, I knew I could rely; he
was shrewd, sensible, and had seen one individual
you inquired after; I had no other person to look
to for advice. I acted with my best discretion,
Harriet, and for your sake.
Well, don't pout now, cried Miss Falconer,
throwing her arms round her neck. Soldiers
that is, generals,as Harry vows, are ever
pestilent
scolds; and you must lay my shrewishness to
the door of military impulses. The thing can't be
helped; I don't blame you; if Red-Jacket be really
a sensible fellow, why there is no harm done; and,
as I said before, I'll patronise him; and if the
matter be not blown already, in good truth, he
will not have time left him to do mischief. But
now for my storyand know, Catherine, in the
first place, you are surrounded by cut-throat
tories,by skulking refugees,by the Hawks of
Hawk-Hollow!
Sure, Harriet, you are raving! cried the
Captain's
daughter, in affright.
It is as true as that the stars are shining above
us, said Miss Falconer, her eyes flashing with a
soldier-like fire; and to-morrow, when you look
only for mirth and merry-making, you will perhaps
seeay, Kate,
see
them fight their last battle. It
is well you had me to watch over you, you poor
cowardly mouse; or you might have been scalped
and murdered, a week before your wedding-day.
But all's safe, Kate; so leave trembling, and put
yourself under my protection. To think we had
that blood-stained demon so near to us, when we
were talking about him! Nay, to think we had
him in the house here, and my brother and myself
standing hard by! Truly, Kate, had I known
him, and could have laid my hand on a pistol, I
should have fired it at the audacious monster
though I have no doubt, I should have hit some
one else. That vagabond, malignant-mouthed
villain
with the red hatwho would have dreamed
that blood-coloured covering was on the head of
Oran Gilbert?
Impossible, Harriet! Remember, that he was
in the house here nearly an hour,that Green, the
Indian trader; and at that very moment, the party
was chasing the true murderer beyond the river.
Nonsense! cried Miss Falconer,nonsense
and ignorance together. Listen to my story, and
talk no more of impossibilities.
She then proceeded to relate, that, having
recovered
R 2
from the shock and confusion of mind
produced
by the sudden intelligence of her father's
mishap, she began at once to gather all the
information
she could in relation to the outrage, and
rack her ingenuity to penetrate the mysteries that
attended and followed it. The information
communicated
by Lieutenant Brooks in relation to the
fugitive of the white horse, though it added to the
perplexities of others, threw a gleam of light upon
her active imagination. It has been mentioned
that this young officer, while in full pursuit of
Nehemiah, had lighted upon a certain pedler who
had, but a few hours or moments before,
exchanged
horses with the parson,a piece of traffic
which the trader was then bitterly lamenting; for
though he confessed he had received a reasonable
`boot,' or consideration, he declared he was never
more cheated in his life, the horse being knocked
up and almost wholly worthless, as any one, he
said, might see; he had been thrown off his guard
by the holy character of Nehemiah; for who,
said he, would think of being cheated by a
parson
?
He was very desirous, so great was his
rage at the imposition, to guide the party himself
after the cheat; but his horse being incapable of
keeping up with the others, they were fain to
receive
his instructions, and leave him behind.
Two suspicions instantly entered Miss
Falconer's
brain; first, that in the indignant pedler, the
pursuers had found and suffered to escape, the
very rogue they were seeking; or, (and the second
conjecture seemed to her the more rational,) that
they had lighted on some agent he had despatched
across the river for the purpose of misleading the
avengers, he himself assuming a new disguise, and
boldly remaining in the Hollow, until the hue and
cry were over. She could give no particular
reasons
for turning her suspicions upon the Indian
trader, save that his fierce countenance and
savage
bearing had made a strong impression on her
imagination; and as she did not for a moment
dream that the assassin could be any other than
Oran Gilbert, she was as ready to discover his
identity in the person of Green as in that of
Nehemiah
.
In all this there was evidently, as Catherine
in fact perceived, a degree of confusion and
hallucination
in Miss Falconer's mind. The idea had
seized upon her, and it was impossible to shake her
faith in the conception. It was in vain that
Catherine
urged the impossibility of merging the
gigantic
bulk of Nehemiah in the more moderate
proportions
of the trader. Her mind was made up; on
that persuasion she had governed all her actions;
and the result satisfied her that she was right, as
the events of the morrow would show to the whole
world.
She went on to relate, that, having
communicated
her suspicions to Lieutenant Brooks, as well
as her belief that the bold outlaw would soon gather
about him all the disaffected of the country, and
strike some unexpected blow, that he instantly
declared
his readiness to sift the matter to the
bottom
,
and at once devised a scheme that had
already satisfied himself and his superiors of the
justice of her monitions. A certain private of his
own company, a man of bad character, but of the
most crafty and daring spirit, had been selected as
a fitting instrument; and, after a singular course
of duplicity, which she related at length, had not
only discovered that a band of refugees was
already
formed in those deserted solitudes, but had
intruded
himself among them. He had managed to
communicate with his officers through
her;
he had
discovered that the band, which was scattered in
squads through the country, was actually
commanded
by Oran Gilbert; and though he had never
yet set eyes on this redoubtable chief, he had heard
and communicated enough to prove that he and
John Green the trader were one and the same
person. He had discovered, also, that one object
of the rising was to be the rescue of young Asgill,
the British guardsman, then under peril of
suffering
,
by the mere law of retaliation, for the
execution
of Captain Huddy, mentioned in a previous
chapter; after which was accomplished, (and until
then no danger was to be apprehended,) he did not
doubt they would begin to burn and murder,
according
to the usual system of tory tactics. One
effort had been already made by the desperate
partisan, single-handed, to rescue the young
prisoner
,
while riding out on parole; and this was
only defeated by Asgill's firm refusal to dishonour
the pledge he had given his enemies. It was
designed
therefore to carry him away by force,
which might easily have been done, so much
license
being allowed him in riding out for exercise,
had not the communications of Parker (for such
was the bold agent's name,) put the keepers on
their guard. By the same hands, she had been
informed of one haunt of the outlaws, at which
Parker was himself posted, and where he pledged
his soul to yield up the tory captain on the day of
the approaching festival, provided the instructions
he gave should be implicitly followed by his
officers
.
She then drew, from among divers other
mystic-looking
documents, a scrap of dirty and crumpled
paper, which she declared, with a laugh, was the
last epistle she had received from her new and
highly esteemed correspondent, which was as
extraordinary
in style of writing as in appearance,
being obviously the production of a rude and
illiterate
soldier, making unusual efforts at
composition
on account of the dignity of the
correspondence
and the character of the correspondent. It
began by styling Miss Falconer `Honourable
madam
to command,' and ended, after a postscript,
in which he showed a discreet regard for his own
safety, by cautioning the lady to `let all the boys
on duty remember the two rabbit-tails he was to
wear in his hat,'`as a sign for to be known by,
and not shot at by accident; for, these vagabond
refugees being uncommon crusty cut-throats, there
was no use in being banged at on both sides,'
and by `hoping, as before, that her honourable
madam was well, and begging her pardon for
singing a soldier's song,
`God bless George Washington, God dn the King!'
and was dated on the `29th June, if I reckon right,
in the year of our Lord, Anno Domini, 1782.'
It was stated in this precious epistle, that the
different squads were to meet on the 4th July, at a
general rendezvous within seven miles of Elsie
Bell's tavern; but for what purpose he could not
divine; they were, however, to meet their captain
there. The place he could not describe; but as
he was ordered, with six others, to take post in it
two or three days before the 4th, he promised, on
the night of the 3d, to deposite a letter containing
a full description of the place, together with his final
instructions, at a certain spot near the park-gate,
which he described with a soldier's precision.
There was much other matter in the scrawl,
which Catherine only read so far as to satisfy
herself that this bold traitor had laid a scheme for
surrounding the whole lurking party; and Harriet
assured her, that his advice had been followed to a
letter, that, at that very hour, a strong force was
marching thitherward from the army, and would
be, by sunrise, perhaps earlier, in command of all
the escapes from Hawk-Hollow.
Besides this, she cried with triumph, you
will see some visiters among the feasters you have
not dreamed of,Harry himself, Mr. Brooks, and
Captain Caliver, at least,to receive the
instructions
of the last letter.
That,
Kate, we will seek
at the dawn of day: see how methodically my
martial swain discourses of the place of deposit:
`It's a spot you can't miss,but to be certain,
you should start from the middle of the gate,
facing right towards the house,march nineteen
steps, then halt, face to the left, dress, and fetch
five steps and a half more, which fetches you to a
bush that has a sweet smell, with long leaves,
notched like a saw,'
My bush of sweet fern, as I live! cried
Catherine
,
in whom the revealments of her friend had
produced an agitation bordering on terror.
Do you know it, then? Good luck to my
trusty Parker, knave though he be. I have
promised
him a hundred guineas for his services;
and, o' my word, I'll make papa double them.
Can't you lead me to the bush to-night? But no
he may not yet have sought it out, and the sight
of persons stirring in the park might frighten him
away. Come, Kate, out with the light; we must
sleep fast, and be up early: I will rouse you at the
first gray streak of the dawning, I warrant me;
for I shall be dreaming of the matter all night.
Oh, that letter! that letter! if a maiden adoring
looks for the billets of her swain with more anxious
impatience than I do for honest Parker's greasy
hieroglyphics, sure am I, I should myself soon die
of expectation, so soon as I got me a wooer. Oh,
lack-a-day, Kate, kiss me, and good night; for I
think we have talked evening into midnight.
Anxious as was the lady's desire to fall
instantly
asleep, she was doomed to a disappointment.
Scarce had she murmured out the last good night
in the arms of her friend, when a sudden strain of
music woke in the outer air, mingling the jangling
of strings with the hum of a thousand nocturnal
insects, flitting among the trees. Surprised, nay,
almost startled at the sound of a guitar (for such
her practised ear instantly knew the instrument to
be,) in a region so remote and unsentimental, she
raised her head from the pillow, and had soon the
satisfaction of hearing an agreeable voice, manly
yet capable of much tenderness of expression, added
to the instrument.
Oho, Kate, said she, do you hear that? Now
suppose my mad confederates should have stolen
a march upon me, and, in their zeal, made the
dawn of the 4th out of the midnight of the 3d?
They say, Mr. Brooks sings well and playsbut,
foh! I never heard that voice beforeI was
dreaming
.
Listen!
She held her peace, and hearkening with no
little curiosity, was able to distinguish (a window
of the chamber having been left open to admit the
balmy night-air,) the words of the following little
serenade.
THE WHIPPOORWILL.
I.
Sleep, sleep! be thine the sleep that throws
Elysium o'er the soul's repose,
Without a dream, save such as wind,
Like midnight angels, through the mind;
While I am watching on the hill,
I, and the wailing whippoorwill.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.
II.
Sleep, sleep! and once again I'll tell
The oft-pronounced, yet vain, farewell:
Such should his word, oh maiden, be,
Who lifts the fated eye to thee;
Such should it be, before the chain
That wraps his spirit, binds his brain.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.
III.
Sleep, sleep! the ship has left the shore,
The steed awaits his lord no more;
His lord still madly lingers by
The fatal maid he cannot fly,
And thrids the wood, and climbs the hill,
He and the wailing whippoorwill.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.
IV.
Sleep, sleep! the morrow hastens on;
Then shall the wailing slave be gone,
Flitting the hill-top far, for fear
The sounds of joy may reach his car;
The sounds of joy!the hollow knell
Pealed from the mocking chaple-bell.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.
Mighty well! exclaimed Miss Falconer, so
soon as the roundelay was finished. That is one
of Jingleum's madrigals, I dare be sworn; for
there's the `ship' and the `steed' in it; and I never
yet saw or heard of one of his compositions that
had not a touch of salt water and the saddle.
And so the dear ape has got to singing, has he?
and he mourns the merry marriage-bell, the
goose-cap
!
Really, I had no idea the youth had so good
a voice.
You are mistaken, said Catherine, who, Miss
Falconer almost suspected, was asleep, for she did
not lift her head from the pillow, and rather
muttered
out the words than spoke,it is the young
gentleman,Mr. Hunter.
Hah, indeed! cried Harriet, quickly: And
he
has got to chains and chapel-bells, too? But,
pho, I forgot you told me about his singing. This
serenading, though, is somewhat presumptuous.
Well now, good youth, get you gone, and let us to
our slumbers. I'll rouse you, Kate, I warrant me.
Why, good heaven, what is the matter? Crying
again, Catherine! Sure, if I spoke roughly to you,
Kate, I did not mean to offend you; and you must
remember, it was on my father's account I became
so suspicious, and averse to strange advisers and
confidants.
She did not doubt that Catherine was brooding
over her former hasty and reproachful
expressions
;
and she knew her too well to be surprised,
when the maiden replied to her apology only by
flinging her arms round her neck, and sobbing on
her bosom. Before she could attempt to soothe
her, the serenader again struck his instrument, and
began chanting a melody of extreme sadness, but
to words of such mystical purport, that they
instantly
engaged her whole attention, in an eager
desire to penetrate their meaning.
Shall I speak it to the night-wind?
Shall I breathe it to the sky?
It is spoken in a whisper,
It is uttered in a sigh:
And the sigh shall be the saddest,
And the whisper shall be low,
Like the sound of hidden runlets,
In their melancholy flow.
There's a sigh comes on the west wind
Hark! it rustles through the leaves,
Like the moan
But here the artist abruptly ceased singing; his
VOL. I.s
voice and the sound of the instrument were as
suddenly hushed as if annihilation had on the
instant
rapt him into the world of spirits. Miss
Falconer sprang from bed, and ran to the window,
hoping to discover the cause of so extraordinary
an interruption, but without any success. A sable
cloud, gradually stealing up from the west, and
at intervals glimmering with faint flashes of
lightning
,
had invested the heavens, and all was
darkness
,
especially under the lime-trees near the
window, from which the music proceeded. She
thought, at first, that she heard the murmuring of
voices, as if the singer had been arrested in his
task by the coming of a second individual; but
they were low, and so mingled with the rustling of
leaves, that she doubted if her ears had not
deceived
her. She peered through the curtains and
the vines that encircled the window, into the
darkness
,
without being able to detect any thing like a
moving figure; and she listened with as little effect
for the sound of voices or foot-steps. Whatever
had brought the serenade to so abrupt a close, it
was certain that it was over, and that the singer
had departed.
Perhaps, she said, as she again threw herself
into the couch, the tender youth is afraid of the
rain; and in truth, there was a drop fell upon my
hand. So much for spoiling a lady's rest, good
Red Jacket! I hope he may get a ducking before
he reaches the hovel. This is rather an odd sort
of a man for a painter. Good night, Katenow
we will sleep in comfort and quiet.
CHAPTER XV.
I do not like thee, Doctor Fell;
The reason why I cannot tell,
But I don't like thee, Doctor Fell.
Anxiety,
expectation, and perhaps an unusual
degree of restlessness on the part of her friend,
who soon fell asleep, kept Miss Falconer awake
until a very late hour; and when she opened her
eyes, after a short and uneasy slumber, she found
a streak of sunshine playing on the window
curtains
.
She started up hastily, yet so softly as not
to discompose the Captain's daughter, with regard
to whom she seemed to have altered all her
resolutions
.
She arrayed herself with such celerity
and silence as indicated a desire to escape while
Catherine yet slumbered; and indeed it appeared,
that, so far as the sleeping maiden was concerned,
Miss Falconer had changed her feelings, as well
as designs. She eyed Catherine occasionally with
a countenance on which suspicion seemed
struggling
with anger; and when she had completed
her toilet, she stole up to the bedside, and
surveyed
her with a look of anger, which was the more
extraordinary as Catherine, at that moment,
presented
an appearance of the most attractive and,
in fact, seraphic beauty. Her hands were clasped
together under her chin, as if some thought of
rapture were shining through her spirit; a smile
of such delight as can only come from a heart
both guileless and happy, beamed from her visage;
her lips moved, as if breathing the accents of joy,
though no sound came from them; and the tears
that stole from beneath the closed eyelids, were
evidently shed in pleasure, not sorrow. Miss
Falconer's
countenance darkened, as she gazed; but
she gazed only for a moment; and soon stealing
from the bedside, she crept out of the chamber.
The rattling of the latch, as the door closed,
dispelled
the dream of delight, and Catherine instantly
arose, and prepared to follow her friend, whom
she had in vain called after to return. Miss
Falconer
had already left the house, and long before
Catherine reached her, she saw that she had found
her way to the memorable bush of fern. She saw
also, without explanation from her friend, that
some singular accident had defeated, at the very
moment of its accomplishment, the plan so subtly
laid and so zealously pursued. No letter or scrap
of any kind was found in the appointed place; yet
it was evident the bush had been visited by at least
one, perhaps by two persons, in the course of the
night. It was deranged and torn; two flat stones
were found lying at its roots, which Miss Falconer
did not doubt had been designed to protect the
paper from the dews of the night, as well as the
eyes of passers-by; and there were foot-prints in
the grass, some of which were very distinct,
haveing
been left since a light rain, that had fallen
during the night.
The chagrin and dismay of Miss Falconer at
this unlooked for termination of her hopes,
entirely
drove from her mind the recollection of her
late displeasure, together with its secret cause.
She wondered and lamented, and devised a
thousand
suppositions for explaining the phenomenon,
but without satisfying herself. Was it possible the
treachery of her agent could have been discovered
by his comrades, at the very moment of its
consummation
?
Could such a discovery have been
made by accident, and in the dead of the night?
What now was she to do? how supply the
information
of which she had been robbed? how
act upon that already received? how avert the
ridicule of the coadjutors she had drawn into her
schemes? how propitiate her brother?For sure
he had not ceased laughing at her, from the hour
he was let into the secret, and would make it the
theme of raillery to his dying day.
To the latter questions Miss Loring could frame
no answers; but in regard to the former and more
important, she expressed her doubts whether the
agent had really visited the appointed place at
all. It was
not
probable he could himself have
found his way to the bush at night, or that another
should have followed him to it. The marks of
footsteps
were, in all likelihood, left by some of the
patrons of the jubilee, collecting shrubs and flowers
to adorn the rostrumher garden had been thrown
open to them for the purpose, and, she doubted
not, they had already despoiled it. What was
more probable than that some of those persons,
returning from the house to the promontory, should
have nosed the sweet-smelling shrub, as they
passed
by, and appropriated its leafy honours, along
with those of other plants discovered on the way?
Parker might yet come, and deliver his
communication
in person; or perhaps he found it impossible
to escape the vigilance of his wild comrades, now
rendered doubly watchful by the gathering of so
many people in their neighbourhood. It was plain
that Harriet must now give up the prosecution of
the scrutiny into the hands of more fitting agents.
If there were refugees in the land, a single word
could convert the assembled revellers into
soldiers
,
who would instantly scour the hills in every
direction, and rid their peaceful solitude of such
dangerous intruders; and if the companies and
S 2
officers Miss Falconer had spoken of, had taken
position in the woods, a general rising of the people
must result in the capture of perhaps the whole
gang. It was plain, at least, that the wisest plan
to be followed was, to remain in tranquillity, until
her military friends arrived; when it would
remain
for them to determine what further steps
were to be taken.
The frustration of her sanguine hopes threw a
shadow over Miss Falconer's spirits, and plunged
her besides into a fit of peevishness, which she,
before long, indulged to an extent that both
surprised
and pained her friend. Thus, her father
making his appearance the moment they returned
to the house, and, so soon as he had expressed his
joy at seeing her, declaring she should see `his
excellent young dog, Hunter, the painter, the
greatest genius and most capital fine scoundrel in
the whole world,' she let fall certain expressions
of scorn that might have stirred the Captain's
choler, had his mind not been wholly occupied
with `the grand picture,' which it was now in his
power to exhibit. The painter had laboured with
much zeal, and, three or four days before, had
brought his sketch to the mansion, to receive the
father's and daughter's criticism on what had been
done, as well as to introduce the Captain's figure;
and he was easily prevailed upon to accept his
patron's invitation, and continue his labours, until
the sketch should be completed, on the spot.
Notwithstanding her dissatisfaction of mind,
Miss Falconer could not deny, that, so far as he
had gone, the artist had exhibited no little skill in
the design and execution of his piece. It
represented
the young hero lying across the knees of
his father, while Catherine knelt at his side, her
hands clasped between those of her dying brother.
A bead horse, a young oak-tree, shivered by a
cannon-ball, a broken gun-carriage, and two or
three other characteristic objects, made up, with
this group, the fore-ground of the picture; while
the back-ground, to which little had been yet done,
was sketched over with hills and trees, and a
confused
medley of contentionbroken columns of
men, flying horses, and wreaths of smoke. With
the three portraits Miss Falconer was very much
struck; she had the vehement testimony of
Captain
Loring, and the melancholy assent of his
daughter, in regard to the likeness of the expiring
youth; and she could see with her own eyes, how
well the painter had succeeded with both the others;
though, as Captain Loring averred, `he did not
like so much red on his nose;' and as for the tears
that the young fellow has put into my eyes, he
exclaimed, blubbering as he spoke, why that's
all nonsense, for I never shed a tear in my life
adzooks, I didn't!
As there was a violation of the unity of place
in the introduction of Catherine upon the
battleground
,
so also there was an evident anachronism,
which the painter had been guilty of, in depicting
her, not as a little girl, as she was at the period
of her brother's death, but a woman, such as she
now appeared. The fault, such as it was, was
easily pardoned, since it perhaps allowed a wider
scope for expression; and on this visage, it was
obvious, the artist had exhausted his skill.
Independent
of its beauty, it had such an air of deep
grief as almost conveyed the history of the after
life and feelings of the subjectsecret sorrow, and
a sense of lone, unfriended destitution, never to be
banished a moment from her bosom.
While the three were engaged surveying the
sketch, the painter himself entered the apartment.
Piercing, almost fierce and menacing, was the look
with which Miss Falconer regarded him; and her
recognition of his salutation was haughty in the
extreme. She observed, too, with high
displeasure
,
with what frank and almost eager haste
Catherine extended him her hand, and how her
voice trembled in the uttered welcome, as if it
were bestowed upon one endeared by long years
of friendship; and she turned upon Catherine a
look that almost frightened her from her
propriety
,
when the latter, leading Hunter up, to present
him with a more ceremonious form than her father
had thought fit to use, said, as if to bespeak her
good will at once,
This, Miss Falconer, is my good and valued
friend and
confidant,
(she strove to pronounce the
word archly,) Mr. Hunter.
It is very well, said Harriet, turning coldly
away, and fixing her eye upon the picture. I am
admiring his work, and striving to understand it.
I do not pretend to be very perspicuous, said
the painter, disregarding the mortifying reception
and the perhaps equally ungrateful sarcasm.
Mystery is said to be an ingredient in the
sublime
;
and as that is my aim,
of course,
(it belongs
to the aspirations of all youthful candidates for
immortality,) I always contrive to be as full of
mystery as possible.
To this speech, which was uttered with an air
of pleasantry, Miss Falconer only replied by a
second
penetrating stare; and then fixed her eye
again upon the sketch. The painter, determined
not to find offence where it was palpably meant,
resumed his discourse, saying,
I am afraid that my foolish music, last night,
may have disturbed Miss Falconer. I forgot she
had a right to be fatigued after her journey, until
the plash of a rain-drop in my eye, as I lifted it
romantically to heaven, brought me to my senses,
and, ludicrously enough, in the very middle of one
of Mr. Jingleum's best pieces.
You knew, then, that IOh, certainly! the
carriage rattled by Elsie's door. I am sensible of
the compliment, sir, and return you my thanks.
These expressions Miss Falconer uttered with
much vivacity, and began the question which she
ceased so abruptly, in a voice of eagerness.
Indeed
,
she felt that she had been almost thrown off
her guard; and she therefore, without any
purpose
,
except to divert the attention of those present
to another subject, and certainly with no definite
object in view, said, laying her finger at the same
time on the sketch,
I do not well understand this tree, sir. What
kind do you call it?
Oh, said Hunter, with a smile, that is a
plam.
A
palm!
cried Miss Falconer, eyeing him
with surprise; and pray, sir, how came a palm
on the hills of the Brandywine?
The question threw the painter into confusion,
which was increased by the keen and searching
glauces of the critic, over whom this third
violation
of propriety seemed to produce as strong an
effect as the detection of it did on the unlucky
artist.
A palm! good heavens, he stammered, with
a laugh; and I did not myself discover the
incongruity
before? Ah, Miss Falconer, you are the
very princess of censors; and I am glad you saw
the fault, before it might have been too late to
remedy
it. But `use doth breed a habit in man,'
as the great poet says; and painters are only flesh
and blood, after all. This comes of taking my first
lessons in painting, among the lagoons of Carolina.
I must look close: I warrant me, I have stuck a
live-oak into the picture also.
Really, sir, said Miss Falconer, whom the
opportunity of playing the critic seemed to have
put into a better humour, I must beg pardon for
my ignorance. I thought that in Carolina we had
no palms, except cabbage-trees; and this has a
marvellous soaring, long-leaved, cocoa-nut
appearance
,
judging from the prints I have seen of that
tree, for of the tree itself I am quite ignorant.
You are right, madam, said the painter;
the cocoa-nut is, in every way, a much finer
palm than the cabbage-tree; and for that reason,
I have always been accustomed to take a painter's
license with the latter, to make it as graceful and
stately as possible. Painting, you know, is a sort
of palpable poetry; and one must not be tied down
too closely to nature.
The cocoa-nut has an immensely long leaf,
has it not? demanded Miss Falconer.
Full fifteen feet, said the painter, warming
into enthusiasm; and each one so much shaped
like a great waving feather, that you might deem
it a plume plucked from the wing of Lucifer, or
some other colossus of demons. One can never
forget its majestic appearance, who has once
looked
upon the tree.
You have been, then, in the Islands?
Certainly, madam, yes;that is to say, in my
early youth, when the tree made a great
impression
on my mind. You may judge, therefore, how
natural it is that I should amend our inferior palms
by adding somewhat of the beauty of those that
belong to the tropics.
Oh, very natural, said Harriet; but it is
quite droll you should put one upon the
Brandywine
.
And with this indifferent remark she closed a
conversation that seemed, even to the unsuspicious
Catherine, to be somewhat embarrassing to the
painter, though she was glad to find how quickly
it dispelled her friend's peevish humour.
They were soon summoned to the breakfast
table, to partake a hasty repast, previous to
visiting
the scene of celebration, towards which several
merry-makers were seen directing their way, even
at this early hour. Miss Falconer appeared
surprised
that the young man did not instantly take
his leave; but she soon discovered he was there
for the purpose of attending her kinswoman to the
promontory, that duty having been expressly
delegated
to him by the Captain, who had accepted
the honourable and highly responsible command
of the six-pounder, and the three or four
vagabonds
who were to serve it, and had therefore
duties
of his own to look after. He soon deserted
the table, saying he left his young painter `to look
after her and his Kate; his rogues were coming
after the powder, and he knew they would shoot
off some of their legs or arms, adzooks, unless he
accompanied them back to the hill.'
In the meanwhile, Miss Falconer, discharging
her hauteur and petulance altogether, talked freely
with the Captain's guest, and appeared much
interested
in his conversation, and many obvious good
qualities. But it was observable, that as her ease
and frankness increased, those of Hunter
proportionately
fell, until he became visibly reserved, and
almost silent. This mood, however, did not last
long; and by the time the little party was on its
way to the scene of festivity, he was as gay and
spirited as ever.
CHAPTER XVI.
Then came the felon on his sable steed.
Theodore and Honoria
.
The
festival, so far as events allowed it to
proceed
,
was rather a pic-nic, of a somewhat patriotic
character, than a true national celebration; and
such indeed it might have been esteemed, had it
not been for the occasional roar of the six-pounder,
and the ambitious din kept up by the muskets, and
the drum and fife of a small company of
volunteers
,
the only portion of the county military who
could be induced to honour Hawk-Hollow with
their attendance. Few, however, as were the
persons
present, they claimed to form in themselves
the flower of the district; and rather rejoicing in
than regretting the absence of the great multitude,
they proceeded with zeal to despatch what was
esteemed the business of the day, in order that they
might the sooner advance to its pleasures. In fact,
all interest in the proper business of celebration
was soon found to be confined to Captain Loring,
the officers of the day, and their immediate
adherents
and partisans; the greater number of
revellers
,
both male and female, preferring to ramble
about in groups along the river shore, rather than
to sit in solemn expectation on the promontory,
awaiting the beginning of the proceedings. There
were more attractive charms to the mass in the
grassy glades below, where attendants were busily
occupied in preparing for the feast and the dance,
some arraying stores of napkins and platters along
the course of the brook, and others matting
together
bushes and branches of trees, so as to form
temporary canopies. In some places might be
seen a knot of Sabbath-clad bumpkins, moving
among the horses that were tied under the trees,
and discoursing learnedly upon their good and bad
points; in others, were collected divers rural
beauties
,
admiring one another's bonnets, or
exchanging
,
like merchants at a fair, their little stock of
innocent scandalsthe peculiar products of their
respective neighbourhoods; and in one place, an
amalgamation of the two interests was already
effected, and a romping country-dance begun upon
the green sward. Some idlers, incapable of any
other exercise of their faculties, had begged pins
of their cousins and sweethearts, converted them
into minnow-hooks, and were already angling from
the rocks; some, more gallant, were paddling
their favourites about in canoes; some were
singing
;
some rejoicing in the felicity of a jest; and in
two different places afar off, was heard the
screaming
plaint of flutes, sounded by as many youthful
followers of the Musagetes, who had stolen to their
solitudes alone.
In the meanwhile, those who were most zealous
in the cause which had brought them together,
remained on the top of the promontory, whiling
the time in conversation, until the moment should
arrive fixed on for opening the rites of the day.
The prospect from this elevation was extensive,
and, at one spot, it comprehended a view of a
horse-path sloping down the hills on the further
bank of the river, which, in seasons of drought,
like the present, was there fordable. It looked
besides over a part of the valley, and afforded a
clear glimpse of the public highway at a place
near to the park-gate, where it ran over a hill.
Both these roads possessed, on the present
occasion
,
VOL. I.T
a peculiar interest in the mind of Miss
Falconer
,
and she had chosen her resting place, with
the view of keeping them always in her eye. She
was followed to it by a select group, consisting,
besides the Captain's daughter, of the painter, the
orator of the day, Dr. Merribody, and a few of
that immediate coterie. Her vivacity on this
occasion was remarkable; but it was observed by
many that there was a degree of restlessness and
even uneasiness in her deportment, which were
displayed
in her frequent changes of conversation, and
the piercing looks she occasionally bent on all
present, as if in some sudden and short-lived fit of
abstraction, that rendered her unconscious of them
herself. These glances she bestowed more
frequently
upon her friend Catherine than any other
person present; though some supposed they
proceeded
from solicitude; for it was now remarked
that the Captain's daughter was thinner and paler
than of old, as if suffering from some hidden
or not yet fully developed, indisposition. There
was an air of lassitude in her countenance and
movements; and the bursts of merry humour that
once marked her conversation, were now few and
far between.
The individual who shared her piercing looks in
the second degree, was undoubtedly the painter,
with whom she carried on a conversation
frequently
very animated, and distinguished by a kind
of malicious ambition, no one knew why, unless it
proceeded from sheer good will, to betray him into
inconsistencies and contradictions. She took
occasion
to recur to the subject of the serenade, and
requested him, with many compliments, to resume
`the pretty little ditty of the Sigh and the
Whisper
,'
as she called it, which had been so abruptly
terminated on the preceding night by the
raincloud
,
and the request being backed by that of
others, he very good-naturedly consented to sing,
objecting however to the lay in question, that
being
entirely of a serenading character, and
therefore
unfit for chanting by day-light. Instead of
that, said he, I will sing you the song of
River, O
River,
which always brings back the dear Pedee
to my recollections. And so saying, with but
little of that hemming and coughing, which we
have good authority for esteeming the `prelude to
a bad voice,' he immediately sang the following
little roundelay, turning his eyes the while, with a
mournful earnestness, upon the Delaware, as if
that,
by a turn of prospopia, was made to
supply
the place of the Southern river.
I.
River, O River of light! whereon
The eyes of my youth were cast,
And many an idle hour and day
In mirth and joy were past;
Still bright and quiet thou flowest on,
As flow'd my earlier years,
Without a ripple, save those that rise
Beneath my dropping tears.
II.
River, O River! the trees still shake
Their leaves in thy passing tide;
And the nodding flowers the glass'd flowers see,
That mock them as they glide.
'Twas thus, even thus, in ages gone;
But others,alas, all flown!
Were wont to sit on thy gray old rocks,
Where now I rest alone.
III.
River, O River! thy charm is gone,
For those that gave it are fled;
And the thoughts thou wakest are dark and sad,
The thoughts of the distant dead.
None of them rest where they should rest,
By the waters they loved to see;
And thy green banks a grave shall yield
To none, unless to me.
IV.
River, O River! my lady yet
Walks on thy verdant shore;
But though she smiles on thy bright blue waves,
She smiles on me no more.
I will not look on thy happy tide,
Nor list to thy breeze's stir,
When knowing, however she sighs by thee,
Another sighs with her.
A deep sigh came from the breast of Jingleum;
but before it had reached any ear but his own,
Miss Falconer fixed her eyes on the singer, and
asked him, with much inquisitorial emphasis,
Pary, sir, how came those `gray old rocks'
into the Pedee?
How!
echoed Herman; Truly, I know not;
that is a question for a geologist.
Really, sir, said the lady, maliciously, I am
surprised they should be found in the Pedee,
which, I have heard, rolls through a quagmire.
You are right, Miss Falconer. The Pedee
proper
is without rocks; but the Yadkin, which is
the upper portion of it, and mountainous, has as
rugged a bed as any other river. But allow me
to say,this he uttered with a smile of triumph,
as if aware of her desire to catch him tripping,
you appear to suppose the song commemorative
of my native river; whereas, if I can believe the
poet, my friend Mr. Jingleum, it relates entirely to
the Delaware before us.
Ah! I forgotI thought you were speaking of
the Pedee; and I longed to show my knowledge
of geography, said the lady. But, hark, sir;
there is the roll of the drum; the volunteers are
cocking their pieces, the Captain is just priming
the artillery, and now we shall have the signal for
beginning the ceremonies.I hope, sir, you have
well studied the Declaration?
I have, madam, said the youth, who seemed
to discover something offensive in the bantering
question; and, however incompetent to the task
of pronouncing it with eloquence, or even effect,
I believe there is no one present who has given it
more thought than my own unworthy self.
At the signal thus indicated, the various truants
on the river-bank were seen thronging hastily up
the hill, and the orator, reader, and officers of the
day, immediately ascended the rostrum. Before
the preliminaries were all completed, an
exclamation
from Captain Loring, who had mounted with
them, drew the eyes of all across the river.
Soldiers, by the lord! adzooks, soldiers! he
cried, and the patriots beheld three horsemen, in
military attire, riding down the horse-path on the
opposite bank of the river. Look, Harry, my dear,
look! continued the Captain, eagerly;  'tis our
brother Harry, I'll be sworn! Could tell him among
ten thousand. Sits his horse like a general; and a
wonderful handsome dogand, see, he is waving
his handkerchief!
But Miss Falconer was at this moment staring
at another object in a contrary direction, of more
attraction even than her brother. She beheld a
single horseman, riding slowly along the road by
the park-gate, wending his way towards the
cottage
of Elsie Bell, and apparently too much
wrapped
up in his own reflections to bestow a glance,
or even a thought, upon the scene of commotion
presented by the promontory. The distance of the
road was at least a mile; but it was easy to
perceive
,
first, that the man was mounted upon a
white horse, and, secondly, that his head-gear was
T 2
of a flaming red colour,two circumstances that
filled both the eyes and the heart of the gazer with
fire. She turned her face to the rostrum, on which
Hunter was already displaying the record of a
nation's enfranchisement; but interrupted his
proceedings
without ceremony, crying eagerly,
You have a painter's eyes, Mr. Hunterdo
you know that man on the road yonder? A red
hat, I think?a rawboned horse?An
acquaintance
of yours, Mr. Hunter?
An acquaintance? echoed the painter, with a
look of surprise. At this distance, it is
impossible
Mr. Jingleum, what say you? cried Harriet,
hastily; or you, Mr. Pepperel?
The midnight oil, Miss Falconer, murmured
the modest bard; but was interrupted by the
lawyer
,
saying,
It is necessary, before arriving at a
conclusion
,
to examine into the premises; and before
deciding
upon this matter, I should like to have, not
only the evidence of my own eyes, but the
evidence
of the eyes of other persons,when he
was, in turn, silenced by the sudden exclamation
of Dr. Merribody.
I know the fellow, as well as I know my own
patients, he cried, pursing his eye-brows together;
'tis that scoundrelly quack fellow, John Green,
the Indian trader; and I hope he may come here
before night, that somebody may get drunk and
trounce him.
Bravo! cried Miss Falconer; and turning
towards
the river, she waved her handkerchief, as if
to hasten the advance of her martial friends.
Nonsense! cried Hunter, eagerly, but
manifesting
some little agitation. What! Green, the
good fellow that pulled me from the brook?
Nonsense
,
doctor; that man is twice as tall; and
besides
,
he rides quite a different horse.
I'll stand up to it, said the doctor, with
dignity
.
As for his horse, why these traders are
always buying and stealing; and there's his red
hat, as clear as a bunch of sumach, the red-headed
villain! But never mind any such vagabonds: read
away, Hunter, my boy, and let Jingleum begin;
for I am as hungry as a horse-leech, and I long to
be at something more substantial than all your
confounded orations.
Hang the reading, cried the painter,
petulantly
;
let us see what's in the wind first.We
should at least be civil to the army officers: you
see, they are regulars; and, there, they have given
up their horses to old Richard, the coachman, and
are running up the hill, like three hounds after
breakfast.Rogues, you will be sorted! and fair
Britomart, you shall this time wave the lance of
cunning in vain! The last expressions were
muttered
within the recesses of his own heart.
In the meanwhile, the three officers, ascending
the hill quickly, were met by Miss Falconer, who
flew to meet them, crying, To horse, gentlemen,
to horse! the game is riding into your very arms.
These words were heard even at the rostrum,
and filled all present with surprise; which was not
much allayed, when the youngest of the three
martialists, seizing upon Miss Falconer's hand,
exclaimed, with a laugh,
Egad, sister Hal, we have resolved to convert
you into Prince Hal, and make you Tory-taker
General. Here's my friend, captain Caliver, who
admires your abilities at strategy immensely; as
for Brooks, why, gad's my life, he is your
Grand-Vizier
.
But where's our dog Parker? and what
news of those vagabond Hawks of the Hollow?
Where's the thief, Joram, or Oram, or what d'ye
call it? Ah, Captain Loring, my excellent friend!
Ah, Miss Loring! ah, Miss
Brother, cried Harriet, with an energy that
startled all present, you have no time for
compliments
.
Accident has repaired the injuries of
accident, and fate has thrust him you seek into
your very hands. Mount, gentlemen, mount!
Mount, all who have horses, and ride up the ravine
to the witch's cottage: the volunteers, and all our
friends here who are on foot, can run across the
fields, and secure the road, so as to prevent
retreat
.
The man in the red hat, and with a white
horse,the canting Poke, or the sour-mouthed
Greenall is one for that; seize him, and you
seize the most audacious of traitors, the most
ferocious
of assassins!
Adzooks! cried Captain Loring, what's all
this?
It means, Captain, egad, said young
Falconer
,
grinning with pure delight, that Hal here
has been hunting your famous Hawks, till she has
found them; and now, egad, if we can believe
her, she is about to nab them. As for the road,
sister, we have that safe enough, with twenty foot,
and ten picked horse, coming down from the Gap;
there are two companies, also, ordered to the
village
;
and if you want more force, why we must
e'en call upon the volunteers. The end of all this,
gentlemen, continued the delighted lieutenant,
is, that you have a gang of refugees among you;
and that their leader, Oram or Joram Gilbert, or
whatever you call him,captain Gilbert, they
call him,a very bold, murdering fellow, has just
ridden by, as Miss Falconer says, and in a red hat,
egad, and on a white horse, and with some dozen
names or two; and so, gentlemen, we'll mount
horse, and take him.
Had a thunderbolt darted from the blue sky
among the group assembled on the hill, it could
not have produced a more sudden terror, than did
the name of the renowned refugee, with the
announcement
of his proximity to the scene of
celebration
.
The name of the outlaw was familiar to
all, as an omen of fear and blood; and while many
of the young men re-echoed it after the lieutenant
with open dismay, it produced such a general
scream from the women as made the rocks
resound
,
and added but little to the courage of their
protectors. As for the lieutenant himself, he
seemed to be vastly diverted by the general
explosion
of fright; though he instantly waved his
hand to his friends, calling upon captain Caliver
to mount, and waggishly directing his brother
lieutenant to `form the women and volunteers,
and march them to the scene of action;' when
Hunter, leaping down from the rostrum,
exclaimed
,
This is a mistake, an absurdity; I can assure
Miss Falconer that the man who rode by is no
more a Hawk of the Hollow than I am; at least,
I am certain he is not Green, the trader, whom I
will avouch to be an honest man.
Let Mr. Hunter first avouch that for himself,
said Miss Falconer, with a glance of fire; the
question will soon be asked him.Quick, brother,
quick! haste, gentlemen, haste! and all who can
do nothing better, follow me up to the road-side.
Perhaps the singular sarcasm the young lady
thought fit to fling at the painter, was unheard by
him,for finding that, despite his remonstrance,
the officers were running down the hill towards
their horses, he uttered a sudden shout, and
immediately
imitated their example, bounding along at
such a pace that he soon outstripped the fleetest.
In a moment, the assembly was broken up, and
the revellers flying in all possible directions. Here
were seen women running to conceal themselves
among rocks and bushes; and there one or two
prudent gentlemen, who declared themselves `men
of peace, and no fighters,' paddling across the
river, to get out of harm's way, with but little
regard to the beauties they left screaming after
them on the shore. But the torrent of fugation,
though it sent off so many irregular rills, was seen
dividing into two chief currents, one of which,
consisting
principally of mounted men, went, like the
back-water of a flood, rolling up the ravine leading
to the Traveller's Rest, while the other, consisting
of such volunteers as had not already broken and
followed after the officers, and such worthy
celebrators
as had the courage to imitate the example
of Miss Falconer and Captain Loring, made its
way on foot towards the public road.
CHAPTER XVII.
Thorough brake, thorough brier,
Thorough muck, thorough mier,
Thorough water, thorough fier,
And thus goes Puck about it.
Draiton
Nymphidia
.
It
has been seen, that if the painter made an
effort
to restrain the enthusiasm of the multitude, he
instantly proved that he was not without the virtue
himself, so soon as he found it was really
determined
to pursue the suspected person. The horses
of the officers had been led round the hill to the
covert where the others were tied; and towards
this place he directed his steps, crying out all the
time, with encouraging alacrity, Quick,
gentlemen
,
quick!
But the strongest proof of his zeal he gave, the
moment he had reached the horses, by vaulting
upon the back of the nearest, (and, in his
estimation
,
the best,) which happened, at that moment,
to be in the hands of the venerable coachman,
Richard, who was leading the animal round with
a degree of solicitude and attention, that were
testimonials enough of its value. Herman's
ledgings being so nigh at hand, he had thought it
wholly superfluous to trouble himself with his own
roan charger; and the present emergency was of
a nature so peculiar, he did not stop a moment to
consider the lawfulness of the seizure. He leaped
therefore into the saddle, jerked the reins out of
Richard's hand; and the wrath of the owner, who
was no other than lieutenant Falconer himself, was
extreme, when he beheld the audacious stranger,
his own loud calls to the contrary not withstanding,
bestride the captured steed with the air of an
emperor
,
and instantly put him to his speed.
Harkee, halt! stop! you've mistaken your
horse, cried the lieutenant.
Who
is that
impudent
scoundrel? My horse, you rogue! Give me
a pistol, Caliver, and I'll shoot him off.
But the anger of the soldier was unavailing; the
painter swept out of sight, and while Falconer
was calling on his friend Caliver, (a gentleman of
a weather beaten face, very lantern-jawed, and
with a red nose,) he also darted forward and
vanished. Nothing remained for him but to follow
the example set him by Hunter; and accordingly,
he seized upon the best charger he could find, and
with his brother officer and others, galloped after
the two leaders.
The reader may remember that the Traveller's
Rest was described as lying at the upper
termination
of a ravine, which swept down to the river,
and just before it debouched thereon, received
the waters of Hawk-Hollow Run. From the
promontory
so often spoken of, the cottage was
plainly visible, and approachable along the bed of
the river, even by horsemen, provided they were of
the steeple-chase order, or were moved by any
occasion so stirring as the present. The
obstructions
and difficulties, nevertheless, were of a nature,
to call for great circumspection on the part of the
riders; and accordingly the greater number of
pursuers began to exercise their discretion so soon
almost as they had well set out. The two leaders,
however, dashed onwards with fiery zeal, and
performed
feats of horsemanship that gained them
the applause of the laggards. It was fortunate for
Herman that his spirit and address soon won him
the good will of the cavalry officer, (for such was
captain Caliver) at his heels. He had remarked
the seizure of his friend's charger, and at first
meditated
a wrathful reprimand. He succeeded in
coming within speaking distance, as Hunter toiled
up an ascent of unusual ruggedness, and instantly
hailed him:
Harkee, my friend, said he, you ride like a
gentleman, and a little training would fit you for
the army: but do you know you have mistaken
your horse?
Faith, there is no mistake about it, cried the
painter, for my horse was not on the ground.
In such an emergency, sirbut enough. Are you
armed, captain? are you armed?
Surely my holsters are at my saddle-bow,
quoth the cavalry officer, spurring up, as he
reached
a more level ground, on which he could display
all the qualities of his charger; and as surely you
will find Harry Falconer's at his, if you know how
to use them. Harkee, my friend, I will not make
so bold as to consider you in a fright; but you are
quite white about the lips.
Ay, true, said the painter, clapping his hand
to the holsters, and drawing forth a weapon, but
taking no particular notice of the soldier's
insinuation
:
Captain, had you not better draw up, and
wait for some of the company, while I push on,
and secure the road?
I vow to heaven, said captain Caliver, I
would knock you off your horse, did I not know
you spoke in the ignorant innocence of your heart.
Draw up, and wait for company? It is not in my
nature to call any man an ass, except a private;
and you are here, I think, as a volunteer. So, Mr.
Gentleman-volunteer, be pleased to look upon me
as commander-in-chief, and attend to my
instructions
.Do
VOL. I.U
you know that Oran Gilbert, when you
see him?
How should I? The Indian trader, to be sure,
I know; and you will soon find, that this fellow of
the white horse is no more like him than I am.
Very wellFall behind, Mr.
Gentleman-volunteer
,
and
I will do no such thing, said the youth,
stoutly
;
I will ride, fight, and kill refugees with any
man in the county; and if you show me one, I'll
engage to shoot him at sixty paces,that is, with
a good pistol,I will, by the lord!
And so saying, the volunteer brandished his
pistol
with such ardour that it suddenly went off in
his hand, with a report that set the whole ravine
roaring, and materially expedited the march of
their followers, who responded with an instant
cheer.
The captain of cavalry stretched forth his hand,
seized Hunter's bridle, and was about to express
certain rough suspicions which this untimely
explosion
created in his mind, when the painter cried
out, with as much apparent innocence as
confusion
,
Egad, I believe 'twas a hair-trigger!
Spur up, and no more firing, cried the
soldier
;
or by the eternal Jupiter, I'll knock you off
your horse. You have alarmed the wigwam; see
what a hubbub you have raised in the van, as well
as on the rear! the tavern is in commotion. Hah!
by the eternal Jupiter, there goes Red-hat! Spur
up, gentleman volunteer; or by the eternal
Jupiter
,
the fellow will escape!
The report of the pistol had indeed reached the
Traveller's Rest, and drawn forth its two or three
inmates; who could now easily behold the whole
train of horsemen dashing furiously up the ravine;
and the quick eye of captain Caliver was not slow
in detecting a person on horseback, with a red hat,
pricking hastily away from the cottage.
The game is sprung,the rabbit is up! he
cried, while the fire that burned on his thin
nose, seemed to have raised a kindred flash in his
dark gray eyes. Gentleman-volunteer, do you
see? Now you shall behold the doings of
Skyscraper
,
the best horse for a long race on short
fodder, that was ever galled by saddle. Up the
bank here, and after!
You are wrong, captain, you are wrong, cried
the painter, eagerly. 'Tis a white horse, you
know; and this is a roan, or sorrel.
There could be no truth more incontestible than
this; yet captain Caliver was of too sagacious a
spirit, or perhaps was warming with too much fire,
to be led from his purpose by an argument not of
his own devising.
I will be uncivil to no man but a private, he
cried, fixing his eye upon the fugitive, (who was
for a moment's space plainly visible, as he
galloped
up the road,) compressing his lips, till they
actually seemed to have vanished, and, at the same
time, driving his spurs deep into his steed; I say,
I will be rough-spoken to none but privates, for it
does not hurt their feelings; but, by the eternal
Jupiter, there goes our man!or what does he
mean by wearing a red hat? and, lastly, what
does he mean by beating a retreat in such a
fashion? Harkee, Mr. Gentleman-volunteer, I am
glad now you fired that pistol. Had we come upon
the dog silently, why then I should have picked
him up, rolled up in a ball, like an opossum; which
is a job for a black man, and not a captain of
cavalry. I say, he continued, with increasing
animation, I am glad you have roused him, and
shown him a fair field; for, by the eternal Jupiter,
I have not seen a race worthy to speak of for two
weeks; and, by the eternal Jupiter, you shall see
such a one now as will make your blood run; and,
by the eternal Jupiter, I hope his horse is blooded,
for, by the eternal Jupiter, I will run him, or any
other respectable tory gentleman, from time
temporal
to time eternal, from post to pillar, from
Sunday to Saturday, and from life and the
dinnertable
to death and. And here the captain
of horse, who was something of a horse himself
when his blood was up, ended climacterically with
a most soldier-like word, which, although it may
be found in any English dictionary with which the
public is acquainted, will nevertheless read more
agreeably in a dictionary than any where else. He
added, indeed, three more words; for turning his
horse's head towards the steep bank that bounded
the ravine on the right hand, he twisted a lock of
the charger's mane round his finger, and uttered
the cabalistic ejaculation,
Go it, Sky-scraper!
The words had an immediate effect; no sooner
did they reach his ear than Sky-scraper, with a
plunge that carried him half a length ahead of the
painter, darted to the brow of the acclivity; and
Herman following, he beheld the Indian trader,
(for it was this identical individual they were now
pursuing,) some five or six hundred paces in
advance
,
travelling at a very unusual pace up the
highway. As Hunter reached the road, he cast
his eye backwards to the hovel, and beheld, riding
into the oak yard, a man whom he knew at once
to be the person that had first attracted Miss
Falconer's
notice. He rode a white horse, and there was
a red covering to his head; but this latter
phenomenon
,
as it appeared, was owing entirely to the
presence
of a red handkerchief drawn over the
horseman's
hat, doubtless to shield his eyes from the
sun-beams, or from the dazzling rays reverberated
from a dusty road. There was nothing at all
warlike in the appearance of this individual; on
the contrary, he seemed, from his dress, to belong
to the community of Friends; and he paused at
the entrance of the yard, looking back on the chase
he had left behind, with much innocent curiosity
and wonder.
Captain, cried the painter, at the top of his
voice, wheel about. You are leaving the true
man: here he is, full in view, behind us!
The captain answered only by repeating the
charm that had already nerved the limbs, and fired
the spirit of his steed; and Herman, urged by
feelings
and inducements of his own, followed after
him; and in a few moments, the fugitive and his
two pursuers were alike buried in a cloud of dust,
raised by the fleet chargers.
When the two leaders so suddenly left the
ravine
,
they were beyond the sight of those who
brought up the rear; and these, not doubting they
had continued their original route, galloped on
themselves until they reached the little inn; where
the first person they saw was a tall, middle-aged,
gawky quaker, the same that had been seen by
Herman, sitting astride his horse, and staring on
them with gaping astonishment.
Surrender, you villain! cried Harry Falconer,
with a whoop of victory; surrender, you bloody
Hawk, or I'll blow your brains out,or I'll make
Brooks do it, that scoundrel having run away with
my pistols.Hillo-ah-ho, Caliver!What has
become
of the captain?Down, you dog, and we'll
tie you!
'Nan! cried the astounded Friend: What
does thee mean, young person?
Death and Beelzebub! cried Brooks, What
have we here? Why, old father Broadbrim, who
the devil are you? Sure, I know this horse!
U 2
Sure thee may, and sure thee may not, replied
Broadbrim, looking wrathfully upon his captors,
who were evidently nonplussed at sight of him.
He is an honest man's horse, friend foul-mouth
and sauce-box with the coat of the slayer on thee
back!
The spot's on the wrong leg! cried Brooks,
who had been inspecting the stranger's horse with
a curious eye. Hah! d'ye see the dust on the
hill? Some of you guard father Broadbrim; he's
suspicious: we'll examine him directly. Hillo-ho,
Falconer! I'll have you! oho! oho! oho! and
away darted the young officer after his brother
lieutenant, who had galloped off so soon as he
discovered
the course pursued by the leaders.
By this time, all the young men present had
grown warm with exercise, and were now waxing
valiant, as they began to understand the little
danger
there was in chasing, so many of them
together
,
a single refugee, who, although desperate
and dangerous enough, had shown so little
inclination
to face them. They began to be apprized,
too, of the nature of the service in which they
were rather co-operating than compulsorily
engaged
;
and all seemed to know, that the farther
they rode up the highway, the nearer they would
be to an armed force, marched into the county
for the express purpose of ferreting out and
destroying
the band of outlaws. This being the state
of their feelings, there were few of them willing
to accept the ignoble trust of guarding the body
of the Quaker prisoner; though, having had it
urged upon them by the cautious lieutenant, they
were loath to discharge him without authority. It
was proposed by some to lock him up in the
Traveller's
Rest, and entrust the ward entirely in the
hands of Elsie and her little negress; while others
pointed to Gilbert's Folly as a safer prison-house;
and some even talked of carrying him to the
woods, and tying him to a tree, until the chase
they were so anxious to share in, was over. The
dilemma, such as it was, was already proceeding
to altercation, when Broadbrim, having
understood
that they were in chase of a famous tory,
proposed to ride with them in pursuit; adding with
a zeal that delighted, as much as it astonished
them,
A man of war am I not, neither a slayer nor
a fastener of bonds, neither a firer of pistols nor
a brandisher of swords and spears; yet, friend
younker whom they call Andrews, if thee is the
man to show me a tory who hath broken the law,
then verily am I the man that will hold him hard
and fast, till the law hath spoken with him; yea,
verily, I am. Ride on, therefore, with whip and
with spur; only swear not, and be not aworth;
and do thou, friend Andrews, ride at my side; for
my horse is a horse of peace and not a horse of
war, sure-footed but slow, and peradventure I may
be left behind. It doth not become me to say, I
hate a tory, for a tory is a man, and hate
belongeth
not to a fellow creature;but, verily, I have
heard of the man called Oran Gilbert, the Hawk
of the Hollow; and, verily, I should not like to be
summoned on the jury to try him for his manifold
crimes; for, verily, it would be against my
principles
to judge him to death, and verily it would
be against my heart and conscience to let him off
with aught less than hanging. So let me detain
none from the good deed of catching the wicked
man; and peradventure, if this animal beneath me
hath any vigour left in his legs and reins, I may
stretch forth my hand afar, and take the sinner by
the nape of the neck.
The manifestation of such spirit on the part of
Broadbrim, who seemed well prepared, so far as
strength of arm and resolution of heart were
concerned
,
to take even a huger man than the Indian
trader betwixt his finger and thumb, determined
the course of his sentinels at once. They gave a
loud shout, and bidding him follow, rode after the
officers as hard as they could; and it was worthy
of remark, that the white horse, notwithstanding
the hint the prisoner had given of his slowness,
began gradually to warm into mettle and fleetness,
so that before the race had extended many miles,
he bade fair to outstrip his attendants altogether.
CHAPTER XVIII.
If you think I come hither as a lion, it were pity of my
life: no, I am no such thing; I am a man as other men are:
And there, indeed, let him name his name; and tell them
plainly, he is Snug the joiner.
Midsummer Night's Dream.
Meanwhile,
the party of footmen, consisting of
some dozen or more of the volunteers, and such
revellers as were brave enough for the exploit,
followed, or rather led by the valiant Harriet, who
displayed the energy of a Penthesilea, and by
Captain Loring, who forgot his lameness in the
ardour of the moment,succeeded in gaining the
highway just in time to catch the most favourable
view of the fugitive, as he thundered up the hill
upon which they were themselves rushing. Indeed,
they came upon him so suddenly, that when his
ears, which as well as his eyes, seemed to be fully
occupied in tracing the signs of pursuit, were
surprised
by the sudden shout they set up, the jerk
which he instinctively made at the reins, brought
his steed (a goodly roan charger, which was
afterwards
discovered to be the property of the painter)
upon his hams, and had well nigh tumbled him in
the dust. At that moment, the volunteers, in an
ecstasy of excitement, raised their muskets, and
fired together upon horse and man; so that, had
there been any better ammunition in the deadly
tubes than blank-cartridges, both must have been
blown to atoms.
The appearance of the trader, as he rose up in
his saddle, and looked upon the throng around
him, apparently as much astonished at his escape
from death as he was infuriated by such a display
of mortal opposition, was wild and terrific; the
broad red hat had fallen back from his forehead,
disclosing his whole countenance; the eye with
which he glared upon his opposers, had a certain
ghastliness mingled with its fury, that was infinitely
appalling; the retracted lips, exposing the set
teeth, seemed widened into a grin that might have
become the visage of a nether imp; and his hand,
with which he had snatched up, and now
brandished
,
a huge horse-pistol, could not have
appeared
more dreadful, had it been dripping with
fresh blood. When it is remembered, that the
whole throng were now impressed with the
conviction
,
(a conviction which their reason had no
time to question,) that, in this man, they beheld
the most renowned and dreaded of the Hawks of
Hawk-Hollow, and perceived that he had the life
of at least one individual in his power, it is not to
be wondered at that their courage gave way, so
soon as they perceived him unharmed by the
volley. In truth, they began to shout and fly; and
even the volunteers waited no longer than to see
the pistol aimed towards them, before they took to
their heels as hastily as the others. It was in vain
that Miss Falconer cried out, Now is the time,
gentlemen! seize him! The only individual who
thought fit to obey the mandate, was Captain
Loring
,
who, having just hobbled up to the road,
sprang from a bank, and before the rover had
fired, or even raised up his steed, snatched
vigorously
at the bridle, roaring out,
I've nabbed you, adzooks, you rascal!
Surrender
!
To this bold summons the demi-barbarian
answered
by turning his weapon from the flying
assailants, and clapping it instantly to the Captain's
ear; when a shriek from Catherine startled, or
conjured, him out of his bloody intention; and
instead
of shooting the veteran dead on the spot, he
struck him a blow with the heavy barrel, that
brought him to the earth. He then uttered a yell
like the whoop of an Indian; and the roan horse,
leaping over the Captain's body, bounded beyond
the crest of the hill, and was in an instant
concealed
from view.
The next moment, and almost before the
terrified
rustics had plucked the unlucky veteran from
the road, the thunder of hoofs again shook the hill,
and the captain of cavalry, looking almost as grim
and terrific as the fugitive, was seen to shoot by,
pronouncing his magical war-word, Go it,
Skyscraper
!
Then, at his heels, came Herman, the
painter, who, without seeming very sensible of the
presence of any earthly spectators, gave forth, as
he passed, a bold and stirring hurrah, that almost
made Miss Falconer reject as improbable certain
wild suspicions that had already crept into her
brain. Then came the lieutenants and their long
train of volunteer followers, bestowing as little
notice upon the individuals on the road-side as the
others had done; and these defeated worthies
were left to themselves, busied in restoring the
Captain to his senses,a desideratum, that, to the
delight of all, was soon effected; for indeed the
Captain's cocked hat had done him the service his
gray hairs had not; and it was soon found, that,
except his being thrown into a violent passion, he
was none the worse for his misfortune.
I'll have the villain's blood! he cried, starting
up in a fury, which he expended upon all around
him without much discrimination. What are you
blubbering about, Kate, you jade? Adzooks, but
I'll have the blood of the rascal! Hark ye, Mr.
Doctor Merribody, and you Mr. Orator Jingleum,
and the rest of you, and especially
you,
you
confounded
cowardly volunteers! what did you mean
by not rushing in upon the dog, when I had him,
you puppies? Adzooks, you white-feathered
henbantams
,
I had sooner trust to a regiment of
suttler's
wives, in a bayonet-charge, than to any such
poltroonery rascals, even in the small matter of
taking a tory by the ears. Adzooks, you
gallimaufry
what-d'ye-call-'ems, is this the way you
keep the Fourth of July?
While the veteran thus poured forth his
indignant
rebukes, which he continued until his
daughter
succeeded in pacifying him, the captain of
cavalry, followed at but a little distance by
Herman
,
still pursued the chase with untiring ardour,
now catching view of the fugitive as he flashed
over the brow of a hill, but oftener losing sight of
him altogether, so winding and broken was the
road, and so deeply embowered by forest-trees.
Caliver marvelled greatly at the excellence of the
roan steed bestridden by his quarry, upon whom,
after riding several miles, he did not seem to have
gained an inch; but, in truth, the horse was of
approved
speed and bottom, the rider was himself a
master of the art of horsemanship, and was
besides
,
at least, a stone and a half lighter than his
pursuer. He continued, however, to follow,
cheering
himself with the reflection, that, by and by, the
appearance of the infantry, already posted on the
road, must bring the fugitive to a stand. And
then, quoth he to himself, with a grim chuckle,
he must e'en turn about; and then, by the
eternal
Jupiter, I will shave off the top of his poll with
my sabre, or shoot him through the gizzard with
my pistol, according to circumstances. Go it,
Sky-scraper; and don't let it be said of you, you
were ever beaten, in a fair race, by a rascally
refugee!
As for the painter, he possessed but little of the
unflagging spirit of his leader; and seeing there
was small prospect of gaining on the trader, he
soon became tired of pursuing, and began to
devise
in what manner he might, without loss of
honour, discontinue the pursuit. First, then, having
reached a wild hollow, where a little runlet
crossed
the road, and was immediately lost amid a
labyrinth
of great rocks, trees, and brambles, he
gradually
slackened his pace, until the cavalry officer
vanished among the windings of the road. As
soon as he had lost sight of him, he came to a full
halt, greatly to the dissatisfaction of his borrowed
steed, whose heart was already warmed for battle.
Here the painter listened a moment, as if to gather
some tokens of the approach of others. A few
straggling shouts came to his ear from a vast
distance
behind. He hesitated an instant; the cries
of pursuit came nearer. He then dismounted,
reversed
the saddle on the horse's body, gave him a
lash and a shout, and away went the liberated
animal, leaving his rider standing in the middle of
the highway. Here, however, he did not long
remain. Another chorus of shouts, coming still
nearer, reverberated through the woodland; and
without waiting for a fourth, the young artist
instantly
deserted the road, and plunged into the
wildest and deepest part of the hollow.
And now appeared the two lieutenants, rushing
vociferously on, with some two or three young
men who were better mounted than others, close
at their heels. Then, strange to be said, came the
zealous Broadbrim, the spirit of whose lank steed
seemed to grow with his exertions, and who had
left the rest far behind. It was the destiny of this
VOL. I.X
worthy personage, like the painter, here to end the
labours of the day; but with this important
difference
,
that, whereas the painter had relinquished
the pursuit, because it was his will to do so,
the quaker, on the other hand, terminated his
career, because it was the will of his horse he
should do so. In other words, this highly
republican
animal, having debated in his body (for,
being a horse, he had no mind,) the absurdity of
the burthen being all on one side, and reflecting,
that, as he himself could not ride, there was no
reason why he should be ridden, now began to
broach his rebellious principles in the most
expressive
language he could make use of,that is, in
sundry curvets and escapades; the result of which
was, somewhat to the astonishment of honest
Broadbrim, that the magnanimous insurgent
suddenly
broke his base bonds, and fled away,
whinnying
with the delight of freedom, while his
oppressor
,
after admiring the print his back had
made in a spot by no means dusty, now sat down
pensively on the road-side, and began to ponder
his misfortunes.
`The devil damn thee black, thou cream-faced
loon!' were the first words he uttered; and he
uttered
them with much sincerity of indignation.
Had the gallows been close by, thou ungrateful
beast, I believe thou wouldst have been just as
malicious. Wilt thou never be done thy tricks,
White Surrey? Out upon thee, thou ass of a
horse! I have helped thee out of all manner of
difficulties, and, in return, thou never missest an
opportunity of flinging me into one. `A horse, a
horse, my kingdom for a horse!' Now am I in a
quandary, like a fish in a net.And suppose some
one of these malapert blue-jackets should look into
my saddle-bags, and pull out, one after another,
first Tom Hunting-shirt, then long-tailed
Nehemiah
,
then Will Tapes, the pedler, and thenand
then, and then?Hillo, you vagabond Hawk! you
skulking tories, that have fern-seed, and walk
invisible
!
where are ye? Now am I like a rat
between
six cats.Come to me, and ye shall hear
the words of grace, the comfortable and
fructifying
words, ye men of Belial, that hide your faces
in woods and in desert places!Hearken to me,
friend Gilbert, whom men call the Hawk of the
Hollow: does thee not perceive I am in great
straits, and that I am thy friend in the spirit, and
will hold thine enemies very fast and hard, and
will peradventure strike one of them under the fifth
rib, so that he die?Out, you inhuman rascal!
you captain Gilbert! come to my assistance, or,
`
paucas palubras,
'I shall be hanged.
As the mysterious quaker proceeded in his
musings, which he occasionally vented aloud, his
looks, fixed mournfully on the ground, fell by chance
upon a shrub-leaf close to the earth, the under
surface of which was turned up, looking white and
glistening among the green fronds. This he, at
first, regarded with great indifference; but having
observed it a second time, a thought entered his
brain, which caused him to rise and advance
towards
it, to examine whether it had been deranged
by the winds, by the foot of a beast, or by some
more important agency. Its foot-stalk was broken;
and divers decaying leaves beneath it were
crushed
into the ground. These appearances induced
him to look about him with much care; and the
search terminated in the discovery of several
foot-marks
in the damp soil, evidently impressed by a
pair of moccasined feet, and that very recently.
This discovery infused singular animation into his
spirit, which was quickened by a sudden shout
from the road behind. He sprang behind a bush,
until the comer, one of his late sentinels, dashed
by; then resuming the search, he found himself
following a human trail, that led him into such a
labyrinth of bog and bramble, as might have made
him repent his presumption, had he possessed the
grace to repent any thing. He persisted however
with much resolution, and still made his way by
the tracks, until the sudden appearance of a huge
rattlesnake, bruiting under his nose, startled him
out of his propriety and the path together. In a
word, he soon proved himself to be no woodman;
and, in the course of five or ten minutes' walk, was
so completely lost and mazed among the depths of
a wild swamp, as to have lost even the power of
extricating himself.
`Ay, now,'  said he, with a groan,  `I am in
Arden; the more fool I; when I was at home, I
was in a better place; but travellers must be
content
.'
Then looking about him disconsolately, he
perceived
,
through the trees, a little eminence, where
he could rest himself, and whence, he thought, he
might discover some path out of the wilderness.
He proceeded towards it forthwith. It was a
swell of land, on the summit very rocky, covered
with beech and maple trees, and with an
undergrowth
of spice-wood and its fragrant sister, the
sassafras. Among these he thought he heard the
babbling of a little water-course; and this sound
he hailed with satisfaction, for he was already
tormented
with thirst. As he passed up the hill, he
stepped into a little nook, not above a dozen paces
in circuit, enclosed by rocks and bushes, and so
overshadowed by beeches as to form a
thick-roofed
grotto, on the floor of which sparkled a
meager rill, flowing from a spring at the bottom
of a rock.
An abrupt turn round a mass of protruding
stone brought the wandering man of peace
unexpectedly
upon this scene; but before he had time
to survey it, he was suddenly seized upon by an
arm of iron, and hurled upon the ground. The
next moment, a strong hand was at his throat, a
heavy knee on his chest, and a long, bright knife
gleamed like a flash of lightning before his eyes.
X 2
CHAPTER XIX.
That you are rogues,
And infamous base rascals, (there's the point now,)
I take it, is confess'd.
May a poor huntsman, with a merry heart,
A voice shall make the forest ring about him,
Get leave to live amongst ye?true as steel, boys!
Beggars' Bush.
Speak
who and what are you? and what
seek you here? said the harsh voice of the
conqueror
.
The intruder looked up in his face with some
wonder, and beheld the features of a man of
middle
age, very dark and fierce of aspect, with long
black locks of hair hanging from his temples, wild,
Indian-looking eyes, and a mouth expressive of as
much inherent ferocity as was ever betrayed by
the visage even of a red-man.
Speak, repeated the apparition, impatiently,
or never speak more!
To this the prisoner replied with less confusion
of mind than difficulty of articulation,
Hark ye, Mr. Green, or Gray, or Black,for a
deuced black face you have!or, if you like that
better, Mr. Hawk-of-the-Hollow Gilbert, `what is
the reason that you use me thus?' `I would be
friends with you, and have your love;'but not
while I am on my back, to be sure. `Call you
this backing of your friends?' `Slife, sir, take
away your fingers, and let me up: I am Iago, the
`honest, honest' man. At any rate, be so civil as
to consider, that, though your knee may find its
cushion agreeable enough, my lungs do not.
And what will they think of a knife in them?'
cried the fierce captor, without relaxing his hold.
You were among the hounds that were hunting
me!
Ay; and had they caught you, I should have
been among the hunters that were hanging you,
provided they had not tucked me up first. Hark
ye, friend Hawk, I should have known you better,
had you stuck to the gray whig; I remember you
of old, Mr. Green, the trader. I am an honest
man; ask Sir Guy Carleton else; if he don't know
Ephraim Patch, who is just as honest as myself,
why then ask him about one Leonidas Sterling, an
old friend and correspondent of his worship at
Philadelphia
.
'Slife, sir, I tell you I am a true man.
Give me some proof, and I will release you.
Trifle with me, and you are a dead man.
Put your hand into the right pocket of my
vest, cried the prostrate sufferer, and you will
find it.
The conqueror did as directed, and drew forth
a guinea.
You asked for proof, said the other, with a
grin, and there you have it! Were I a rebel, you
would have found naught but a roll of beggarly
continentals; had there been more, I should have
been an honest quaker, and neither rebel nor tory.
Are you satisfied? I came here to seek you, and
save my neck, which is in danger. There are
men among the rebel officers that know me; and
to be known, sir,`by these pickers and stealers,'
'tis true!'twere as good as a word to Jack
Ketch, under the sign and seal of a State
governor
!
Captain Gilbert, I come to volunteer my
services
under your command; and the sooner you
introduce me to your rascals the better.
Rise, and behold them! said the refugee,
leaping to his feet; and friend Ephraim Patch, or
Mr. Leonidas Sterling, as he had called himself,
looking up, beheld to his extreme surprise, for he
knew not how they got there, two men standing
hard by, in green hunting shirts, with each a
hatchet in his hand, as if ready to use them, and
countenances grimly forbidding.
`The earth hath bubbles, as the water has!'
he cried, `Peas-blossom! Cobweb! Moth! and
Mustard-seed!' `I cry your worships' mercy!'
Your hands, gentlemen: I am as honest a
scoundrel
as any of you, though somewhat more
unfortunate
.
Honest or false, said the refugee, giving a
sign with his hand, on which the two instantly
stepped from the den, and were concealed among
the bushes, it signifies but little to me. You are
among friends, if you speak true; otherwise, among
hangmen.Your name is Poke?
`That's he that was Othello'a poor servant
of the word, an expounder of the book, a sower
of good seed on the way-side, said the Proteus,
in the tones of the quondam Nehemiah.
You are Tapes, the pedler, caught stealing
through the American lines at Morristown, and in
good hopes of dying on an oak-tree?
True for you, captain Gilbert! cried the
other, with a stare; but where did you learn
that? Hah! I see! the roguish refugee that
assailed
young Asgill's guards, while he was riding
out on parole, and would have plucked him out of
the bonds of Egypt, had not the fool gripped tight
to his honour, very much as a drowning man hugs
a ship's anchor, at the bottom of a river, and so
remained in captivity.What, captain! was that
one of
your
clap-traps?
You are the impudent scoundrel who has been
cutting throats, and laying them at honest men's
doors? cried the other, without regarding the
question.
Softly, captaina mere matter of accident.
And, moreover, said the refugee, sternly,
you are the masking, blundering meddler, who
has twice drawn the hue and cry after myself?
Verily, so it appears, cried Sterling; but
now that we have met at last, we shall play no
longer at cross-purposes.
What seek you here? Why have you
returned
to a place where your life is in danger?
Zounds, sir! cried Sterling, stoutly, you ask
questions enough to puzzle a regiment. But here
is my whole story,the history of my deeds,
dangers
,
and desires. I am a gentlemanly scoundrel
and unfortunate man, like others that shall be
nameless; and after seeking my fortune in divers
parts of the world, and making a grand sensation
on the boards of the regimental theatre among
Howe's officers at Philadelphia, I e'en consented
to take service under the King, and therefore staid
behind, when he ran away, and have been ever
since a particular confidential correspondent of
the royal generals at New York.
That is to say, a spy?
Why, if you like the word better, e'en use it;
the more elegant word is, correspondent. I am
told, you have an excellent friend in Congress, a
certain Colonel Richard FalconerThe
refugee's
brow grew as black as midnightWell,
sir, this gentleman is e'en an excellent friend of
mine also; and having somewhat of the cunning
of the devil in him, became busy, one morning,
and entirely ruined my fortune and reputation
together
;
in other words, he discovered and
denounced
me, threw me into prison, and volunteered
to help me to paradise. I broke jail, concealed
myself for a time; until, one night, accident drove
me into his presence. I found the good-natured
gray-beard alone, studying my case as hard as he
could, and out of my own papers! I am quite a
peaceable man, captain, `yet have I in me
something
dangerous;' I became choleric, and finding
a sword hanging up just at my hand, I took the
liberty of thrusting it into his gizzard.
Fool! said the refugee, grasping him by the
arm, the throat is the only true place!But, hark
ye, he added, abating the wolfish sneer that
accompanied
his words, you robbed as well as
murdered?
Ay, `by St. Paul,' I did, said Sterling, with
infinite composure; having declared war, I made
free with the spoils of victory; and the Colonel's
purse has lasted very well, all circumstances
considered
;
though, wo's me, that say it! besides the
guinea in my waistcoat pocket, there are but two
more remaining, and they on the back of White
Surrey. Concerning White Surrey, you must
know, he is a devil born, like yourself,I mean to
say, myself; fleet of foot, untiring of spirit, and
nothing against him but his ugliness and starved
appearance, and, by the lord, some touch of the
Marplot, especially in times of trouble. I could
not think of leaving him behind me; and I was on
my way to the rogue he called master, with a
whole theatrical property-room on my back, when
I stumbled in the dark on my friend Falconer. You
must know, I had a woodman's dress on
Hah! muttered the refugee: it was not all
conscience, then? Then changing his tone, he
continued, You have said enough. You have
sought to escape, and find yourself unable?
Ay; and hearing the Hawks of Hawk-Hollow
were out again, I even took counsel from despair,
painted White Surrey's legs over again, and came
hither to throw myself among them. Faith, I
knew Hawk-Hollow would be the fairest place to
seek them in. I volunteer, captain, I volunteer;
but I hope you have a stronger force than Moth
and Mustard-seed? I volunteer, and, by the lord,
I am ready to go into action as soon as you order.
But would to the lord I could catch White Surrey.
Harkee, captain, can you hide a man, at a
moment's
warning, out of the sight of a gallows?
Ay: there are dens hereabout deep and dark
enough for a royal refugee to take his rest in.
Hark ye, captain; give me a carbine, and I'll
do you a service. I have heard, he added, with
a shrug meant to be significant and confidential,
of that matter betwixt Falconer and your
blackeyed
Villain! cried the refugee, seizing him by the
arm, and giving him a look that curdled his blood,
you are venturing upon a subject that will bring
the knife to your throat! Pho, you are a fool; he
added, checking his impetuosity, and grinning,
A strange, uncomely, jawbone smile;'
we are Christians here, and we forgive our
enemies
.
Forgive? cried Sterling, come now,
captain
Gilbert, that's slippery. I know you better;
and I know you have been wronged.
You are deceived, said Oran Gilbert, laying
his hand, with another ominous smile, on the
volunteer's
shoulder, I am not an Indian, but a white
man, and as you may have seen, forbearing and
forgiving. They have told you, (for they have
told the same to
me,
) that I am a wolf's whelp, an
eater of men's flesh, and a drinker of blood; and
that I never pardoned an injury, though I had
grown gray thinking of it. Lies, lies all! I can
walk by my father's house, and see the sons of his
destroyer sitting in the doors; and yet carry
myself
like the best Christian of them all: I can be
told, too, even by a foul-mouthed dolt like yourself,
how shame and sorrow, came into the house, and
afterwards death,and yet feel no hotter for
vengeance
.
All this I can do, because I have a bad
memory for matters twenty years old, or more.
Look you, he continued, dropping his tone of
irony, and adopting that of menace; I can
forgive
treachery as old as that; but I remember a
knave's trick a full year. If there be any deceit in
you, look well to yourself during that time. You
were better to have been hanged as a spy, than to
come to me as one.You shall see!
Slife, sir! cried Sterling, you have no
consideration
for a man's honour!
But while he spoke, the refugee had raised his
finger to his lips, and drawn forth a low whistle;
which was almost immediately answered by the
appearance of the two individuals who had been
in the covert before.
Bring up the prisoner, and let the men follow,
said Gilbert; and they immediately retired.
Prisoner! cried Sterling, in surprise, Male
or female?
You have volunteered your services among
the royal refugees, said Gilbert, turning again to
Sterling, and displaying a sardonic grin: you
shall be put on duty forthwith.Have you ever
killed a man?
Dozens of 'em! replied the other, promptly;
when seeing the tory stare in surprise, he fell into
a laugh, saying, That is, not in your barbarous,
blood-thirsty way; but in the heroic, poetic,
dramatic
manner: in which mode I have also fought
divers battles, from Bosworth Field to Dunsinane.
No, captain, as to the real red-paint, as we call it
on the boards, I have shed no more than a lamb,
save in the matter of my friend, Colonel Falconer;
but I am in the mood to learn: I have had a great
appetite for war and glory come on me of a
sudden
.
Hark ye, captain: my friend Falconer's
son was one of the chasing party, and by and by
he will be returning to the Hollow.
Ay! said the refugee; what then?
I like that doctrine of the savages, said
Sterling
,
with an amiable smile, which teaches one
who has a wrong to revenge, how unnecessary it
is to be particular as to the individual he is to
retaliate
on. Now the son, I take it, is a good
substitute
for the father; and to my mind, it would be
a pretty thing to lie behind a bush on the road-side,
with a musket or pistol, as he passed by, and then,
`Like a rat without a tail,
To do, to do, to do!'
Now, supposing, as my commander, you should
order me to such a service, why,`
sessa,
let the
world slide,'I should obey; that is, provided you
stood by, to help me to one of those dens deep and
dark enough for a refugee to take his rest in.
If the young ape has done you a wrong, said
Gilbert, coolly, shoot him the first opportunity.
You will have a chance by and by. You say,
your horse is good and swift?
The best, were it not for his deviltry, ever
bestridden
by a gentleman in trouble. And then,
captain, the ungrateful scoundrel (sure I might
have escaped a dozen times, had it not been for
my concern for him!) has all my munitions of war
upon his back,some six or seven coats and wigs
of approved manufacture, a pair of pistols and a
stage-dagger, a gold sword-hilt and two new
tragedies
in manuscript, a pair of green spectacles,
and a horn pair uncoloured, a bottle of good
VOL. I.Y
brandy, a bible, a copy of Shakspeare, a fiddle,
and my friend Falconer's two guineas.
You must recover him, said the tory captain:
but now for duty. You shall see how treachery
is rewarded by the royal refugees!
As he spoke, there came into the den eight men
attired like the two first, who were included in the
number, all of them with green stuff shirts, edged
and furbelowed with wolf, raccoon, and other
skins, leather leggings and moccasins, and fur caps
with hawks' feathers sticking in them. Each bore
a thick rifle in his hand, and had a long knife in
his pouch-belt, as well as a light axe suspended,
quiver-wise, over his shoulder. They were dark,
fierce-looking men, and perhaps an unusual degree
of sternness was communicated to their features
by the fearful duty they had now in hand. They
led with them, or rather carried, for he was bound
hand and foot, a ninth man, dressed in many
respects like themselves, though he wore an old
military hat, and was without leggings or
moccasins
.
His countenance was as rude as those of the
others; but instead of exhibiting the same cold and
stern resolution, betrayed a look of dogged
sullenness
,
mingled with anxiety.
As soon as he was brought into the little
inclosure
,
he was tossed, with but little ceremony, at the
feet of the tory captain, the band forming a circle
around,each, as if by previous concert, drawing
the tomahawk from his back, and resting his left
hand upon his rifle.
Oho! said Sterling, looking into the prisoner's
face, whom have we here? `By this light, a
most perfidious and drunken monster! `Most
reverend seignior, do you know my voice?' `Oho,
my sprightly Scot of Scots, Douglas, that run'st o'
horseback up a hill perpendicular?' Why this
rascal was he, one John Parker, a soldier on the
lines, that nabbed me, being too drunk to
understand
the claims of my coat to better treatment.
Oh, you vagabond, I knew you would come to the
gallows!
Raise him on his feet, said the tory leader;
then turning to the volunteer, he drew from his
bosom a soiled and crumpled paper, which he put
into Sterling's hands, saying, with a sternness that
was perhaps assumed to cover the shame he felt at
his own ignorance,
Read it.Our merry men here can make
nothing of such pothooks. Read it aloud; and
then we'll proceed to judgment.
The volunteer obeyed, and succeeded in
deciphering
a scrawl, of a style of composition and
penmanship so similar to that Miss Falconer had
shown the Captain's daughter, that, had he ever
seen the latter, he could have been at no loss to
identify the correspondent. It was brief, and clear,
and to the following effect:
Honourable Madam to command
This here is the letter what I promised to put
under the bush; and I put it this night, the 3d of
July, in the year of our Lord, Anno Domini as
before. The rendezvous is a place called the
Tarrapin
Hole, a swamp on the east of the road, six
or eight miles above Captain Loring's. You turn
off from the road at a place where a fresh blazed
beech tree grows by a rock; but the path is
astonishing
twistified, and not fit for horse, but can be
surrounded. I had some thoughts of deserting, for
I reckon some of these dogs is suspicious; but that
might throw them into a panic, and so drive them
to the hills, where the devil himself (begging
pardon
for swearing) could not find them. They say
the captain (that's the Hawk) is in the village, or
to be there to-morrow, when it would be easy to
take him(remember the red hat; as for the horse,
there is no depending on that, for he has 'em
scattered
all about in depots;) and then the rest is
nothing, seeing as how they are in some of a panic
already, as not knowing what is to turn up.
How-somever
nevertheless, there's one thing I've found
out quite astonishing; and that is, that our
lieutenant
,
a most impudent chap as ever you saw,
walks about openly, and lives at the old widow
Bell's, and
Hah! enough! cried the leader, suddenly
snatching the epistle out of the volunteer's hands.
Have we more traitors than one among us? Who
has forgotten orders, and told secrets to new men?
I, captain, said one of the men, breaking
silence
.
This here John Parker and myself were
boys together in Monmouth; and so, for old
companion's
sake, I was more free about the lieutenant,
and other matters, than stood in orders, not
thinking
there could any harm come of it. But I knock
under to punishment, seeing the man has been
betraying
us all, and am ready to do justice on him
with knife, rope, hatchet, or rifle-butt; though it
goes ag'in' my conscience to take a man that's tied
up like a shambled ewe.
Cut the thongs from his legs, said Oran
Gilbert
,
or slack them a little. John Parker, I give
you three minutes to pray. What, Tom Staples,
have you never a rope here that might serve the
traitor's turn?
I have been twisting one all the morning,
said the man who had spoken, displaying a sort of
cable constructed of the shreds of a blanket; for
I hoped it might be
that,
rather than knifing.
Good Lord! cried Sterling, shocked by the
sudden preparation for such a catastrophe, you
don't mean to hang the poor devil?
The sound of a friendly and interceding voice
seemed to thrill the baffled traitor out of his apathy.
He stared at the pseudo-quaker, and at once
displayed
the reckless hardihood of his character,
though his old friend Staples was at that very
moment
forming a noose in the rope, by laughing and
saying,
Well done, old Tapes, is that
you?
You're no
Johnny Raw, I see; but you'll come to the acorns
yet! Don't go for to make a fuss about the
hanging
;
for, you see, it's according to law, and
hanging's
the word; and these here raggamuffin
refugees
must have their way; and so let 'em hang
and be dd! that's my notion. But look ye,
Mr. Captain Gilbert, and all you tories, and you
Tom Staples into the bargain, here's a notion of
mine: you see, you're come to the hanging too
late, for all the good it is to do; for the thing's
done up so cleverly already, you're just as good as
dead men, you are, damme; for I've fixed you in
a hole you can't creep out of without my
assistance
,
you can't, damme. Now, captain, here's a
bargain I'll make: you'll just spare my life, and
drum me out of camp in an honourable, soldierly
way; and, in return, I'll show you the way out of
the trap; for, damme, comrades, you're
surrounded
:
and so we'll square matters betwixt us, and
say nothing more about it.
Peace, rogue, said Oran Gilbert; were the
whole army round us, you should have your dues.
String him up to the oak tree.
Well now, captain, said Parker, that's what
I call being unreasonable. But some of you give
me a drink at a canteen, for there's no use being
strung up thirsty: and, Tom Staples, give me your
cuffers, in token there's no ill-will between us; and
let's have a quid of tobacco to chaw on.Hark!
there captain! do you hear? The road's in a
Y 2
swarm, I tell you! That, I reckon, was the squeak
of captain Caliver; you can hear him a mile, of a
clear day; and, you may depend on it, he'll have
some of you, afore I've done kicking. Won't you
hear to reason?
The coolness of the man was, to Sterling at least,
astonishing. They were fitting the halter round
his neck, when a faint shout from the road was
heard, but whether from a new batch of pursuers,
or from the old ones now returning, could not be
determined. He took the opportunity afforded by
the sudden surprise to beg Staples `to be in no such
fool's hurry with his blanket, and slack it off a little,
for a word with the captain.'
Harkee, captain, said he, it's the last offer
I can make. Now let's argue the case.
Up with the babbling fool! cried Gilbert, who
had been hearkening attentively to the sounds.
You won't? cried the hardened desperado
why then here's my service to you, and the devil
take us all to supper together.Hillo-ah-ho!
Murder
!
Refugees!in the swamp here, quick!
He elevated his voice to a yell that caused the
very leaves to shake above him; and would
undoubtedly
have given the alarm he intended to
those on the road, had not the refugee captain
snatched an axe from the nearest hand, and
instantly
felled him to the earth. Then, giving his
orders anew, the wretch, before he had recovered
his consciousness, shot up among the leaves of an
oak tree; and Sterling, who watched the whole
proceeding with mingled admiration and alarm,
could not trace a single writhing or quivering of
limb afterwards.
'Slife! said he, you killed the fellow with
the hatchet! But, captain, concerning that
surrounding
;
I don't like that
Peace! said the tory; the first duty you
are to learn is, to hold your tonguethe next, to
obey. He gave the wild band a signal, and they
instantly betook themselves to the bushes, or to
hiding-places of which Sterling was ignorant.
This man came to me as a deserter, and was
therefore trusted by one who should have been
wiser: he has met his fate. You I can trust,
because
I know you are a doomed man like myself.
You must recover your horse.
Ay, faith; but how?`Slife! what's the
matter
now? he cried, observing his companion start
suddenly at what seemed to him the whistle of a
wood-robin, and look eagerly from the covert.
The sound was repeated once, and once again;
and then the refugee, turning to him, said,
You must claim him. Get you quickly to the
wood-side, and follow on after the others, so as to
recover him before they open your saddle-bags.
Death and the devil! you are joking! What!
run my head into the lion's jaws? and just to
recover
a vagabond horse, that flings me whenever
the humour seizes him?
If you lose your horse, you lose yourself. We
can be burthened by no footmen.
Footmen? why I see no horses!
Ay: but away with you. Seek the men you
came with, and return with them to Elsie Bell's.
God bless my soul! said Sterling, in alarm;
that young knave Falconer will smoke me in a
moment.
Knock him on the head then.
And then the other lieutenant, that was so
curious with the spots of White Surrey's legs! a
marvellous shrewd fellow, I assure you.
Why, do the same with him then; and stay
not here babbling like a helpless boy.
Protect
yourself. Fear not: your present coat suits
you better than the parson's. Return to Elsie
Bell's, secure your horse and other property, and
see that you feed him well; by midnight you will
be called for, and placed in safety. Keep a firm
countenance, as I think you can, and you are in
no danger.
Ay; but what excuse shall I make for leaving
the road, and diving into these damnable abodes
of refugees and rattlesnakes?
Tell them any lie you will,your horse ran
away with you into the woods, and thenOr
stay, he added, looking grimly up to the body of
the spy; tell them you were seized by the Hawks
of Hawk-Hollow, and that you saw them hang
their tool. Bring them to the spot, and let them
bury the carrion: it is good they should know what
value we set on traitors. And, hark ye, tell them
we mustered at least a hundred strong, and that
we stole off across the road, swearing vengeance
upon the village. Mind you, the village: make
them believe we are marching to surprise it by
night. Now, get you goneoff with you. Set
your face to the westthere; walk onwards five
hundred paces, without looking to the right or the
left, and you will find yourself on the road.
Begone
,
and look not behind you.
The volunteer perceiving that remonstrance
with such a commander might prove as
dangerous
as it was really unavailing, turned to depart,
but not before he had seen the refugee clap his
fingers to his lips, and draw forth a whistle
similar
to that which had attracted his own attention.
There was one injunction, however, which the
retreating
Sterling thought it entirely superfluous to
obey. He had no sooner reached a spot proper
for such a proceeding, than he came to a stand,
and cast his eye backward towards the den. He
beheld a light figure ascending the knoll among
the bushes and under the embowering trees; and
just before it vanished into the greater gloom of
the grot, a sunbeam, peeping through the branches,
fell brightly over it, revealing to his somewhat
astonished
eyes the person of that identical youth
whose mysterious hints had been of such service
in awaking the fears and stimulating the energies
of the hard-beset Nehemiah.
Zounds! he cried, have we any such
gentlemanly
fellows in the confederacy! Oho! I
recollect
now, he added, conning over the words
of the letter, `our lieutenant, a most impudent
chap as ever you saw, walks about openly, lives
at the Traveller's Rest, and,'ay, faith, there was
something about that old fool, Captain Loring, and
a girl. Very well, young one, you will be hanged
like the rest of us!
So saying, and murmuring other expressions of
a similar nature, he made his way to the roadside,
almost at the very spot where a
`blazed'
beech-tree
flung its silver limbs over a rock.
CHAPTER XX.
If thou long'st
To have the story of thy infamous fortunes
Serve for discourse in ordinaries and taverns,
Thou art in the way; or to confound thy name,
Keep on, thou canst not miss it;
Keep the left hand still, it will bring thee to it.
The Roaring Girl, or Moll Cut-purse
.
With
a better fortune than had awaited the
volunteer, Herman Hunter stepped into the grot;
but with much less display of heroism; for he
no sooner found himself in presence of the
renowned
Hawk of the Hollow than he bent his eyes
upon the ground, and stood silent before him.
You are come at last! said the refugee,
giving
him a piercing look, and with a voice none the
less expressive of indignation for being subdued to
the lowest tones, as if he feared a witness even in
the dead malefactor; you are come at last; and
the son of my father comes with my enemies and
hunters!
So I come, said the painter, raising his eyes,
and speaking firmly; I come as the friend, who,
having saved you from one danger, desires to
rescue
you from another yet greater. I warned you
last night,nay, I sent you word long since, that
you were watched: I betrayed a confidence
reposed
in me by one it was a double duplicity to
decoive, in order that you might escape the net
that was secretly closing around you. Nay, I
discovered
the presence and machinations of the
daring spy, who but this morning was selling you
into the hands of your enemies; I found his letter,
and left it where you were sure to obtain it.
Ay; while you were yourself playing the fool
among the Independents, and leaving me to the
care of a stupid ploughman and a dotish old
woman
!
It was all I could, said Herman: I knew it
was better I should be on the ground, when the
officers came. Had I not been there, to join the
first of the hunters, as you call them, and to fire
an alarm in the hollow, neither your own cunning
nor the fleetness of the roan horse could have
saved you from capture.
It was bravely done, said the refugee, with a
softer voice, and it will excuse what is passed.
Where found you this dog's paper? and how?
Near the park-gate, under a bush, where I saw
the man hide it, as I approached the place by
accident
.
This fellow knows all your haunts: will
he not bring the troops to this very spot?
The refugee laughed, and at that moment
Herman
heard a noise on the bough of the oak tree,
as of some animal rending away the bark; and
looking up, he beheld what he had not before seen
in the gloom,the body of the dead traitor
swinging
with a sort of jerking, convulsive motion, as
if still alive. The rope had slipped a little along
the bough, and though soon arrested by some knot
or other roughness, it was some moments before
the motion entirely ceased. The dreadful and
unexpected
spectacle of a man, who, it was evident,
the painter thought, had made his escape, thus
hanging dead before him, filled him with horror,
and he exclaimed at once,
Oh, Oran! Oran! it is this dreadful cruelty of
spirit which has made you what you are,which
has made us all what we are! For God's sake, let
us cut him down, and see if he be yet alive.
He was stiff before the rope touched his neck,
said Oran, grimly; I never struck
twice
with the
hatchet. Let him hang: he died the death of a spy
and betrayer. I have invited the county to his
death-bed!
Daring, as well as cruel! Why do you linger
here? It is plain, you are surrounded: before the sun
sets the whole county will be out; and, to-morrow,
there will not be a den of the woods, or a hollow
of the hills, left unvisited.
Why, this is what I want! cried the fierce
outlaw; the general has tied my hands to act
only on the defensive; and here are forty devils
with heads of iron and fingers of fire, that are
lying asleep in the woods like winter bears, for
want of something to warm the blood in them. I
am ready.
Ready to die! said Herman, solemnly;
ready to throw away your life at the bidding of
a master, or the prompting of an insane passion.
Fly, while you yet may: the attempt to rescue
young Asgill must be now fruitless, as it is
needless
even
the Americans say, his life is in no
danger
.
Fly, then, Oran, and give up your bloody
designs in this fatal Hollow. Hearken to me,
Oran,
Hearken to
me,
said the outcast, sternly.
Has your blood turned to milk, and your heart
to water? Are your wounds healed, your bones
knit, your strength restored, and do you talk of
leaving Hawk-Hollow at this moment? What is
this they say of you? You were among the
foremost
of the rejoicing fools at the Hawks' Nest
have you turned American?
I was born upon these hills; but I will not
strike the friends and countrymen of my father.
Will you strike his foes?
They are in the grave with him, said the
youth, sorrowfully; and he has forgiven them.
They are upon the earth, and his spirit is not
satisfied! cried Oran, with the wild energy, and
almost in the favourite language, of an Indian
orator
.
Have you rested under his roof? have you
sat in his flower-garden? have you walked on his
path by the Run-side? have you spoken with the
people that drove him in his old age from his
fireside
?
Hyland Gilbert! they broke his heart, and
then trampled him to death. Will you not do him
right and vengeance?
Oran!
Changeling! cried the refugee, with a scowl
of savage contempt; if you have not the feelings
of a man, you have at least the gewgaw brain of
a boy. Look! he continued, drawing from his
bosom, and displaying with a sneering grin, a roll
of written parchment, decorated with the due
pomp of martialness; you begged for the toy that
would make you a servant of the king; and here
it is. Take it; and for the sake of a red coat and
feather, do what you would not for the name and
honour of your father.
Hylandfor the assumed name of the young
Gilbert must now be droppedrecoiled from the
emblem of distinction as much as from the
frowning
eyes of the speaker, but answered firmly,
When I was in the Islands, it is true, I desired
the king's commission; and, it is also true, I left
them to obtain it; and had I reached the royal
army at my first landing, no doubt I should have
accepted it. But it was my fate to be cast ashore
far in the south; and I esteem it no bad fortune
that I obeyed a whim of adventure, and made my
way through my rebel countrymen (they are
ours,
Oran,) to this spot. I have thus been made
acquainted
VOL. I.Z
with some of the principles on which this
war is contested; whereby, I thank heaven, I have
been spared the shedding of innocent blood in an
unjust cause.
Do you say this to me? cried the refugee,
with a wild laugh.
Oran! said the young man earnestly, your
heart is not with the side you have espoused; and
fierce and cruel as may be your acts, they are,
they must be, at variance with your conscience.
A moment of fury drove you into a cause you
abhor
;
and if you give the bloodiest proofs of your
fidelity, you are impelled to them only by remorse
and despair.
You are a philosopher! said the renegade,
with another bitter laugh; but we will play the
fool no longer. Will you have the commission?
See, it has the royal mark upon it!
Oran, said Hyland, mournfully, after
yourself
,
I am the last of my father's house. You ask
me to do what has brought the others to their
gravesto early and ignominious graves; and
what, though you have been spared, has left you
the prey of shame and sorrow. Why should I
strike those men, who, besides fighting against
tyrannous oppression, (such it was, Oran,) are also
the children of the same soilour countrymen and
brothers?
You are the last of the seven, said the refugee,
taking both the young man's hands into his, and
looking at him with mingled affection and anger;
four of your brothers were slainone of them
hanged upon a gibbetand all by `our
countrymen
and brothers! The fifthlook you, Hyland,
the fifththe second-born and the beloved, whose
name was given you, that you might never forget
him, fell in battle, saving the life of one of these
my countryman and my brother!
The face of the outcast blackened, and Hyland
trembled in his glance; he stepped out of the nook,
and leading the young man along, conducted him
up the hill to a place where a vista through the
trees, looking over the green swamp, disclosed a
glimpse of the blue ridgy cliffs of the Kittatinny,
to which he pointed.
Come with me to that mountain, he said,
and when you stand upon the summit, gazing to
the right and to the left, you will look upon two
graves. One of them lies in the desert, among
the hills: I planted a pine tree on it, and you can
see its blue head afar off. Do you remember who
sleeps in it?
I do, said Hyland, with emotion; it is my
brother.
And do you bethink you what laid him there?
His humanity and his noble heart.
He died, said Oran Gilberthe died that a
villain might live; and you call that villain `my
countryman and brother!'
No, said Hyland, with some of his wild
brother's
spirit; I except
him
.
Then look to the left, continued Oran, with a
glance of painful humiliation: on the brook, and
in a little bower, there is a second grave.
It is the grave of my poor wronged sister!
cried Hyland, impetuously.
Of your sister, and of. Ha, ha! Is not
this a merry subject for two brothers to talk on!
`My countryman and brother' destroyed her and
fled.
May heaven pardon him, cried Hyland; but
I cannot.
We buried her in secret, and in night, that
none might look upon her shame, or upon ours,
said the refugee; and that night came into the
world her brother, whom we called Hyland, that
we might better remember her destroyer.
Oran! Oran!
Your mother, continued the elder brother,
with a cruel pertinacity, loved the girl well, and
died of sorrow for her. My `countrymen and
brothers' pointed at our shame; they visited the
sins of the children upon the father, and drove him
forth in his old age, a childless and ruined man.
They did, said the youth; he came to the
island, and he died in my arms.
My `countrymen and brothers,'  added Oran,
with a ferocious sneer, have left the oldest and
youngest to weep for the others.Here is the
commission
We
will avenge them!
For a moment Hyland seemed to share the fire
of the outcast; for a moment he grasped the
parchment
which the other had put into his hand. His
face flushed,then turned pale; he hesitated,
faltered; the badge of honour fell to the earth;
and clasping his hands together, he looked at Oran
imploringly, and said,
My father died in my arms, and charged me,
with his last breath, to forget that he had been
wronged.
It was the weakness of his death-hour, said
Oran.
He bade me, continued the youth, leave his
enemies to God, and the destroyer of his peace to
his fate.
Look at his fate! cried the refugee: wealth
surrounds him, and he is envied for his happiness;
while you are ashamed of your father's name, and
I am poor, and abhorred, and miserable.
We will go to the island, and forget
Will you have the commission? said Oran,
abruptly. You have youth, talents, education
and fortune,and will rise. This commission is
to serve among the royal refugees; but if you
carry it bravely at the first bout, I have the
General's
word you shall be transferred to the line, with
a fair field for promotion.
Look, Oran, said the youth, manfully, I will
not take the commission, nor will I trust your
commander's
promises. You have served him from
the beginning; and none have served him better.
How has he rewarded you?You are still a
captain
of refugees!
A shadow of humiliation passed over the face of
the renegade; but he answered without emotion.
I sought nothing better, nor am I fit for
promotion
.
My station is where my habits and
inclinations
put me,among the free rangers. But you
have learning, youth, ambition; and are capable
of training into discipline.
I will not take the commission, said Hyland,
with increasing resolution. I have been enough
with our people,with the Americans,to know
that their cause is just, and holy, and is prevailing.
Nay, you must know, that, at this moment,
commissioners
are deliberating over the preliminaries
of negotiation, and that peace must soon be
concluded
.
It is false, said the refugee, fiercely; a trick
of the ministers,a common stratagem.
True, or false, then, yet am I resolved to shed
no blood in the quarrel; and, certainly, I will take
no commission to distress the people of this
neighbourhood
.
Oran, I am resolved; I will not fight;
and I adjure you by the last wish of our poor
father
,
and by your own hopes of future quiet, that
you give up your schemes of blood, and leave this
fatal valley for ever. Disband your followers;
and take heed you be not suddenly deserted by
your employers.
Boy! said the outlaw, you are not
white-livered
,
or you would not say these things to me!
Look you, I know your folly: it is not for me,
not because you love liberty and peace,not
because
you have laid to heart the dotish words of
a half crazed father,that you are so cold and
shameless; but because you have set your eyes
on the baby face of a girl, who will laugh at you,
when the last fit of your folly is over. Hark you,
read me this knavish letter, and see what is
already
said of you.
I have read it, said the young man,
faltering
.
Ay, but read it again: let me know how far
your madness has been talked of. And Hyland,
summoning courage, took the letter and read it,
though his embarrassment increased at the
paragraph
concerning himself, which had caused Oran
to snatch it so suddenly from the hands of the
volunteer. This paragraph, couched in the coarsest
terms, expressed a knowledge of his affections,
which had alarmed him at first excessively, though,
it was probable, it was nothing more than the
shrewd guess of a keen observer; and it concluded
by showing how easily he might be `nabbed, while
at his gallivanting.'
And this, then, cried the refugee, it is that
makes you so tame, so spiritless! Poor fool, could
you look on none but the betrothed of a Falconer?
Look you, boy, you are in a bear-trap, and the
log will soon be on your back: with this baby
fancy, shameful and dishonourable, you are gulling
yourself into perdition.
Oran, cried the young man, throwing himself
upon the wild man's mercy, this poor girl is
betrothed
against her will; and if no friend stands
by her, there will be another broken heart laid by
the side of Jessie. Do not scoff at me, or reproach
me: she saved my life, she has treated me with a
sister's kindness and trust; and if she will suffer
me to aid her, I will rescue her from her misery,
though I die for it.
Do what you will, said Oran, with a gloomy
frown: though you had her heart and love, what
will she say to you, when this cunning daughter of
a villain, that sent yonder Parker to the rope,
ferrets
out your secret, and shows you to be a son of
the Gilberts? Nay, what will others say to you?
It is better to die as a soldier, than a spy!
I am no spy, said Hyland; and when the
time comes for disclosure, I will not fear to
acknowledge
my name.
It will soon come, said the refugee. Go,
he added, sternly; you are rushing upon
destruction
.
Save yourself as you can, till midnight; and
then take the commission, or be lost. Begone from
this place; it will be soon full of soldiersI have
sent for them; and already they are coming.
Brother, he said, relenting, as the young man
turned to depart: he strode after him and took him
by the hand: What have you or I to do with the
love of woman? This is but a folly.You have
no friend or kinsman left to advise or help you.
Well, if the girl be willing to fly, why, put her upon
a fleet horse, and to-morrow she shall be beyond
the reach of a Falconer. It shall not be said, I
deserted you, even in your folly.
How much further the wild and flinty outlaw
might have been softened by the distress he saw
pictured on his brother's face, cannot be told.
The gentler feeling of affection beginning to yearn
in his bosom, was chased away by a sudden sound
like the flourish of a distant trumpet, which came
trembling over the forest-leaves.
Away, he cried hastily; the curs are
coming
,
and the troop with them. Dive into the swamp,
and meet them on the road. To-night you shall
see me.
So saying, he bounded down the hill with the
activity of a mountain-buck, and was almost
instantly
lost to sight. The brother, crossing the
swamp and brook, made his way to the road, some
distance above the spot where he had dismounted.
END OF VOL. I.THE WHIPPOORWILL.
I.
Sleep, sleep! be thine the sleep that throws
Elysium o'er the soul's repose,
Without a dream, save such as wind,
Like midnight angels, through the mind;
While I am watching on the hill,
I, and the wailing whippoorwill.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.
II.
Sleep, sleep! and once again I'll tell
The oft-pronounced, yet vain, farewell:
Such should his word, oh maiden, be,
Who lifts the fated eye to thee;
Such should it be, before the chain
That wraps his spirit, binds his brain.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.
III.
Sleep, sleep! the ship has left the shore,
The steed awaits his lord no more;
His lord still madly lingers by
The fatal maid he cannot fly,
And thrids the wood, and climbs the hill,
He and the wailing whippoorwill.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.
IV.
Sleep, sleep! the morrow hastens on;
Then shall the wailing slave be gone,
Flitting the hill-top far, for fear
The sounds of joy may reach his car;
The sounds of joy!the hollow knell
Pealed from the mocking chaple-bell.
Oh whippoorwill, oh whippoorwill.